UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE
 SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE 
 SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from                     to                     
Commission file number: 001-16751
ANTHEM, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Indiana  35-2145715
(State or other jurisdiction of 
 incorporation or organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identification Number)
220 Virginia Avenue
Indianapolis, Indiana 46204
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code)
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: (800) 331-1476
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which r egister ed
Common Stock, Par Value $0.01 ANTM New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: NONE
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.  Yes  x No  ¨
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.  Yes  ¨ No  x
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and
(2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.  Yes  x No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the
registrant was required to submit such files).  Yes  x No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller
reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting
company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ☐
Non-accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐
Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness
of its internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public
accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. x
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).  Yes   ☐   No x
The aggregate market value of the voting and non-voting common equity held by non-affiliates of the registrant (assuming solely for
the purposes of this calculation that all directors and executive officers of the registrant are “affiliates”) as of June 30, 2020 was
approximately $66,230,779,383.
As of February 4, 2021, 244,905,689 shares of the registrant’s common stock were outstanding.
 DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Part III of this Annual Report on Form 10-K incorporates by reference information from the registrant’s Definitive Proxy Statement for
the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held May 26, 2021.
Anthem, Inc.
 
Annual Report on Form 10-K
For the Year Ended December 31, 2020
 
Table of Contents
 
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS 3
ITEM 1A.RISK FACTORS 25
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED SEC STAFF COMMENTS 39
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES 40
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS 40
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES 40
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES 41
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA 43
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS
OF OPERATIONS 44
ITEM 7A.QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK 70
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA 73
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND
FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE 145
ITEM 9A.CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES 145
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION 148
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE 148
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION 148
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND
RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS 148
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR
INDEPENDENCE 149
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES 149
PART IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES 150
ITEM 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY 154
SIGNATURES 161
-1-
References in this Annual Report on Form 10-K to the terms “we,” “our,” “us,” “Anthem” or the “Company” refer to
Anthem, Inc., an Indiana corporation, and, unless the context otherwise requires, its direct and indirect subsidiaries. References to
the term “states” include the District of Columbia, unless the context otherwise requires.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
This Annual Report on Form 10-K, including Part II, Item 7, “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results
of Operations,” contains certain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.
Forward-looking statements reflect our views about future events and financial performance and are generally not historical facts. Words
such as “expect,” “feel,” “believe,” “will,” “may,” “should,” “anticipate,” “intend,” “estimate,” “project,” “forecast,” “plan” and similar
expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. These statements include, but are not limited to: financial projections and
estimates and their underlying assumptions; statements regarding plans, objectives and expectations with respect to future operations,
products and services; and statements regarding future performance. Such statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties, many of
which are difficult to predict and generally beyond our control, that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed in,
or implied or projected by, the forward-looking statements. You are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking
statements that speak only as of the date hereof. You are also urged to carefully review and consider the various risks and other disclosures
discussed in our reports filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission from time to time, which attempt to advise interested
parties of the factors that affect our business. Except to the extent otherwise required by federal securities laws, we do not undertake any
obligation to republish revised forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date hereof. These risks and
uncertainties include, but are not limited to: the impact of large scale medical emergencies, such as public health epidemics and
pandemics, including COVID-19, and catastrophes; trends in healthcare costs and utilization rates; our ability to secure sufficient premium
rates, including regulatory approval for and implementation of such rates; the impact of federal and state regulation, including ongoing
changes in the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, as amended
(collectively, the “ACA”), and the ultimate outcome of legal challenges to the ACA; changes in economic and market conditions, as well
as regulations that may negatively affect our liquidity and investment portfolios; our ability to contract with providers on cost-effective
and competitive terms; competitive pressures and our ability to adapt to changes in the industry and develop and implement strategic
growth opportunities; reduced enrollment; unauthorized disclosure of member or employee sensitive or confidential information, including
the impact and outcome of any investigations, inquiries, claims and litigation related thereto; risks and uncertainties regarding Medicare
and Medicaid programs, including those related to non-compliance with the complex regulations imposed thereon; our ability to maintain
and achieve improvement in Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Star ratings and other quality scores and funding risks with
respect to revenue received from participation therein; a negative change in our healthcare product mix; costs and other liabilities
associated with litigation, government investigations, audits or reviews; the ultimate outcome of litigation between Cigna Corporation, and
us related to the merger agreement between the parties and the potential for such litigation to cause us to incur substantial additional costs,
including potential settlement and judgment costs; risks and uncertainties related to our pharmacy benefit management (“PBM”) business,
including non-compliance by any party with the PBM services agreement between us and CaremarkPCS Health, L.L.C.; medical
malpractice or professional liability claims or other risks related to healthcare and PBM services provided by our subsidiaries; general
risks associated with mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures and strategic alliances; possible impairment of the value of our intangible assets
if future results do not adequately support goodwill and other intangible assets; possible restrictions in the payment of dividends from our
subsidiaries and increases in required minimum levels of capital; our ability to repurchase shares of our common stock and pay dividends
on our common stock due to the adequacy of our cash flow and earnings and other considerations; the potential negative effect from our
substantial amount of outstanding indebtedness; a downgrade in our financial strength ratings; the effects of any negative publicity related
to the health benefits industry in general or us in particular; failure to effectively maintain and modernize our information systems; events
that may negatively affect our licenses with the Blue Cross and Blue Shield Association; the impact of international laws and regulations;
changes in U.S. tax laws; intense competition to attract and retain employees; and various laws and provisions in our governing documents
that may prevent or discourage takeovers and business combinations.
-2-
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS.
General
We are one of the largest health benefits companies in the United States in terms of medical membership, serving
approximately 43 million medical members through our affiliated health plans as of December 31, 2020. We deliver a number of
leading health benefit solutions through a broad portfolio of integrated health plans and related services, along with a wide range of
specialty products as well as flexible spending accounts. In the second quarter of 2019, we began using our pharmacy benefits
manager called IngenioRx to market and offer pharmacy benefits management (“PBM”) services to our affiliated health plan
customers throughout the country, as well as to customers outside of the health plans we own. In addition, we are expanding our
business into integrated health services through our Diversified Business Group, which includes certain of our subsidiaries such as
AIM Specialty Health, Aspire Health, and Beacon Health Options, Inc. (“Beacon”) and other companies. At the time of its
acquisition in 2020, Beacon was the largest independently held behavioral health organization in the country. Our acquisition of
Beacon aligns with our strategy to diversify into health services and deliver both integrated solutions and care delivery models that
personalize care for people with complex and chronic conditions.
We are an independent licensee of the Blue Cross and Blue Shield Association (“BCBSA”), an association of independent
health benefit plans. We serve our members as the Blue Cross licensee for California and as the Blue Cross and Blue Shield
(“BCBS”) licensee for Colorado, Connecticut, Georgia, Indiana, Kentucky, Maine, Missouri (excluding 30 counties in the Kansas
City area), Nevada, New Hampshire, New York (in the New York City metropolitan area and upstate New York), Ohio, Virginia
(excluding the Northern Virginia suburbs of Washington, D.C.) and Wisconsin. In a majority of these service areas, we do business
as Anthem Blue Cross, Anthem Blue Cross and Blue Shield, and Empire Blue Cross Blue Shield or Empire Blue Cross. We also
conduct business through arrangements with other BCBS licensees as well as other strategic partners. Through our subsidiaries, we
also serve customers in numerous states across the country as AIM Specialty Health, Amerigroup, Aspire Health, Beacon,
CareMore, Freedom Health, HealthLink, HealthSun, Optimum HealthCare, Simply Healthcare, and/or UniCare. We are licensed to
conduct insurance operations in all 50 states and the District of Columbia through our subsidiaries.
For our insurance products, based on the level of risk we assume in the product contract, we categorize principal funding
arrangements as fully-insured and self-funded. Fully-insured products are products in which we indemnify our policyholders
against costs for health benefits. Self-funded products are offered to customers, generally larger employers, who elect to retain most
or all of the financial risk associated with their employees’ healthcare costs. Some self-funded customers choose to purchase stop
loss coverage to limit their retained risk. For our fully-insured products, we charge a premium and assume the risk for the cost of
covered healthcare services. Under self-funded products, we charge a fee for services and the employer or plan sponsor funds or
reimburses us for the healthcare costs. In addition, we charge a premium to underwrite stop loss insurance for employers that
maintain self-funded health plans. We also generate revenues from providing PBM services including prescription drug fulfillment.
We offer a broad spectrum of network-based managed care plans to Large Group, Small Group, Individual, Medicaid and
Medicare markets. Our managed care plans include: Preferred Provider Organizations (“PPOs”); Health Maintenance
Organizations (“HMOs”); Point-of-Service (“POS”) plans; traditional indemnity plans and other hybrid plans, including Consumer-
Driven Health Plans (“CDHPs”); and hospital only and limited benefit products. In addition, we provide a broad array of managed
care services to self-funded customers, including claims processing, stop loss insurance, actuarial services, provider network
access, medical cost management, disease management, wellness programs and other administrative services. We provide an array
of specialty and other insurance products and services such as PBM services, dental, vision, life and disability insurance benefits,
radiology benefit management and analytics-driven personal healthcare. We also provide services to the federal government in
connection with our Federal Health Products & Services business (“FHPS”) which administers the Federal Employees Health
Benefits (“FEHB”) Program.
An ongoing focus on healthcare costs by employers, the government and consumers has continued to drive the growth of
alternatives to traditional indemnity health insurance. HMO, PPO and hybrid plans are among the various forms of managed care
products that have been developed. Through these types of products, insurers attempt to contain the cost of healthcare by
-3-
negotiating contracts with hospitals, physicians and other providers to deliver high-quality healthcare to members at favorable rates.
These products usually feature medical management and other quality and cost optimization measures such as pre-admission
review and approval for certain non-emergency services, pre-authorization of outpatient surgical procedures, network credentialing
to determine that network physicians and hospitals have the required certifications and expertise, and various levels of care
management programs to help members better understand and navigate the healthcare system. In addition, providers may have
incentives to achieve certain quality measures, may share medical cost risk or may have other incentives to deliver quality medical
services in a cost-effective manner. Also, certain plans offer members incentives for healthy behaviors, such as smoking cessation
and weight management. Members are charged periodic, prepaid premiums and generally pay co-payments, coinsurance and/or
deductibles when they receive services. While the distinctions between the various types of plans have lessened over recent years,
PPO, POS and CDHP products generally provide reduced benefits for out-of-network services, while traditional HMO products
generally provide little to no reimbursement for non-emergency out-of-network utilization, but often offer more generous benefit
coverage. An HMO plan may also require members to select one of the network primary care physicians (“PCPs”) to coordinate
their care and approve any specialist or other services.
Economic factors, greater consumer and employer sophistication and accountability have resulted in an increased demand for
choice in both product/benefit designs and provider network configurations. As a result, we continue to offer our broad access PPO
networks with multiple benefit designs, but are also focused on leveraging our provider collaboration initiatives with our
accountable care organization (“ACO”) partnerships to develop both narrow and tiered network offerings. This array of network
and product configurations allows both the employer and the employee to design and select the combination of benefit designs
(e.g., traditional PPOs, high deductibles, health reimbursement accounts, health savings accounts, PCP based products, tiered
copays) and networks (e.g., broad, narrow, tiered, closed or exclusive provider, and open) that optimize choice, quality and price at
the consumer, employer and market level. We believe we are well-positioned in each of our states to respond to these market
preferences.
Our medical membership includes seven different customer types: Local Group, Individual, National Accounts, BlueCard,
Medicare, Medicaid and FEHB. In addition, we also serve customers who purchase one or more of our other products or services
that are often ancillary to our health business.
Our products are generally developed and marketed with an emphasis on the differing needs of our customers. In particular,
our product development and marketing efforts take into account the differing characteristics between the various customers served
by us, as well as the unique needs of educational and public entities, labor groups, FEHB program, national employers and state-run
programs servicing low-income, high-risk and underserved markets. Overall, we seek to establish pricing and product designs to
provide value for our customers while achieving an appropriate level of profitability for each of our customer categories balanced
with the competitive objective to grow market share. We believe that one of the keys to our success has been our focus on these
distinct customer types, which better enables us to develop benefit plans and services that meet our customers’ unique needs.
Further, IngenioRx was built to simplify pharmacy care and focus on the whole person, and we expect it will make it easier for our
customers to achieve better health outcomes at a lower total cost of care.
We market our Individual, Medicare and certain Local Group products through direct marketing activities and an extensive
network of independent agents, brokers and retail partnerships. Products for National Accounts and Local Group customers with a
larger employee base are generally sold through independent brokers or consultants retained by the customer who work with
industry specialists from our in-house sales force. In the Individual and Small Group markets, we offer on-exchange products
through state- or federally-facilitated marketplaces, referred to as public exchanges, and off-exchange products. Federal subsidies
are available for certain members, subject to income and family size, who purchase public exchange products. 
Being a licensee of the BCBS association of companies, of which there were 36 independent primary licensees including us as
of December 31, 2020, provides significant market value, especially when competing for very large multi-state employer groups.
For example, each BCBS member company is able to utilize other BCBS licensees’ substantial provider networks and discounts
when any BCBS member works or travels outside of the state in which their policy is written. This program is referred to as
BlueCard and is a source of revenue when we provide member services in the states where we are the BCBS licensee to
individuals who are customers of BCBS plans not affiliated with us. This program also provides a national provider network for our
members when they travel to other states. See “BCBSA Licenses” herein for additional information on our BCBSA licenses. We
refer to members in our service areas licensed by the BCBSA as our BCBS-branded®
®
-4-
business. Non-BCBS-branded business refers to members in our non-BCBS-branded Amerigroup, Freedom Health, HealthSun,
Optimum Health Care and Simply Healthcare plans, as well as Beacon, HealthLink and UniCare members.
For additional information describing each of our customer types, detailed marketing efforts and changes in medical
membership over the last three years, see “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations” included in Part II, Item 7 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Our results of operations depend in large part on our ability to accurately predict and effectively manage healthcare costs
through effective contracting with providers of care to our members, product pricing, medical management and health and wellness
programs, including service coordination and case management for addressing complex and specialized healthcare needs,
innovative product design and our ability to maintain or achieve improvement in our Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
(“CMS”) Star ratings. CMS Star ratings affect Medicare Advantage plan reimbursements as well as our eligibility to earn quality-
based bonus payments for those plans. See “Regulation” herein for additional information on our CMS Star ratings. For additional
information on our networks and provider relations, product pricing and healthcare cost management programs, see “Networks and
Provider Relations”, “Pricing and Underwriting of Our Products”, “Medical Management Programs”, “Care Management
Programs” and “Healthcare Quality Initiatives” herein.
Advances in medical technology, increases in specialty drug costs, increases in hospital expenditures and other provider costs,
the aging of the population, other demographic characteristics and the COVID-19 pandemic continue to contribute to rising
healthcare costs. Our managed care plans and products are designed to encourage providers and members to participate in quality,
cost-effective health benefit programs by using the full range of our innovative medical management services, quality initiatives
and financial incentives. Our market share and high business retention rates enable us to realize the long-term benefits of investing
in preventive and early detection programs. Our ability to provide cost-effective health benefits products and services is enhanced
through a disciplined approach to internal cost containment, prudent management of our risk exposure and successful integration of
acquired businesses. In addition, our ability to manage selling, general and administrative costs continues to be a driver of our
overall profitability.
The future results of our operations will also be impacted by certain external forces and resulting changes in our business
model and strategy. The continuing growth in our government-sponsored business exposes us to increased regulatory oversight.
The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, as amended
(collectively, the “ACA”), has changed and may continue to make broad-based changes to the U.S. healthcare system. The ACA
presented us with new growth opportunities, but also introduced new risks, regulatory challenges and uncertainties, and required
changes in the way products are designed, underwritten, priced, distributed and administered. We currently offer Individual ACA-
compliant products in 103 of the 143 rating regions in which we operate. Our strategy has been, and will continue to be, to only
participate in rating regions where we have an appropriate level of confidence that these markets are on a path toward
sustainability, including, but not limited to, factors such as expected financial performance, regulatory environment, and underlying
market characteristics. Changes to our business environment are likely to continue as elected officials at the national and state
levels continue to enact, and both elected officials and candidates for election continue to propose, significant modifications to
existing laws and regulations, including changes to taxes and fees. In addition, the legal challenges regarding the ACA, including a
federal district court decision invalidating the ACA, which was argued before the U.S. Supreme Court in November 2020 and has
been stayed pending the U.S. Supreme Court’s decision, continue to contribute to this uncertainty. We will continue to evaluate the
impact of the ACA as additional guidance is made available and any further developments or judicial rulings occur. For additional
discussion, see “Regulation” herein and Part I, Item 1A “Risk Factors” in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
In addition to the external forces discussed in the preceding paragraph, our results of operations are impacted by levels and mix
of membership which can change as a result of the quality and pricing of our health benefits products and services, aging
population, economic conditions, changes in unemployment, acquisitions, entry into new markets and expansions in or exits from
existing markets. These membership trends could be negatively impacted by various factors that could have a material adverse
effect on our future results of operations such as general economic downturns that result in business failures, failure to obtain new
customers or retain existing customers, premium increases, benefit changes or our exit from a specific market. See Part I, Item 1A
“Risk Factors” and Part II, Item 7 “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations”
included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
-5-
We believe healthcare is local and that we have the strong local presence required to understand and meet local customer needs
with regard to any product they are enrolled in with us. Further, we believe we are well-positioned to deliver what customers want:
innovative, choice-based and affordable products; distinctive service; simplified transactions; and better access to information for
quality care. Our local presence, combined with our national expertise, has created opportunities for collaborative programs that
reward physicians and hospitals for clinical quality and excellence. We feel that our commitment to health improvement and care
management provides added value to customers and healthcare professionals. Ultimately, we believe that practical and sustainable
improvements in healthcare must focus on improving healthcare quality while managing costs for total affordability. We have
implemented initiatives driving payment innovation and partnering with providers to lower cost and improve the quality of
healthcare for our members, and we continue to develop new and innovative ways to effectively manage risk and engage our
members. Further, we are expanding our financial arrangements with providers to include payment models that encourage value-
based care. We believe focusing on quality of care rather than volume of care is the foundation for improving patient outcomes. Our
value-based payment model supports patient-centered care by improving collaboration between providers and health partners and
delivering to our patients the right care, at the right time, in the right place. In addition, we are focused on achieving efficiencies
from our national scale while optimizing service performance for our customers. Finally, we expect to continue to rationalize our
portfolio of businesses and products and align our investments to capitalize on new opportunities to drive growth in our existing
markets and expand into new markets in the future.
We continue to enhance interactions with customers, providers, brokers, agents, employees and other stakeholders through
digital technology and improving internal operations. Our approach includes not only the sales and distribution of health benefits
products through digital technology, but also implementing advanced capabilities that improve services benefiting customers,
agents, brokers, and providers while optimizing administrative costs. These enhancements can also help improve the quality,
coordination and safety of healthcare through increased communications between patients and their physicians.
At Anthem, we strive to improve the health of humanity. We believe in working together to achieve our mission of improving
lives and communities, simplifying healthcare and expecting more. As we seek to accomplish these goals through a collaborative
focus on execution and delivering for those we serve, our vision is to be the most innovative, valuable and inclusive health partner.
We focus on ensuring quality products and services that give members access to the care they need. With an unyielding
commitment to meeting the needs of our diverse customers, we are guided by the following values:
•Leadership – Redefine what is possible
•Community – Committed, connected, invested
•Integrity – Do the right thing, with a spirit of excellence
•Agility – Delivery today, transform tomorrow
•Diversity – Open your hearts and minds
In pursuing our vision, we intend to transform healthcare by providing trusted and caring solutions and delivering quality
products and services that give customers access to the care they need. At the same time, we will focus on earnings, organic
membership growth, improvements in our operating cost structure, strategic acquisitions and the efficient use of capital.
-6-
COVID-19
In March 2020, the World Health Organization declared the outbreak of a novel strain of coronavirus (“COVID-19”) a global
health pandemic. The COVID-19 pandemic continues to evolve, and the virus and mitigation efforts have continued to impact the
global economy, cause market instability, increase unemployment in the United States, and put pressure on the healthcare system,
and it has impacted and will continue to impact our membership and benefit expense. As the COVID-19 pandemic continues, we
remain focused on increasing access and coverage for our members, making changes to our membership benefits and business
operations and adapting tools and policies to assist consumers and care providers, including:
•Waiving cost-sharing for COVID-19 diagnostic tests and treatment;
•Providing expanded telehealth coverage for our Medicare and Medicaid plans, where permissible, and waiving cost-
sharing for in-network telehealth visits, including telephonic visits and those for mental health;
•Providing expanded telehealth coverage for our members in fully-insured employer plans and Individual plans (we also
waived cost-sharing for in-network telehealth and phone visits through September 30, 2020);
•Encouraging the use of home delivery services to enable access to necessary medications and relaxing early prescription
refill policies for maintenance and specialty medications for our members in fully-insured employer plans and Individual
plans at least through September 30, 2020, and for Medicare and Medicaid plans in accordance with applicable
regulations;
•Providing a one-month premium credit to members enrolled in select individual plans and to fully insured employer group
customers ranging from 10 to 15 percent of the monthly premium;
•Providing a one-month premium credit of 50 percent of the monthly premium to individuals in stand-alone and group
dental plans;
•Leveraging data and advanced analytics to provide innovative solutions in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, and
introducing a suite of digital tools that serve various functions, including providing member data and updates related to
COVID-19, aggregating real-time COVID-19 data to present trends and predictions for our communities, and providing
individuals with resources for mental health and free or reduced-cost programs that provide food, transportation, childcare
and more;
•Providing support to care provider partners of our affiliated health plans to help them continue to focus on caring for
patients, including funding and financial assistance, working with care providers to accelerate claims processing for
outstanding accounts receivables, resolve claims where possible and appropriate, and accelerate payments to support state-
specific Medicaid programs;
•Simplifying access to care by temporarily suspending select prior authorization requirements for certain services and
equipment critical to COVID-19 treatment;
•Offering in-network dental providers a $10 personal protective equipment credit per patient, per visit, through December
31, 2020;
•Transitioning the majority of our employees to a remote work environment, expanding our employee benefits to provide
additional support, imposing travel limitations and implementing workplace modifications consistent with the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention guidelines and social distancing protocols;
•Committing to lifting up our local communities through a variety of partnership and relief efforts, contributing $50 million
to the Anthem Foundation to support its COVID-19 response and recovery efforts to help areas of greatest need, including
care provider safety, food insecurity, and mental and behavioral health resources; and
•Sponsoring and participating in collaborative efforts to promote innovative solutions related to COVID-19 and healthcare
needs caused by the pandemic.
For additional discussion see Part II, Item 7, “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations–COVID-19” included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. For information regarding our risks related to the COVID-
19 pandemic and our other risk factors, see Part I, Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
-7-
Competition
The managed care industry is highly competitive, both nationally and in our local markets. Competition continues to be intense
due to aggressive marketing, pricing, government-sponsored programs bid activity, business consolidations, new strategic alliances,
new competitors in the market, a proliferation of new products, technological advancements, the impact of legislative reform,
increased quality awareness and price sensitivity among customers and changing market practice such as increased usage of
telehealth.
We believe that participants in the managed care industry compete for customers based on quality of service, price, access to
provider networks, access to care management and wellness programs (including health information), innovation, effective use of
technology such as electronic data transfer, breadth and flexibility of products and benefits, expertise and reputation (including
National Committee on Quality Assurance (“NCQA”) accreditation status as well as CMS Star ratings), brand recognition and
financial stability. Our ability to attract and retain customers is substantially tied to our ability to distinguish ourselves from our
competitors in these areas.
We believe our exclusive right to market products under the most recognized brand in the industry, BCBS, in our most
significant markets provides us with greater brand recognition over competitive product offerings. Typically, we are the largest
participant in each of our BCBS branded markets and, thus, are a closely-watched target by other insurance competitors.
Product pricing remains competitive and we strive to price our healthcare benefit products and design our Medicare and
Medicaid bids consistent with anticipated underlying medical trends. We believe our pricing and bid strategy, based on predictive
modeling, proprietary research and data-driven processes, has positioned us to benefit from the potential growth opportunities
available through entry into new markets, expansions in existing markets and as a result of any future changes to the current
regulatory scheme. We believe that our pricing and bid strategy, brand name and network quality will provide a strong foundation
for membership growth opportunities in the future.
Our provider networks give us a highly competitive unit cost position and provide distinctive service levels which allow us to
offer a broad range of affordable health benefit products to our customers. To build our provider networks, we compete with other
health benefits plans for the best contracts with hospitals, physicians and other providers. We believe that physicians and other
providers primarily consider customer volume, reimbursement rates, timeliness of reimbursement and administrative service
capabilities along with the reduction of non-value added administrative tasks when deciding whether to contract with a health
benefits plan.
At the sales and distribution level, we compete for qualified agents and brokers to recommend and distribute our products.
Strong competition exists among insurance companies and health benefits plans for agents and brokers with demonstrated ability to
secure new business and maintain existing accounts. We believe that the quality and price of our products, support services,
reputation and prior relationships, along with a reasonable commission structure, are the factors agents and brokers consider in
choosing whether to market our products. We believe that we have good relationships with our agents and brokers, and that our
products, support services and commission structure compare favorably to those of our competitors in all of our markets.
In addition, the PBM industry is highly competitive, and IngenioRx is subject to competition from national, regional and local
PBMs, insurers, health plans, large retail pharmacy chains, large retail stores, supermarkets, other mail order pharmacies, web
pharmacies and specialty pharmacies. Strong competition within the PBM industry has generated greater demand for lower product
and service pricing, increased revenue sharing and enhanced product and service offerings.
Reportable Segments
We manage our operations through four reportable segments: Commercial & Specialty Business, Government Business,
IngenioRx and Other. We regularly evaluate the appropriateness of our reportable segments, particularly in light of organizational
changes, merger and acquisition activity and changing laws and regulations.
Our Commercial & Specialty Business and Government Business segments both offer a diversified mix of managed care
products, including PPOs, HMOs, traditional indemnity benefits and POS plans, as well as a variety of hybrid benefit plans
including CDHPs, hospital only and limited benefit products.
-8-
Our Commercial & Specialty Business segment includes our Local Group, National Accounts, Individual and Specialty
businesses. Business units in the Commercial & Specialty Business segment offer fully-insured health products; provide a broad
array of managed care services to self-funded customers including claims processing, stop loss insurance, provider network access,
medical cost management, disease management, wellness programs, underwriting, actuarial services and other administrative
services; and provide an array of specialty and other insurance products and services such as dental, vision, life and disability
insurance benefits.
Our Government Business segment includes our Medicare and Medicaid businesses, National Government Services (“NGS”)
and services provided to the federal government in connection with our FHPS business. Medicaid makes federal matching funds
available to all states for the delivery of healthcare benefits to eligible individuals, principally those with incomes below specified
levels who meet other state-specified requirements. Medicaid is structured to allow each state to establish its own eligibility
standards, benefits package, payment rates and program administration under broad federal guidelines. Our Medicare customers are
Medicare-eligible individual members age 65 and over who have enrolled in Medicare Advantage, a managed care alternative for
the Medicare program, or who have purchased Medicare Supplement benefit coverage, some disabled members under age 65, or
members of all ages with end stage renal disease. Medicare Supplement policies are sold to Medicare recipients as supplements to
the benefits they receive from the Medicare program. Medicare Supplement policy rates are filed with, and in some cases approved
by, state insurance departments. Most of the premium for Medicare Advantage is based on bids submitted to CMS and paid directly
by the federal government on behalf of the participant who may also be charged a small premium. Additionally, through our
alliance partnership engagements with larger provider groups and BCBS plans, we offer a variety of Medicaid and Medicare
services that include joint ventures, administrative service offerings, and full-risk arrangements. NGS acts as a Medicare contractor
for the federal government in several regions across the nation.
Our IngenioRx segment includes our PBM business, which began its operations during the second quarter of 2019. IngenioRx
markets and offers PBM services to our affiliated health plan customers, as well as to external customers outside of the health plans
we own. IngenioRx has a comprehensive PBM services portfolio, which includes services such as formulary management,
pharmacy networks, prescription drug database, member services and mail order capabilities. In 2019, IngenioRx was included in
our Other reportable segment.
Our Other segment includes our Diversified Business Group (“DBG”), which is our integrated health services business, and
certain eliminations and corporate expenses not allocated to our other reportable segments.
For additional information, see Note 20, “Segment Information”, of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in
Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We experience seasonality in our Commercial & Specialty Business and Government Business segments. While our premium
revenues are not seasonal, our benefit costs typically increase during the year as our fully-insured members pay their annual
deductibles and reach their out-of-pocket maximum limits. However, this seasonality may change in the future as the COVID-19
pandemic continues and COVID-19 vaccines become widely available. Our expenses associated with COVID-19, including testing
and treatment and the actions taken to support our members in response to the pandemic, accelerated in the fourth quarter of 2020
and exceeded the benefit we experienced during the quarter from the lower volume of healthcare claims attributable to decreased
utilization of non-COVID-19 health services.
Through our participation in various federal government programs, we generated approximately 20.3%, 20.7% and 19.8% of
our total consolidated revenues from agencies of the U.S. government for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively. These revenues are contained in the Government Business segment. An immaterial amount of our total consolidated
revenues is derived from activities outside of the U.S.
 Product and Service Descriptions
A general description of our products and services is provided below:
Preferred Provider Organization:    PPO products offer the member an option to select any healthcare provider, with benefits
reimbursed by us at a higher level when care is received from a participating network provider. Increasingly, customers are
choosing our PPO products offered with an exclusive provider organization, which eliminates coverage out of
-9-
network. Coverage is subject to co-payments or deductibles and coinsurance, with member cost sharing usually limited by out-of-
pocket maximums.
Consumer-Driven Health Plans:    CDHPs provide consumers with increased financial responsibility, choice and control
regarding how their healthcare dollars are spent. Generally, CDHPs combine a high-deductible PPO plan with an employer-funded
and/or employee-funded personal care account, which may result in tax benefits to the employee. Some or all of the dollars
remaining in the personal care account at year-end can be rolled over to the next year for future healthcare needs.
Traditional Indemnity:    Indemnity products offer the member an option to select any healthcare provider for covered services.
Coverage is subject to deductibles and coinsurance, with member cost sharing usually limited by out-of-pocket maximums.
Health Maintenance Organization:    HMO products include comprehensive managed care benefits, generally through a
participating network of physicians, hospitals and other providers. A member in one of our HMOs must typically select a PCP from
our network. PCPs generally are family practitioners, internists or pediatricians who provide necessary preventive and primary
medical care, and are generally responsible for coordinating other necessary healthcare services. We offer HMO plans with varying
levels of co-payments, which result in different levels of premium rates.
 Point-of-Service:    POS products blend the characteristics of HMO, PPO and indemnity plans. Members can have
comprehensive HMO-style benefits through participating network providers with minimum out-of-pocket expenses (co-payments)
and also can go directly, without a referral, to any provider they choose, subject to, among other things, certain deductibles and
coinsurance. Member cost sharing is limited by out-of-pocket maximums.
Public Exchange and Off-Exchange Products: Individual and Small Group products cover essential health benefits as defined
in the ACA along with many other requirements and cost-sharing features. Individual and Small Group products offered on and off
the public exchanges meet the definition of the “metal” product requirements (bronze, silver, gold and platinum) and each metal
product must satisfy a specific actuarial value with respect to essential benefits. Health insurers participating on the public
exchanges must offer at least one silver and one gold product.
Administrative Services:    In addition to fully-insured products, we provide administrative services to Large Group, Small
Group and National Account employers that maintain self-funded health plans. These administrative services include claims
processing, medical cost management, disease management, wellness programs, underwriting, actuarial services and other
administrative services for self-funded employers. Self-funded health plans are also able to use our provider networks and to realize
savings through our negotiated provider arrangements, while allowing employers the ability to design certain health benefit plans in
accordance with their own requirements and objectives. We also underwrite stop loss insurance for self-funded plans.
 BlueCard:    BlueCard is a national program that links participating healthcare providers and independent BCBS plans.
BlueCard host members are generally members who reside in or travel to a state in which an Anthem subsidiary is the Blue Cross
and/or Blue Shield licensee and who are covered under an employer-sponsored health plan serviced by a non-Anthem controlled
BCBS licensee, which is the “home” plan. We perform certain administrative functions for BlueCard host members, including
claims pricing and administration for which we receive administrative fees from the BlueCard members’ home plans. Other
administrative functions, including maintenance of enrollment information and customer service, are performed by the home plan.
 Medicare Plans:    We offer a wide variety of plans, products and options to individuals age 65 and older such as Medicare
Supplement plans; Medicare Advantage, including Special Needs Plans (“SNPs”), also known as Medicare Advantage SNPs;
Medicare Part D Prescription Drug Plans (“Medicare Part D”); and dual-eligible programs through Medicare-Medicaid Plans
(“MMPs”). Medicare Supplement plans typically pay the difference between healthcare costs incurred by a beneficiary and
amounts paid by Medicare. Medicare Advantage plans provide Medicare beneficiaries with a managed care alternative to
traditional Medicare and often include a Medicare Part D benefit. In addition, our Medicare Advantage SNPs provide tailored
benefits to special needs individuals who are institutionalized or have severe or disabling chronic conditions and to dual-eligible
customers, who are low-income seniors and persons under age 65 with disabilities. Medicare Advantage SNPs are coordinated care
plans specifically designed to provide targeted care, covering all the healthcare services considered medically necessary for
members and often providing professional care coordination services, with personal guidance and programs that help members
maintain their health. Medicare Advantage membership also® ®
®
®
®
-10-
includes Medicare Advantage members in our Group Retiree Solutions business who are related to National Accounts, retired
members of Local Group accounts, or retired members of groups who are not affiliated with our Commercial accounts who have
selected a Medicare Advantage product through us. Medicare Part D offers a prescription drug plan to Medicare and MMP
beneficiaries. MMP is a demonstration program focused on serving members who are dually eligible for Medicaid and Medicare,
which was established as a result of the passage of the ACA.
 Individual Plans:    We offer a full range of health insurance plans with a variety of options and deductibles for individuals
who are not covered by employer-sponsored coverage and are not eligible for government sponsored plans, such as Medicare
and/or Medicaid. Individual policies are generally sold through independent agents and brokers, retail partnerships, our in-house
sales force or via the exchanges. Individual business is sold on a fully-insured basis. We offer on-exchange products through public
exchanges and off-exchange products. Federal premium subsidies are available only for certain public exchange Individual
products. Unsubsidized Individual customers are generally more sensitive to product pricing and, to a lesser extent, the
configuration of the network and the efficiency of administration. Instability in the Individual market has resulted in a targeted
approach where we offer products in select geographies.
 Medicaid Plans and Other State-Sponsored Programs:    We have state contracts to serve members enrolled in publicly funded
healthcare programs, including Medicaid; ACA-related Medicaid expansion programs; Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
(“TANF”); programs for seniors and people with disabilities (“SPD”); Children’s Health Insurance Programs (“CHIP”); and
specialty programs such as those focused on long-term services and support (“LTSS”), HIV/AIDS, children living in foster care,
behavioral health and/or substance abuse disorders, and intellectual disabilities and/or developmental disabilities (“ID/DD
programs”). The Medicaid program makes federal matching funds available to all states for the delivery of healthcare benefits for
low income and/or high medical risk individuals. These programs are managed by the individual states based on broad federal
guidelines. TANF is a state and federally funded program designed for a population consisting primarily of low-income children
and their guardians. SPD is a federal income supplement program designed for Supplemental Security Income recipients; however,
states can broaden eligibility criteria. This population generally consists of low-income seniors and people with disabilities. CHIP
is a state and federally funded program that provides healthcare coverage to children not otherwise covered by Medicaid or other
insurance programs. LTSS is a state and federally funded program that offers states a broad and flexible set of program design
options and covers the delivery of long-term services and support for our members who receive home and community- or
institution-based services for long-term care. Our HIV/AIDS program is a state and federally sponsored program that provides
services to those living with HIV/AIDS. Our foster care program is a state and federally sponsored program serving children with
complex needs within the foster care system. Our behavioral health program is a state and federally sponsored program providing
services to those with mental health and/or substance abuse disorders. ID/DD is a state and federally sponsored program serving
those living with limitations in intellectual functioning and adaptive behavior learning disabilities. Our Medicaid plans also cover
certain dual-eligible customers, as previously described above, who also receive Medicare benefits. We provide Medicaid and other
state sponsored services, such as administrative services, in Arkansas, California, Colorado, Florida, Georgia, Indiana, Iowa,
Kentucky, Louisiana, Maryland, Minnesota, Missouri, Nebraska, Nevada, New Jersey, New York, South Carolina, Tennessee,
Texas, Virginia, Washington, West Virginia, and Wisconsin.
 Pharmacy Products:    In the second quarter of 2019, we began using IngenioRx to market and offer PBM services to our
affiliated health plan customers throughout the country, as well as to customers outside of the health plans we own. Our
comprehensive PBM services portfolio includes features such as formulary management, pharmacy networks, a prescription drug
database, member services, and mail order capabilities. IngenioRx delegates certain PBM administrative functions, such as claims
processing and prescription fulfillment, to CaremarkPCS Health, L.L.C., which is a subsidiary of CVS Health Corporation (“CVS
Health”), pursuant to a five-year agreement (the “CVS PBM Agreement”). With IngenioRx, we retain the responsibilities for
clinical and formulary strategy and development, member and employer experiences, operations, sales, marketing, account
management and retail network strategy. From December 2009 through December 2019, we delegated certain PBM functions and
administrative services to Express Scripts Inc. (“Express Scripts”). Express Scripts managed the network of pharmacy providers,
operated mail order pharmacies and processed prescription drug claims on our behalf, while we sold and supported the product for
our members, made formulary decisions, sold drug benefit design strategy and provided front line member support. We began
transitioning existing members from Express Scripts to IngenioRx in the second quarter of 2019, and completed the transition by
January 1, 2020.
 Behavioral Health: We offer managed care and member services for behavioral health and/or substance use disorders under
contracts with state publicly funded healthcare programs, including Medicare and Medicaid, and through private health
-11-
plans and ACOs. In addition, we provide management and member benefit services for employee assistance plans to private
employers and the federal government’s Military OneSource support services. Through our subsidiary, Beacon, we also provide
direct behavioral health counseling services through licensed clinicians in convenient and accessible locations, principally within a
retail store environment.
Life Insurance:    We offer an array of competitive individual and group life insurance benefit products to both Large Group
and Small Group customers in conjunction with our health plans. The life insurance products include term life and accidental death
and dismemberment.
 Disability:    We offer short-term and long-term disability products, usually in conjunction with our health plans.
 Dental:    Our dental plans include networks in certain states in which we operate. Many of the dental benefits are provided to
customers enrolled in our health plans and are offered on both a fully-insured and self-funded basis. Our members also have access
to additional dental providers through our participation in the National Dental GRID, a national dental network developed by and
for BCBS plans. The National Dental GRID includes dentists in all 50 states and the District of Columbia and provides multi-state
customers with a national solution that offers in-network discounts across the country. Additionally, we offer managed dental
services to other healthcare plans to assist those plans in providing dental benefits to their customers.
Vision Services and Products:    Our vision plans include networks within the states in which we operate. Many of the vision
benefits are provided to customers enrolled in our health plans and are offered on both a fully-insured and self-funded basis.
Medicare Administrative Operations:    Through our subsidiary, NGS, we serve as a fiscal intermediary, carrier and Medicare
administrative contractor for the federal government by providing administrative services for the Medicare program, Parts A and B,
which generally provides coverage for persons who are 65 or older and for persons who are under 65 and disabled or with end-
stage renal disease. Part A of the Medicare program provides coverage for services provided by hospitals, skilled nursing facilities
and other healthcare facilities. Part B of the Medicare program provides coverage for services provided by physicians, physical and
occupational therapists and other professional providers, as well as certain durable medical equipment and medical supplies.
Radiology Benefit Management:    We offer outpatient diagnostic imaging management services to health plans, which
promote the most appropriate use of clinical services to improve the quality of care delivered to members. These services include
utilization management for advanced diagnostic imaging procedures, network development and optimization, patient safety, claims
adjudication and provider payment.
 Personal Healthcare Guidance:    We offer evidence-based and analytics-driven personal healthcare guidance. These services
help improve the quality, coordination and safety of healthcare, enhance communications between patients and their physicians,
and reduce medical costs.
 Networks and Provider Relations
Our relationships with physicians, hospitals and professionals that render healthcare services to our members are guided by
local, regional and national standards for network development, reimbursement and contract methodologies. While following
industry standards, we are simultaneously seeking to lead transformation efforts within our healthcare system, moving from a
fragmented model premised on episodic intervention to one based on proactive, coordinated care built around the needs of the
patient. A key element of this transformation involves a transition from traditional fee-for-service payment models to models where
providers are paid based on the value, both in quality and affordability, of the care they deliver.
 We establish “market-based” hospital reimbursement payments that we believe are fair, but aggressive, and among the most
competitive in the market. We also seek to ensure that physicians in our network are paid in a timely manner at appropriate rates. In
many instances, we deploy multi-year contracting strategies, including case rates or fixed rates, to limit our exposure to medical
cost inflation and to increase cost predictability. We maintain both broad and narrow provider networks to ensure member choice,
based on both price and access needs, while implementing programs designed to improve the quality of care our members receive.
Increasingly, we are supplementing our broad-based networks with smaller or more
-12-
cost-effective networks that are designed to be attractive to a more price-sensitive customer segment, such as public exchange
customers.
 Our reimbursement strategies vary across markets and depend on the degree of consolidation and integration of physician
groups and hospitals. Under a fee-for-service reimbursement methodology for physicians, fee schedules are developed at the state
level based on an assessment of several factors and conditions, including the CMS resource-based relative value system
(“RBRVS”), medical practice cost inflation and physician supply. We utilize CMS RBRVS fee schedules as a reference point for
fee schedule development and analysis. The RBRVS structure was developed, maintained, and updated by CMS and is used by the
Medicare program and other major payers. In addition, we have implemented and continue to expand physician incentive
contracting, or “pay-for-performance,” which ties physician payment levels to performance on clinical measures.
 While we generally do not delegate full financial responsibility to our physician providers in the form of capitation-based
reimbursement, we maintain capitation-based arrangements in certain markets where we determine that market dynamics result in it
being a useful method to lower costs and reduce underwriting risk.
 Our hospital contracts provide for a variety of reimbursement arrangements depending on local market dynamics and current
hospital utilization efficiency. Most hospitals are reimbursed a fixed amount per day or reimbursed a per-case amount, per
admission, for inpatient covered services. A small percentage of hospitals, primarily rural, sole community hospitals, are
reimbursed on a discount from approved charge basis for covered services. Our “per-case” reimbursement methods utilize many of
the same attributes contained in Medicare’s Diagnosis Related Groups methodology. Hospital outpatient services are reimbursed by
fixed case rates, fee schedules or percent of approved charges. Our hospital contracts recognize unique hospital attributes, such as
academic medical centers or community hospitals, and the volume of care performed for our members. To improve predictability of
expected costs, we frequently use a multi-year contracting approach with providers. In addition, the majority of our hospital
contracts include a pay-for-performance component where reimbursement levels are linked to improved clinical performance,
patient safety and medical error reduction. 
Our provider engagement and contracting strategies are moving away from “unit price” or volume-based payment models to
payment models that align compensation with the value delivered as measured by healthcare outcomes, quality and cost. Our
Enhanced Personal Health Care program augments traditional fee-for-service with shared savings opportunities for providers when
actual healthcare costs are below projected costs and providers meet specific quality measures. The quality measures are based on
nationally accepted, credible standards (e.g., NCQA, the American Diabetes Association and the American Academy of Pediatrics)
and span preventive, acute and chronic care. We understand, however, that payment incentives alone are insufficient to create the
large-scale, system-wide transformation required to achieve meaningful impacts on cost, quality and member experience.
Accordingly, we are investing in care delivery transformation and population health management support structures to help
providers succeed under value-based payment models. This support includes our web-based population health management
technology and teams of dedicated practice consultants who work alongside providers, sharing best practices, and helping them
leverage our data to the benefit of their patients. In some of these arrangements, participating physician practices receive a per-
member, per-month clinical coordination fee to compensate them for important care management activities that occur outside of the
patient visit (e.g., purchasing an electronic health record or hiring care management nurses), all of which have been shown to
reduce healthcare costs and improve care outcomes. Since the launch of our Enhanced Personal Health Care program, we now have
arrangements with provider organizations covering 52% of our PCPs and have rolled this program out in each of the 14 states
where we operate as a licensee of the BCBSA.
Medical Management Programs
Our medical management programs include a broad array of activities that facilitate improvements in the quality of care
provided to our members and promote cost-effective medical care. These medical management activities and programs are
administered and directed by physicians and nurses. The goals of our medical management strategies are to ensure that the care
delivered to our members is supported by appropriate medical and scientific evidence, is received on a timely basis and occurs in
the most appropriate setting. The following is a general description of our medical management programs, which are available to
our members depending on the particular plan or product in which they participate:
Precertification:    A traditional medical management program involves assessment of the appropriateness of certain
hospitalizations and other medical services prior to the services being rendered. For example, precertification is used to
-13-
determine whether a set of hospital and medical services is being appropriately applied to the member’s clinical condition, in
accordance with criteria for medical necessity as that term is defined in the member’s benefits contract. All of our health plans have
implemented precertification programs for selected medical services including surgeries, major diagnostic procedures, devices,
drugs and other services to help members maximize benefits and avoid unnecessary charges or penalties. Through our American
Imaging Management, Inc. subsidiary, doing business as AIM Specialty Health (“AIM”) we promote appropriate, safe and
affordable member care in the areas of imaging, sleep disorders, cardiac testing, oncology drugs and musculoskeletal procedures.
These expanded specialty benefit management solutions leverage clinical expertise and technology to engage our provider
communities and members in more effective and efficient use of outpatient services.
Care coordination:    Another traditional medical management strategy we use is care coordination, which is based on
nationally recognized criteria developed by third-party medical specialists. With inpatient care coordination, the requirements and
intensity of services during a patient’s hospital stay are reviewed, at times by an onsite, skilled nurse professional in collaboration
with the hospital’s medical and nursing staff, in order to coordinate care and determine the most effective transition of care from the
hospital setting. In addition, continued stay cases are reviewed with physician medical directors to ensure appropriate utilization of
medical services. We also coordinate care for outpatient services to help ensure that patients with chronic conditions who receive
care from multiple physicians are able to manage the exchange of information between physicians and coordinate office visits to
their physicians.
Case management:    We have implemented a medical management strategy focused on identifying the small percentage of the
membership that will require a high level of intervention and assistance to manage their healthcare needs. Case management
identifies members who are likely to be re-admitted to the hospital through claims analysis using predictive modeling techniques,
the use of health risk assessment data, utilization management reports and referrals from a physician or one of our other programs,
such as the 24/7 NurseLine. Registered nurses, medical directors, behavioral health experts, pharmacists and other clinicians focus
on these members and help them coordinate their care through pharmacy compliance, post-hospital care, follow-up visits to see
their physician and support in their home. Increasingly, we collaborate with our providers and key health partners within the
member’s provider care team by providing actionable patient data insights, practice-coaching capabilities, technology and programs
and products that help our providers and health partners to successfully deliver the right care, at the right time, in the right place.
Formulary management:    We have developed formularies, which are selections of drugs based on clinical quality and
effectiveness. A pharmacy and therapeutics committee of physicians uses scientific and clinical evidence to ensure that our
members have access to the appropriate drug therapies and receive these therapies through proper settings. 
Medical policy:    A medical policy committee determines our national policies and guidelines for the application of medical
technologies, procedures and services. This committee is comprised of internal and external physician leaders from various
specialties and areas of the country. We also work in cooperation with academic medical centers, practicing community physicians
and medical specialty organizations. All guidelines and policies are reviewed at least once a year or as new published clinical
evidence becomes available.
Quality programs:    We are actively engaged with our hospital and physician networks to enable them to improve medical and
surgical care and achieve better outcomes for our members. We endorse, encourage and incentivize hospitals and physicians to
support national initiatives to improve the quality of clinical care and patient outcomes and to reduce medication errors and hospital
infections.
External review procedures:    We work with outside experts through a process of external review to provide our members
scientifically and clinically, evidence-based medical care. When we receive member concerns, we have formal appeals procedures
that ultimately allow coverage disputes related to medical necessity decisions under the benefits contract to be settled by
independent expert physicians.
Provider cost comparison tools: Through Estimate Your Cost, Care & Cost Finder, and other web-based tools, our members
can compare cost estimates, quality accreditation data and patient reviews for common services at contracted providers, with cost
estimates for facility, professional and ancillary services. These cost estimates bundle related services typically performed at the
time of the procedure, not just for the procedure itself. Users can review cost data for over 400 common, shop-able medical
procedures in all states. Members can also estimate out-of-pocket costs based on a member’s own benefit coverage, deductible, and
out-of-pocket maximum. We also offer information on overall facility
-14-
ratings and patient experience using trusted third-party data. We continue to work on enhancing and evolving our tools to assist
members in making informed and value-based healthcare decisions. In addition, we collaborate with an external independent
vendor to support employers wanting to purchase a consumer engagement solution with certain additional functionality.
Anthem Health Guide: Anthem Health Guide integrates the customer service experience with clinical and wellness coaching to
provide easier navigation of healthcare services for our members. Anthem Health Guide provides members with education on
benefit options and digital opportunities that fit member references, and makes recommendations for eligible clinical programs to
ensure members are connected to the most appropriate care and clinical resources. By allowing members to connect with us using
voice, click-to-chat, secure email and mobile technology, we enhance our ability to engage with our members.
Anthem Whole Health Connection: Anthem Whole Health Connection is a differentiated approach to whole person health that
connects medical, pharmacy, dental, vision, disability, behavioral health and supplemental health clinical and claims data to
proactively identify health issues earlier and engage our members with their health providers in new ways to support health, lower
costs and deliver a better healthcare experience. Anthem Whole Health Connection is included when Anthem health benefits are
combined with one or more of the Anthem pharmacy, dental, vision, life, disability, behavioral health or supplemental health
coverage plans.
Care Management Programs
We continue to expand our 360º Health suite of integrated care management programs and tools. 360º Health offers the
following programs, among others, which are available to our members depending on the particular plan or product in which they
participate, and have been proven to increase quality and reduce medical costs for our members:
ConditionCare and FutureMoms are care management and maternity management programs that serve as adjuncts to physician
care. Skilled nurse professionals, with added support from our team of dietitians, social workers, pharmacists, health educators and
other health professionals, help participants understand their condition, their doctor’s orders and how to become a better self-
manager of their condition. We also offer members infertility consultation through our SpecialOffers@Anthem program, a
comprehensive and integrated assembly of discounted health and wellness products and services from a variety of the nation’s
leading retailers.
24/7 NurseLine offers access to qualified, registered nurses anytime. This allows our members to make informed decisions
about the appropriate level of care and avoid unnecessary worry. This program also includes a referral process to the nearest urgent
care facility, a robust audio library, accessible by phone, with more than 600 health and wellness topics, as well as on-line health
education topics designed to educate members about symptoms and treatment of many common health concerns.
MyHealth Advantage utilizes integrated information systems and sophisticated data analytics to help our members improve
their compliance with evidence-based care guidelines, providing personal care notes that alert members to potential gaps in care,
enable more prudent healthcare choices, and assist in the realization of member out-of-pocket cost savings. Key opportunities are
also shared with physicians through Availity at the time of membership eligibility verification. Availity is an electronic data
interchange system that allows for the exchange of health information among providers over a secure network.
MyHealth Coach provides our members with a professional guide who helps them navigate the healthcare system and make
better decisions about their well-being. MyHealth Coach proactively reaches out to people who are at risk for potentially serious
health issues or have complex healthcare needs. Our health coaches help participants understand and manage chronic conditions,
handle any health and wellness related services they need and make smart lifestyle choices.
HealthyLifestyles helps employees transform unhealthy habits into positive ones by focusing on behaviors that can have a
positive effect on their health and their employer’s financial well-being. HealthyLifestyles programs include smoking cessation,
weight management, stress management, physical activity, and diet and nutrition.
Behavioral Health Case Management is a comprehensive program supporting a wide range of members who are impacted by
their behavioral health condition, including specialty areas such as eating disorders, anxiety, depression and® ®
-15-
substance abuse. The program assists members and their families with obtaining appropriate behavioral health treatment, offering
community resources, providing education and telephonic support, and promoting provider collaboration.
Autism Spectrum Disorder Program is a specialized case management program staffed by a dedicated team of clinicians who
have been trained on the unique challenges and needs of families with a member who has a diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder.
These clinicians provide education, information on community resources to help with care and support, guidance on the appropriate
usage of benefits, and assistance in exploring effective treatments, such as medical services, that may help the member and their
families.
Employee Assistance Programs provide 24/7 telephonic support for personal and crisis events. Members also gain access to
many resources that allow support within work and personal life by providing quick and easy access to confidential resources to
help meet the challenges of daily life. Examples of services available include counseling, referral assistance with child care, health
and wellness, financial issues, legal issues, adoption and daily living.
Healthcare Quality Initiatives
Increasingly, the healthcare industry is able to define quality healthcare based on preventive health measurements, outcomes of
care and optimal care management for chronic disease. A key to our success has been our ability to work with our network
physicians and hospitals to improve the quality and outcomes of the healthcare services provided to our members. Our ability to
promote quality medical care has been recognized by NCQA, the largest and most respected national accreditation program for
managed care health plans.
Several quality healthcare measures, including the Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set (“HEDIS”), have been
incorporated into NCQA’s accreditation processes. HEDIS measures range from preventive services, such as screening
mammography and pediatric immunization, to elements of care, including decreasing the complications of diabetes and improving
treatment for patients with heart disease. In 2020, NCQA announced that it was eliminating its then-existing status levels for health
plans and moving to CMS Star ratings in order to make accreditation ratings more transparent. Accredited plans earn ratings after
they submit HEDIS/CAHPS reporting and can advertise the rating alongside their accreditation seal. Due to the COVID-19
pandemic, NCQA did not release 2020-2021 Health Plan Ratings or Star ratings for any product line. CMS reported Star ratings for
Medicare; however, HEDIS/CAHPS utilized the scores from the 2018 measurement year.
Even though the utilization of clinical data for scoring is uncertain, we continued to support our members by promoting health
and wellness in a variety of ways. In an effort to promote the importance of preventive screenings and chronic condition
management, we conducted check-in calls to high-risk Medicaid and Medicare members at the onset of the COVID-19 pandemic to
address access to medication, adequate food supply and social isolation. Outreach was also conducted to remind our members of
overdue screenings and appointment scheduling assistance was provided, when requested by the member. Additionally, to address
our members’ concerns over potential exposure to COVID-19, we deployed home lab kits to members enabling them to complete
colon cancer screenings and manage their diabetes in the safety of their own homes.
Our wholly-owned health outcomes research subsidiary, HealthCore, Inc. (“HealthCore”) generates consistent and actionable
evidence to support decision making while helping to guide fresh initiatives for a range of stakeholders in the healthcare industry.
By leveraging a rich array of medical and pharmacy utilization data queried from administrative claims, patient surveys, medical
charts and laboratory diagnostics, among other health records, HealthCore’s multi-disciplinary research teams develop a broad
spectrum of safety, clinical research trials, effectiveness, pharmacoepidemiology, and health economics evidence. HealthCore’s real
world evidence and comparative effectiveness research, among other data, have played roles in the product planning and
development campaigns of biotechnology and pharmaceutical companies and today it lists most of the leading biologics and drug
manufacturers as clients or alliance partners.
Our AIM subsidiary supports quality by implementing clinical appropriateness and patient safety solutions for advanced
imaging procedures, cardiology, sleep medicine, medical oncology, radiation therapy, rehabilitative, certain outpatient surgical and
musculoskeletal services. These programs, based on widely accepted and evidence-based clinical guidelines, promote the most
appropriate use of clinical services to improve the quality of overall healthcare delivered to our members and members of other
health plans that are covered under AIM’s programs. To provide additional impact to its clinical appropriateness program, AIM has
also implemented a provider assessment program, OptiNet, which promotes more®
®
®
-16-
informed selection of diagnostic imaging and testing facilities by providing cost and facility information to physician offices at the
point that a procedure is ordered. We have also leveraged AIM’s provider network assessment information to proactively engage
and educate our members about imaging providers and sleep testing choices based on site capabilities and cost differences. This
program is another example of how we facilitate improvements in the quality of care provided to our members and promote cost-
effective medical care.
Pricing and Underwriting of Our Products
We price our products based on our assessment of current healthcare claim costs and emerging healthcare cost trends,
combined with charges for administrative expenses, risk and profit, including charges for the ACA taxes and fees, where
applicable. We continually review our product designs and pricing guidelines on a national and regional basis so that our products
remain competitive and consistent with our profitability goals and strategies.
Our revenue on Medicare policies is based on annual bids submitted to CMS. We base the commercial and Medicaid premiums
we charge and our Medicare bids on our estimates of future medical costs over the fixed contract period. In applying our pricing to
each employer group and customer, we aim to maintain consistent, competitive, disciplined underwriting standards. We employ our
proprietary accumulated actuarial and financial data to determine underwriting and pricing parameters for both our fully-insured
and self-funded businesses.
In most circumstances, our pricing and underwriting decisions follow a prospective rating process in which a fixed premium is
determined at the beginning of the contract period. For our fully-insured business, any deviation, favorable or unfavorable, from the
medical costs assumed in determining the premium is our responsibility. Some of our larger groups employ retrospective rating
reviews, where positive experience is partially refunded to the group, and negative experience is charged against a rate stabilization
fund established from the group’s favorable experience or charged against future favorable experience. In addition, our ACA and
government fully-insured contracts may include minimum medical loss ratio, risk adjustment, or risk corridor arrangements, which
also stabilize premiums based upon claims experience.
Our pharmacy pricing through IngenioRx is presented to market via discounts off the average wholesale price for drugs
dispensed through the retail, mail and specialty channels as well as through rebate projections. We utilize group-specific script data,
formulary, network and clinical care program selection combined with administrative expense, risk and profit guidance to set
market competitive pricing discounts and rebate projections. Pharmacy pricing guidelines guide the underwriting process and
undergo an annual external review process to ensure market competitiveness.
BCBSA Licenses
We are a party to license agreements with the BCBSA that entitle us to the exclusive, and in certain areas, non-exclusive use of
the Blue Cross and Blue Shield names and marks in assigned geographic territories. BCBSA is a national trade association of Blue
Cross and Blue Shield licensees, the primary function of which is to promote and preserve the integrity of the BCBS names and
marks, as well as provide certain coordination among the member companies. Each BCBSA licensee is an independent legal
organization and is not responsible for obligations of other BCBSA member organizations. Although we have no right to market
products and services using the BCBS names and marks outside of the states in which we are licensed to sell BCBS products, in
accordance with the subscriber settlement agreement and release (“Subscriber Settlement Agreement”) that was agreed to in 2020
by the BCBSA and Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield licensees, including us (the “Blue plans”), some large national employers with
self-funded benefits plans have a right to request a bid for insurance coverage from a second Blue plan in addition to the local Blue
plan. We are required to pay an annual license fee to the BCBSA based on enrollment and also to comply with various requirements
and restrictions regarding our operations and our use of the BCBS names and marks. These requirements and restrictions include,
among other things: minimum capital and liquidity requirements; enrollment and customer service performance requirements;
participation in programs that provide portability of membership between plans; disclosures to the BCBSA relating to enrollment
and financial conditions; disclosures as to the structure of the BCBS system in contracts with third parties and in public statements;
plan governance requirements; cybersecurity requirements; a requirement that at least 80% (or, in the case of Blue Cross of
California, substantially all) of a licensee’s annual combined local net revenue, as defined by the BCBSA, attributable to healthcare
plans and related services within its service areas must be sold, marketed, administered or underwritten under the BCBS names and
marks; a requirement that at least two-thirds of a licensee’s annual combined national net revenue, as defined by the BCBSA,
attributable to healthcare plans and related services must be sold, marketed, administered or underwritten under the BCBS names
and marks; a requirement that neither a plan nor any of its licensed affiliates may permit an entity other than a plan or
-17-
a licensed affiliate to obtain control of the plan or the licensed affiliate or to acquire a substantial portion of its assets related to
licensable services; governance requirements such as a requirement that we divide our Board of Directors into three classes serving
staggered three-year terms; a requirement that we guarantee certain contractual and financial obligations of our licensed affiliates;
and a requirement that we indemnify the BCBSA against any claims asserted against it resulting from the contractual and financial
obligations of any subsidiary that serves as a fiscal intermediary providing administrative services for Medicare Parts A and B. In
addition, a change of control or violation of the BCBSA ownership limitations on our capital stock, impending financial insolvency
or the appointment of a trustee or receiver or the commencement of any action against us seeking our dissolution could cause a
termination of our BCBSA license agreements.
We believe that we and our licensed affiliates are currently in compliance with these standards. The standards under the license
agreements may be modified in certain instances by the BCBSA. See Part I, Item 1A “Risk Factors” in this Annual Report on Form
10-K for additional details on the impact if we were not to comply with these license agreements and Note 14, “Commitments and
Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings – Blue Cross Blue Shield Antitrust Litigation” of the Notes to our
Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information on the
Subscriber Settlement Agreement.
Regulation 
General
Our operations are subject to comprehensive and detailed state, federal and international regulation throughout the jurisdictions
in which we do business. These laws and regulations, which can vary significantly from jurisdiction to jurisdiction, restrict how we
conduct our businesses and result in additional burdens and costs to us. Further, federal and state laws and regulations are subject to
amendments and changing interpretations in each jurisdiction. The application of these complex legal and regulatory requirements
to the detailed operation of our businesses creates areas of uncertainty. In addition, there are numerous proposed healthcare laws
and regulations at the federal and state levels, including single payer, Medicare for All and public option proposals, some of which
could materially adversely affect our businesses if they were to be enacted.
Supervisory agencies, including federal and state regulators and departments of health, insurance and corporation, have broad
authority to:
•grant, suspend and revoke licenses to transact business;
•regulate our products and services in great detail;
•regulate, limit, or suspend our ability to market products, including participation in Medicare and the ACA public
exchanges;
•determine through a procurement process our ability to participate in certain programs, including state Medicaid programs;
•retroactively adjust premium rates;
•monitor our solvency and reserve adequacy;
•scrutinize our investment activities on the basis of quality, diversification and other quantitative criteria; and
•impose monetary and criminal sanctions for non-compliance with regulatory requirements.
To carry out these tasks, these government entities periodically examine our operations and accounts.
The health benefits business also may be adversely impacted by court and regulatory decisions that expand or invalidate the
interpretations of existing statutes and regulations. It is uncertain whether we could recoup, through higher premiums or other
measures, the increased costs of mandated benefits or other increased costs caused by potential legislation, regulation or court
rulings. See Part I, Item 1A “Risk Factors” in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
-18-
COVID-19
Federal and state legislation has been enacted, and is likely to continue to be enacted, in response to the COVID-19 pandemic
that has had, and we expect will continue to have, a significant impact on all of our lines of business, including mandates to waive
cost-sharing on COVID-19 vaccination, testing, treatment and related services. The federal government enacted the Coronavirus
Preparedness and Response Supplemental Appropriations Act, the Families First Coronavirus Response Act and the Coronavirus
Aid, Relief and Economic Security (“CARES”) Act in March 2020, the Paycheck Protection Program and Health Care
Enhancement Act in April 2020, and the Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021 in December 2020 (the “Appropriations Act”).
These acts provide, among other things, prohibitions on prior authorization and cost-sharing for certain items and services related to
COVID-19 tests, reforms including waiving Medicare originating site restrictions for qualified providers providing telehealth
services, financial support to healthcare providers, including expansion of the Medicare accelerated payment program to all
providers receiving Medicare payments, and funding to replenish and administer small business loan programs to help small
businesses keep their workers employed and healthcare benefits covered in the group market.
Regulatory changes have also been enacted, and are likely to continue to be enacted, at the state and federal level in response
to the COVID-19 pandemic. Those changes, which could have a significant impact on health benefits, consumer eligibility for
public programs, and our cash flows, include mandated expansion of premium payment terms including the time period for which
claims can be denied for lack of payment, mandates related to prior authorizations and payment levels to providers, additional
consumer enrollment windows, and an increased ability to provide services through telehealth. We are providing extensions to
premium payment terms in certain situations and working closely with state regulators that are mandating or requesting such relief.
The Appropriations Act
The Appropriations Act contains a number of provisions that may have a material effect upon our business, including
procedures and coverage requirements related to surprise medical bills and new mandates for continuity of care for certain patients,
price comparison tools, disclosure of broker compensation and reporting on pharmacy benefits and drug costs. The various health
plan-related requirements of the Appropriations Act will go into effect on January 1, 2022, and our first report on pharmacy
benefits and drug costs due on December 27, 2021.
State Regulation of Insurance Companies and HMOs
Our insurance and HMO subsidiaries must obtain a certificate of authority and maintain that license in the jurisdictions in
which they conduct business. The National Association of Insurance Commissioners (“NAIC”) has adopted model regulations that,
where adopted by states, require expanded governance practices, risk and solvency assessment reporting and the filing of periodic
financial and operating reports. Most states have adopted these or similar measures to expand the scope of regulations relating to
corporate governance and internal control activities of HMOs and insurance companies. Health insurers and HMOs are subject to
state examination and periodic license renewal.
In addition, we are regulated as an insurance holding company and are subject to the insurance holding company acts of the
states in which our insurance company and HMO subsidiaries are domiciled. These acts contain certain reporting requirements, as
well as restrictions on transactions between an insurer or HMO and its affiliates, and may restrict the ability of our regulated
subsidiaries to pay dividends to our holding companies. These holding company laws and regulations generally require registration
with applicable state departments of insurance and the filing of reports describing capital structure, ownership, financial condition,
certain intercompany transactions, enterprise risks, corporate governance and general business operations. In addition, state
insurance holding company laws and regulations require notice or prior regulatory approval of transactions including acquisitions,
material intercompany transfers of assets, guarantees and other transactions between the regulated companies and their affiliates,
including parent holding companies. Applicable state insurance holding company acts also restrict the ability of any person to
obtain control of an insurance company or HMO without prior regulatory approval. “Control” is generally defined as the direct or
indirect power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person and is presumed to exist if a person
directly or indirectly owns or controls 10% or more of the voting securities of another person. Dispositions of control generally are
also regulated under the state insurance holding company acts.
-19-
The states of domicile of our regulated subsidiaries have statutory risk-based capital (“RBC”) requirements for health and other
insurance companies and HMOs based on the Risk-Based Capital (RBC) For Health Organizations Model Act. These RBC
requirements are intended to assess the capital adequacy of life and health insurers and HMOs, taking into account the risk
characteristics of a company’s investments and products. In general, under these laws, an insurance company or HMO must submit
a report of its RBC level to the insurance department or insurance commissioner of its state of domicile for each calendar year. The
law requires increasing degrees of regulatory oversight and intervention as a company’s RBC declines. As of December 31, 2020,
the RBC levels of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries exceeded all applicable mandatory RBC requirements. For more
information on RBC capital and additional liquidity and capital requirements for a licensee of the BCBSA, see “Management’s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations–Liquidity and Capital Resources–Risk-Based Capital,”
included in Part II, Item 7 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Ongoing Requirements and Changes Stemming from the ACA
The ACA significantly changed the United States healthcare system. While we anticipate continued efforts to invalidate,
modify, repeal or replace the ACA, either through Congress or court challenges, we expect the major portions of the ACA to
remain in place and continue to significantly impact our business operations and results of operations, including pricing, minimum
medical loss ratios (“MLRs”) and the geographies in which our products are available.
The ACA prohibits lifetime limits, certain annual limits, member cost-sharing on specified preventive benefits and pre-existing
condition exclusions. Further, the ACA implemented certain requirements for insurers, including changes to Medicare Advantage
payments and the minimum MLR provision that requires insurers to pay rebates to customers when insurers do not meet or exceed
the specified MLR thresholds. In addition, the ACA also required a number of other changes with significant effects on both federal
and state health insurance markets, including strict rules on how health insurance is rated, what benefits must be offered, the
assessment of new taxes and fees (including annual fees on health insurance companies), the creation of public exchanges for
Individuals and Small Groups, the availability of premium subsidies for qualified individuals, and expansions in eligibility for
Medicaid. Changes to our business environment are likely to continue as elected officials at the national and state levels continue to
enact, and both elected officials and candidates for election continue to propose, significant modifications to existing laws and
regulations, including changes to taxes and fees. In addition, the legal challenges regarding the ACA, including a federal district
court decision invalidating the ACA in its entirety, which was argued before the U.S. Supreme Court in November 2020 and has
been stayed pending the U.S. Supreme Court’s decision, continue to contribute to this uncertainty.
In a separate development, in April 2020, the U.S. Supreme Court ruled that the federal government is required to pay health
insurance companies for amounts owed, as calculated under the risk corridor program of the ACA. In June 2020, the U.S. Court of
Federal Claims entered a final judgment stipulating that we are entitled to reimbursement for risk corridor amounts from 2014,
2015 and 2016. At the end of December 2020, the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (“HHS”) issued guidance on
how to treat the risk corridor recoveries, which requires us to revise previously filed minimum MLR reports and issue incremental
MLR rebate payments. We recognized the net premium impact of the risk corridor recoveries in the fourth quarter of 2020. We will
continue to review and evaluate the impact of the ACA as any further developments or judicial rulings occur.
In general, the Individual market risk pool that includes public exchange markets has become less healthy since its inception in
2014 and continues to exhibit risk volatility. Based on our experience in public exchange markets to date, we have made
adjustments to our premium rates and participation footprint and continue to evaluate the performance of our public exchange
plans. In addition, insurers have faced uncertainties related to federal government funding for various ACA programs. These factors
may have a material adverse effect on our results of operations if premiums are not adequate or do not appropriately reflect the
acuity of these individuals. Any variation from our expectations regarding acuity, enrollment levels, adverse selection, or other
assumptions utilized in setting premium rates could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial position,
and cash flows.
Further, implementation of the ACA brings with it significant oversight responsibilities by health insurers that may result in
increased governmental audits, increased assertions of False Claims Act violations, and an increased risk of other litigation.
-20-
Federal regulatory agencies continue to modify regulations and guidance related to the ACA and markets more broadly. Some
of the more significant ACA rules are described below:
•The minimum MLR thresholds by line of business for the Commercial market, as defined by HHS, are as follows:
Line of Business %
Large Group 85
Small Group 80
Individual 80
New York state regulations require us to meet a more restrictive MLR threshold of 82% for both Small Group and
Individual lines of business. The minimum MLR thresholds disclosed above are based on definitions of an MLR
calculation provided by HHS, or specific states, as applicable, and differ from our calculation of “benefit expense ratio”
based on premium revenue and benefit expense as reported in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting
principles (“GAAP”). Furthermore, the definitions of the lines of business differ under the various federal and state
regulations and may not correspond to our lines of business. Definitions under the MLR regulation also impact insurers
differently depending upon their organizational structure or tax status, which could result in a competitive advantage to
some insurance providers that may not be available to us, resulting in an uneven playing field in the industry.
The ACA also imposed a separate minimum MLR threshold of 85% for Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D
prescription drug plans (“Medicare Part D plans”). Medicare Advantage or Medicare Part D plans that do not meet this
threshold will have to pay a minimum MLR rebate. If a plan’s MLR is below 85% for three consecutive years, enrollment
will be restricted. A Medicare Advantage or Medicare Part D plan contract will be terminated if the plan’s MLR is below
85% for five consecutive years.
In addition, state Medicaid programs are required to set managed care capitation rates such that a minimum 85% MLR is
projected to be achieved; however, states are not required to collect remittances if the minimum MLR is not achieved.
Approximately 54.8% and 20.2% of our premium revenue and medical membership, respectively, were subject to the
minimum MLR regulations as of and for the year ended December 31, 2020. Approximately 58.9% and 20.8% of our
premium revenue and medical membership, respectively, were subject to the minimum MLR regulations as of and for the
year ended December 31, 2019.
•The ACA created an incentive payment program for Medicare Advantage plans. CMS developed the Medicare Advantage
Star ratings system, which awards between 1.0 and 5.0 stars to Medicare Advantage plans based on performance in several
categories, including quality of care and customer service. The Star ratings are used by CMS to award quality-based bonus
payments to plans that receive a rating of 4.0 or higher. The methodology and measures included in the Star ratings system
can be modified by CMS annually. As of December 31, 2020, all of our Medicare Advantage plans have received a rating
of 3.0 or higher.
•Regulations require premium rate increases to be reviewed for Small Group and Individual products above specified
thresholds, and may be adjusted from time to time. The regulations provide for state insurance regulators to conduct the
reviews, except for cases where a state does not have an “effective” rate review program or in federal enforcement states,
in which cases HHS will conduct the reviews for any rate increase.
•The ACA precludes health insurers from using health status and gender in the determination of the insurance premium.
•The ACA imposed an annual Health Insurance Provider Fee (“HIP Fee”) on health insurers that write certain types of
health insurance on U.S. risks, which has been permanently eliminated effective January 1, 2021. The HIP Fee was
allocated to health insurers based on the ratio of the amount of an insurer’s net premium revenues written during the
preceding calendar year to the amount of health insurance premium for all U.S. health risk for those certain lines of
business written during the preceding calendar year. The HIP Fee was non-deductible for federal income tax purposes. Our
affected products were priced to cover the increased selling, general and administrative and income
-21-
tax expenses associated with the HIP Fee when it was in effect. The total amount due from allocations to health insurers
was $15.5 billion for 2020 and was suspended for 2019.
•Medicare Advantage reimbursement rates will not increase as much as they would otherwise due to the payment formula
promulgated by the ACA that continues to impact reimbursements. We also expect further and ongoing regulatory
guidance on a number of issues related to Medicare, including evolving methodology for ratings and quality bonus
payments. CMS is also proposing changes to its program that audits data submitted under the risk adjustment programs in
a way that would increase financial recoveries from plans.
Drug Benefit and Pharmacy Benefit Manager Regulation
Pharmacy benefit managers are regulated at both the federal and state levels and must comply with federal and state statutes
and regulations governing labeling, packaging, advertising and adulteration of prescription drugs, dispensing of controlled
substances, and licensing. In recent years the federal government has banned certain business practices, including “gag clauses,”
which prohibited pharmacists from informing patients when a lower cost drug was available as a substitute, and “clawbacks,”
which occurred when pharmacy benefit managers sought to recoup the difference between the reimbursed cost of the drug and the
patient’s copay and the drug itself was less expensive than the copay paid by the patient. Regulation in the states varies dramatically
and ranges from licensure of PBMs as third-party administrators, licensure specifically as a pharmacy benefit manager, and
licensure accompanied by additional disclosures and limitations of business practices to varying degrees. The NAIC is working on
a PBM model law that, if adopted widely, could result in a more standardized approach to PBM regulation in the states in the
future. However, in December 2020, the U.S. Supreme Court let stand an Arkansas law regulating PBMs, which could be a
precursor to greater state regulation of PBMs in the future.
A number of proposals are being considered at the federal and state levels that would increase regulation of drug benefits and
pharmacy benefit managers. Such proposals under consideration include (1) regulation of rebates from drug manufacturers that
would require rebate dollars to be applied at the point-of-sale, (2) federal policy changes to set the prices for a subset of drugs
covered under the Medicare program, (3) reforms to the Medicare drug benefit, such as beneficiary cost-sharing changes that aim to
lower consumer costs, (4) attempts at both the federal and state levels to ban the use of spread pricing contracts in both the
Commercial and Medicaid markets, and (5) electronic prior authorizations of drugs. These reforms have the potential to have broad
impacts on our PBM business and could materially adversely affect our business if they are enacted.
Privacy, Confidentiality and Data Standards Regulation
The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (“HIPAA”) and the administrative simplification
provisions of HIPAA impose a number of requirements on covered entities (including insurers, HMOs, group health plans,
providers and clearinghouses) and their business associates relating to the use, disclosure and safeguarding of protected health
information. These requirements include uniform standards of common electronic healthcare transactions; privacy and security
regulations; and unique identifier rules for employers, health plans and providers.
Also, the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health (“HITECH”) Act provisions of the American
Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 and corresponding implementing regulations have imposed additional requirements on the
use and disclosure of protected health information such as additional breach notification and reporting requirements, contracting
requirements for HIPAA business associate agreements, strengthened enforcement mechanisms and increased penalties for HIPAA
violations. Federal consumer protection laws may also apply in some instances to privacy and security practices related to
personally identifiable information.
The federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act generally places restrictions on the disclosure of non-public information to non-affiliated
third parties, and requires financial institutions, including insurers, to provide customers with notice regarding how their non-public
personal information is used, including an opportunity to “opt out” of certain disclosures. State departments of insurance and
certain federal agencies adopted implementing regulations as required by federal law.
The Cybersecurity Information Sharing Act of 2015 encourages organizations to share cyber threat indicators with the federal
government and, among other things, directed HHS to develop a set of voluntary cybersecurity best practices for organizations in
the healthcare industry.
-22-
In addition, public exchanges are required to adhere to privacy and security standards with respect to personally identifiable
information and to impose privacy and security standards that are at least as protective as those the public exchange has
implemented for itself on insurers offering plans through the public exchanges and their designated downstream entities, including
pharmacy benefit managers and other business associates. These standards may differ from, and be more stringent than, HIPAA.
Furthermore, states have begun enacting more comprehensive privacy laws and regulations addressing consumer rights to data
protection or transparency that may affect our privacy and security practices, such as state laws like the California Consumer
Privacy Act that govern the use, disclosure and protection of member data and impose additional breach notification requirements.
State consumer protection laws may also apply to privacy and security practices related to personally identifiable information,
including information related to consumers and care providers. Complying with conflicting cybersecurity regulations and varying
enforcement philosophies, which may differ from state to state, requires significant resources and may materially and adversely
affect our ability to standardize our products and services across state lines.
Federal regulations have been finalized in the following areas that will materially impact our operations:
•Federal regulations on data interoperability that will require claims data to be made available to third parties unaffiliated
with Anthem; and
•Federal regulations requiring hospitals and health insurers to publish negotiated prices for services.
Federal regulations have also been proposed that will expand the final regulation on data interoperability to require health
insurers to build new application programming interfaces to afford patients access to their health information and require electronic
prior authorizations for commercial Qualified Health Plans in the federal exchange as well as Medicaid and CHIP fee-for-service
and managed care organizations. These regulations are expected to materially impact our operations if finalized.
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974
The provision of services to certain employee welfare benefit plans is subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act
of 1974, as amended (“ERISA”) a complex set of laws and regulations subject to interpretation and enforcement by the Internal
Revenue Service (“IRS”) and the Department of Labor. ERISA regulates certain aspects of the relationships between us, the
employers that maintain employee welfare benefit plans subject to ERISA and participants in such plans. Some of our
administrative services and other activities may also be subject to regulation under ERISA. In addition, certain states require
licensure or registration of companies providing third-party claims administration services for benefit plans. We provide a variety
of products and services to employee welfare benefit plans that are covered by ERISA. Plans subject to ERISA can also be subject
to state laws, and the question of whether and to what extent ERISA preempts a state law has been, and will continue to be,
interpreted by many courts.
Guaranty Fund Assessments
Under insolvency or guaranty association laws in most states, insurance companies and HMOs can be assessed for amounts
paid by guaranty funds for policyholder losses incurred when an insurance company or HMO becomes insolvent. Most state
insolvency or guaranty association laws currently provide for assessments based upon the amount of premiums received on
insurance underwritten within such state (with a minimum amount payable even if no premium is received). Under many of these
guaranty association laws, assessments are made retrospectively. Some states permit insurers or HMOs to recover assessments paid
through full or partial premium tax offsets or through future policyholder surcharges. The amount and timing of any future
assessments cannot be predicted with certainty; however, future assessments are likely to occur.
Human Capital
At Anthem, it starts with our culture, and our associates are critical to fulfilling our purpose of improving the health of
humanity. As of December 31, 2020, we had approximately 83,400 associates. We are working to build a high performance culture
that enhances our ability to deliver on our commitments and guides us to address the challenges of today. We believe that our
culture allows us to attract and retain talented and experienced individuals to support the communities we serve. Our
-23-
associates actively participate through online feedback tools and we leverage these associate feedback tools and engagement
surveys to monitor and take action on responses.
Inclusion & Diversity
The diversity of our associates is central to achieving key strategies and improving performance. We believe a diverse and
inclusive workforce enables a deeper connection with members and drives greater business results. We honor the diversity of our
associates—in gender, race/ethnicity, age, gender identity, sexual orientation, socio-economic status, language, nationality, abilities
and life experiences. As of December 31, 2020, our U.S. associate population was approximately 76% female and 48% ethnically
diverse.
Talent Development
Growing and developing our talent internally is key to our succession plans and our ability to lead at our best every day. To
inspire a high-performance culture and promote talent excellence, we offer individual, career and leadership development
opportunities, encouraging associates to continually learn and grow. We offer various instructor-led and virtual instructor-led
programs and maintain a vast curriculum of relevant, on-demand learning and development resources.
Health & Wellbeing
We have the privilege of touching the lives of millions of people each day, and for us, this starts with the health of our own
associates. To improve the health and wellbeing of our associates, we offer a comprehensive compensation package, including
competitive salaries, a 401(k) plan and medical, dental, vision and disability coverage. In addition, we offer our associates wellness
and behavioral programs and tools to help them get and stay healthy and more easily manage their work and personal lives.
COVID-19 Response
We moved swiftly in our response to the COVID-19 pandemic to promote the safety of our associates and best serve our
members and communities. In March of 2020, we implemented business continuity plans, transitioning the majority of our
associates to remote work environments, while maintaining service operations. We have provided our associates with additional
benefits, support and resources to help them manage the complexities of working from home and handling caregiver and family
needs. In addition to their current benefits, we are providing up to 80 hours of COVID-related additional paid time off for
associates to use when they are unable to work due to quarantine or illness or to provide care to a family member, and we provided
a one-month premium holiday and added an extra paid day off as a “Wellness Holiday” on December 31, 2020. In addition to our
associate assistance program, we provide materials and behavioral health resources to our associates that address important
emotional health issues.
Available Information
We are a large accelerated filer (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange
Act”)) and are required, pursuant to Item 101 of Regulation S-K, to provide certain information regarding our website and the
availability of certain documents filed with or furnished to the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”). The SEC
maintains a website that contains reports, proxy and information statements and other information regarding issuers at
www.sec.gov. Our website is www.antheminc.com. We have included our website address throughout this Annual Report on Form
10-K as a textual reference only. The information contained on, or accessible through, our website is not incorporated into this
Annual Report on Form 10-K. We make available, free of charge, by mail or through our website, our Annual Report on Form 10-
K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K, and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to
Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Exchange Act as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file such material with or
furnish it to the SEC. We also include on our website our Corporate Governance Guidelines, our Code of Conduct and the charter
of each standing committee of our Board of Directors. In addition, we intend to disclose on our website any amendments to, or
waivers from, our Code of Conduct that are required to be publicly disclosed pursuant to rules of the SEC and the New York Stock
Exchange (“NYSE”). Anthem, Inc. is an Indiana corporation incorporated on July 17, 2001.
-24-
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS.
In evaluating our business, the risks described below, as well as the other information contained in this Annual Report on Form
10-K, should be carefully considered. Any one or more of such risks could materially and adversely affect our business, financial
condition, results of operations and stock price and could cause our actual results of operations and financial condition to vary
materially from past or anticipated future results of operations and financial condition. Additional risks and uncertainties not
presently known to us or that we currently believe to be immaterial may also adversely affect us.
BUSINESS RISKS
The outbreak of the COVID-19 pandemic and measures taken to prevent its spread are adversely affecting our business in a
number of ways, and we are unable to predict the full extent of those impacts on our business, cash flows, financial
condition and results of operations, but the impact could be material.
The COVID-19 pandemic is evolving, and the impact of COVID-19, and the actions taken to contain its spread or address its
impact, could have a material adverse effect on our operations and financial results in the future. We continue to closely monitor
developments related to the COVID-19 pandemic to assess its ongoing impact on our business. The extent of this impact will
depend on future developments, which are highly uncertain and cannot be predicted at this time, including, but not limited to, the
transmission rate, duration and spread of the outbreak, its severity, the extent and effectiveness of the actions taken to contain the
spread of the virus and address its impacts, and how quickly and to what extent normal economic and operating conditions can
resume. Factors that could negatively impact our ability to operate successfully during or following the COVID-19 pandemic, or
that could otherwise significantly adversely impact and disrupt our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of
operations include, but are not limited to, the following:
•Continued increases in healthcare costs due to higher utilization rates of medical facilities and services, medical expenses
and other increases in associated hospital and pharmaceutical costs. We continue to offer our members expanded benefit
coverage, such as providing full coverage for COVID-19 testing and treatment and governmental action has required, and
may continue to require, us to provide additional coverage.
•Decreased predictability of Medicare and Medicaid rates due to changes in utilization of medical facilities and services,
medical expenses, and other costs as a result of the impact of COVID-19. We experienced rate adjustments from certain
state Medicaid regulators in 2020 in response to decreased utilization of medical facilities and services, and we may
experience further adjustments in the future with regard to current and prior year rates.
•Increased estimation uncertainty on our claims liability due to the impact of COVID-19 on healthcare utilization and
medical claims submission.
•A reduction in enrollment in our health benefits and PBM products and services, or a continued change in membership
mix to less profitable lines of business, as a result of reductions in workforce by existing customers and other impacts of
an economic downturn.
•Cash flow volatility or shortfalls caused by an increase in delayed, delinquent or non-collectable payments from customers
and government payers.
•Reductions in our operating effectiveness as our employees work from home or otherwise are impacted by COVID-19.
The majority of our workforce continues to work remotely in an effort to mitigate the spread of COVID-19, which may
exacerbate certain risks to our business, including an increased demand for information technology resources, increased
risk of phishing and other cybersecurity attacks, and increased risk of unauthorized dissemination of sensitive personal
information or proprietary or confidential information about us, our members or other third parties.
•Disruptions in our normal business operations due to disruptions in public and private infrastructure, including
communications, financial services and supply chains.
•Loss of functionality due to the disruption of services provided to us by third-party vendors, including as a result of
financial difficulties experienced by such vendors and the impact of vendor employees working from home or otherwise
being impacted by COVID-19.
•A decrease in the value of our investments, which may result in losses charged to income.
•Increased cost of capital and limited ability to access the capital markets due to disruption and volatility in global financial
markets or a downgrade in our credit rating.
-25-
If we fail to appropriately predict, price for and manage healthcare costs, the profitability of our products could decline,
which could materially adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Our profitability depends in large part on accurately predicting and pricing healthcare costs and on our ability to manage future
healthcare costs through medical management, product design, negotiation of favorable provider contracts and underwriting
criteria. Total healthcare costs are affected by the number of individual services rendered, the cost of each service and the type of
service rendered. Numerous factors affecting the cost of healthcare may adversely affect our ability to predict and manage
healthcare costs, as well as our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations. These factors include, among
others, changes in healthcare practices, demographic characteristics including the aging population, medical cost inflation, the
introduction of new technologies, drugs and treatments, increased cost of individual services, increases in the cost and number of
prescription drugs, clusters of high cost cases, increased use of services, including due to natural catastrophes or other large-scale
medical emergencies, epidemics or pandemics such as COVID-19, new treatment guidelines, new mandated benefits (such as the
expansion of essential benefits coverage) and changes to other regulations impacting our business, such as the health plan price
transparency regulations issued in October 2020 by the U.S. Departments of Health and Human Services, Labor and Treasury (the
“Health Plan Transparency Rule”) and the Appropriations Act.
Relatively small differences between predicted and actual medical costs or utilization rates as a percentage of premium
revenues can result in significant changes in our results of operations. Generally, our premiums on Commercial policies and
Medicaid contracts are fixed for a 12-month period and are determined several months prior to the commencement of the premium
period. Our revenue on Medicare policies is based on bids submitted to CMS six months prior to the start of the contract year.
Accordingly, the costs we incur in excess of our benefit cost projections generally are not recovered in the contract year through
higher premiums. Existing Medicaid contract rates are often established by the applicable state, and our actual costs may exceed
those rates. Although we base our Commercial premiums, our Medicare and Medicaid bids, and our acceptance of state-established
Medicaid rates on our estimates of future medical costs over the fixed contract period, many factors, including those discussed
above, may cause actual costs to exceed those estimated and reflected in premiums and bids.
Although federal and state premium and risk adjustment mechanisms could help offset healthcare benefit costs in excess of our
projections if our assumptions utilized in setting our premium rates are significantly different than actual results, our results of
operations and financial condition could still be adversely affected. The reserves that we establish for health insurance policy
benefits and other contractual rights and benefits are based upon assumptions concerning a number of factors, including trends in
healthcare costs, expenses, general economic conditions and other factors. To the extent the actual claims experience is unfavorable
as compared to our underlying assumptions, our incurred losses would increase and future earnings could be adversely affected.
In addition to the challenge of managing healthcare costs, we face pressure to contain premium rates. Our customers may
renegotiate their contracts to seek to contain their costs or may move to a competitor to obtain more favorable premiums. Further,
federal and state regulatory agencies may restrict or prevent entirely our ability to implement changes in premium rates. A
limitation on our ability to increase or maintain our premium or reimbursement levels or a significant loss of membership resulting
from our need to increase or maintain premium or reimbursement levels could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial
condition and results of operations.
A significant reduction in the enrollment in our health benefits programs or PBM products or services, particularly in
states where we have large regional concentrations, could have an adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial
condition and results of operations.
A significant reduction in the number of enrollees in our health benefits programs or PBM products or services could adversely
affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations. Factors that could contribute to a reduction in
enrollment include: reductions in workforce by existing customers; a general economic upturn that results in fewer individuals
being eligible for Medicaid programs; a general economic downturn that results in business failures and high unemployment rates,
as has been experienced as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic; employers no longer offering certain healthcare coverage as an
employee benefit or electing to offer coverage on a voluntary, employee-funded basis; participation on public exchanges; federal
and state regulatory changes; failure to obtain new customers or retain existing
-26-
customers; premium increases and benefit changes; our exit from a specific market; negative publicity and news coverage; and
failure to attain or maintain nationally recognized accreditations.
The states in which we operate that have the largest concentrations of revenues include California, Florida, Georgia, Indiana,
New York, Ohio, Texas and Virginia. Due to this concentration of business in these states, we are exposed to potential losses
resulting from the risk of state-specific or regional economic downturns impacting these states. If any such negative economic
conditions do not improve, we may experience a reduction in existing and new business, which could have a material adverse effect
on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
A cyber attack or other privacy or data security incident could result in an unauthorized disclosure of sensitive or
confidential information, cause a loss of data, disrupt a large amount of our operations, give rise to remediation or other
expenses, expose us to liability under federal and state laws, and subject us to litigation and investigations, which could have
an adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
As part of our normal operations, we collect, process and retain certain sensitive and confidential information. We are subject
to a variety of continuously evolving federal, state and international laws and rules regarding the use and disclosure of certain
sensitive or confidential information, including HIPAA, the HITECH Act, the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act and numerous state laws
governing personal information. Our facilities and systems, and those of our third-party service providers, are regularly the target
of, and may be vulnerable to, cyber attacks, security breaches, acts of vandalism, computer viruses, misplaced or lost data,
programming and/or human errors or other threats.
We have been, and may in the future be subject to litigation and governmental investigations related to cyber attacks and
security breaches, which could divert the attention of management from the operation of our business, result in reputational damage
and have a material adverse impact on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations. While we have
contingency plans and insurance coverage for potential liabilities of this nature, they may not be sufficient to cover all claims and
liabilities.
We cannot ensure that we will be able to identify, prevent or contain the effects of cyber attacks or other cybersecurity risks
that bypass our security measures or disrupt our information technology systems or business. We have security technologies,
processes and procedures in place to protect against cybersecurity risks and security breaches. However, hardware, software or
applications we develop or procure from third parties may contain defects in design, manufacturer defects or other problems that
could unexpectedly compromise information security. In addition, because the techniques used to obtain unauthorized access,
disable or degrade service or sabotage systems change frequently, are becoming increasingly sophisticated, and may not
immediately produce signs of intrusion, we may be unable to anticipate these techniques, timely discover or counter them or
implement adequate preventative measures. Viruses, worms or other malicious software programs may be used to attack our
systems or otherwise exploit any security vulnerabilities, and such security attacks may cause system disruptions or shutdowns, or
may cause personal information or proprietary or confidential information to be misappropriated or compromised. As a result,
cybersecurity and the continued development and enhancement of our controls, processes and practices designed to protect our
systems, computers, software, data and networks from attack, damage and unauthorized access remain a priority for us.
Noncompliance with any privacy or security laws and regulations, or any security breach, cyber attack or cybersecurity breach,
and any incident involving the misappropriation, loss or other unauthorized disclosure or use of, or access to, sensitive or
confidential information, whether by us or by one of our third-party service providers, could require us to expend significant
resources to continue to modify or enhance our protective measures and to remediate any damage. In addition, this could negatively
affect our operations, cause system disruptions, damage our reputation, cause membership losses and contract breaches, and could
also result in regulatory enforcement actions, material fines and penalties, litigation or other actions that could have a material
adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
There are various risks associated with participating in Medicaid and Medicare programs, including dependence upon
government funding and the timing of payments, compliance with government contracts and increased regulatory
oversight.
We contract with various federal and state agencies, including CMS, to provide managed healthcare services, such as Medicare
Advantage, Medicare Part D, Medicare Supplement, Medicaid, TANF, SPD, LTSS, CHIP, ACA-related Medicaid expansion
programs and various specialty programs. We also provide various administrative services for several other entities
-27-
offering medical and/or prescription drug plans to their Medicaid or Medicare eligible members through our affiliated companies,
and we offer employer group waiver plans which provide medical and/or prescription drug coverage to retirees. We are also
participating in programs in several states for the care of dual-eligible members. Regulatory reform initiatives or changes in
existing laws or regulations applicable to these programs, or their interpretations, are difficult to predict and could have a material
adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Revenues from the Medicare and Medicaid programs are dependent, in whole or in part, upon annual funding from the federal
government and/or applicable state governments, and base premium rates paid by each state or federal agency differ depending
upon a combination of factors such as defined upper payment limits, a member’s health status, age, gender, county or region,
benefit mix, member eligibility category and risk scores. Future rates may be affected by continued government efforts to contain
costs as well as federal and state budgetary constraints, and certain state contracts are subject to cancellation in the event of the
unavailability of state funds. Additionally, ongoing CMS system changes related to the data it uses to calculate risk scores in the
Medicare Advantage program may impact our federal funding. If the federal government or any state in which we operate were to
decrease rates paid to us, pay us less than the amount necessary to keep pace with our cost trends, cancel our contracts retroactively
or seek an adjustment to previously negotiated rates, it could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial
condition and results of operations. In addition, various states’ MMPs are still subject to uncertainty surrounding payment rates and
other requirements, which could affect where we seek to participate in these programs. An unexpected reduction in payments,
inadequate government funding or significantly delayed payments for these programs may adversely affect our business, cash
flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Other potential risks associated with Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D plans include increased medical or
pharmaceutical costs, data corrections identified as a result of ongoing auditing and monitoring activities, potential uncollectability
of receivables resulting from processing and/or verifying enrollment, inadequacy of underwriting assumptions, inability to receive
and process correct information (including inability due to systems issues by the federal government, the applicable state
government or us), uncollectability of premiums from members, and limited enrollment periods. Actual results may be materially
different than our assumptions and estimates and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and
results of operations. Finally, there is the possibility that the Medicare Advantage program could be significantly impacted by any
future modification, repeal or replacement of the ACA.
Our contracts with CMS and state governmental agencies contain certain provisions regarding data submission, risk
adjustment, provider network maintenance, quality measures, claims payment, encounter data, continuity of care, call center
performance and other requirements specific to federal and state program regulations. We have been subject in the past, and may
again be in the future, to administrative actions, fines, penalties, liquidated damages or retrospective adjustments in payments made
to our health plans as a result of a failure to comply with those requirements, which has impacted and in the future could impact our
profitability. Due to decreased utilization of medical facilities and services as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic, we experienced
retroactive rate adjustments by certain state Medicaid agencies, and rate adjustments may continue in the future. As members have
accessed care during the COVID-19 pandemic, we have experienced increased difficulty obtaining provider information required
by CMS and state governmental agencies and, as a result, may have difficulty meeting these quality measures. In addition, we
could be required to file a corrective plan of action with additional penalties for noncompliance, which could have a negative
impact on future membership enrollment levels. Further, our existing CMS or state Medicaid contracts have not always been
renewed, we have not always been awarded new contracts as a result of the competitive procurement process, and in some cases we
have lost members under existing contracts as a result of a post-award challenge, each of which could take place again in the future
and have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Further, the Star Rating System utilized by CMS to evaluate Medicare Advantage Plans may have a significant effect on our
revenue, as higher-rated plans tend to experience increased enrollment and plans with a Star rating of 4.0 or higher are eligible for
quality-based bonus payments and can market to and enroll members year-round. If we do not maintain or continue to improve our
Star ratings, fail to meet or exceed our competitors’ Star ratings, or if quality-based bonus payments are reduced or eliminated, we
may experience a negative impact on our revenues and the benefits that our plans can offer, which could materially and adversely
affect the marketability of our plans, our membership levels, results of operations, financial condition and cash flows. Similarly, if
we fail to meet or exceed any performance standards imposed by state Medicaid programs in which we participate, we may not
receive performance-based bonus payments or may incur penalties.
-28-
In addition, our failure to comply with federal and state healthcare laws and regulations applicable to our participation in
Medicaid and Medicare programs, including those directed at preventing fraud, abuse and discrimination in government-funded
programs, could result in investigations, litigation, fines, restrictions on, or exclusions from, program participation, or the
imposition of corporate integrity agreements or other agreements with a federal or state governmental agency, any of which could
adversely impact our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
We are periodically subject to government audits, including CMS Risk Adjustment Data Validation (“RADV”) audits of our
Medicare Advantage Plans to validate diagnostic data, patient claims and financial reporting, and audits of our Medicare Part D
plans by the Medicare Part D Recovery Audit Contractor (“RAC”) as well as state Medicaid RAC programs authorized by the
ACA. These audits could result in significant adjustments in payments made to our health plans, which could adversely affect our
financial condition and results of operations. If we fail to report and correct errors discovered through our own auditing procedures
or during a RADV or RAC audit, or otherwise fail to comply with applicable laws and regulations, we could be subject to fines,
civil penalties or other sanctions which could have a material adverse effect on our ability to participate in these programs, and on
our financial condition, cash flows and results of operations.
Our Medicare and Medicaid contracts are also subject to various MLR rules, including minimum MLR thresholds, rebate
requirements and audits, which could adversely affect our membership and revenues if any of our state Medicare or Medicaid plans
do not meet an applicable minimum MLR threshold. If a Medicare Advantage, MMP or Medicare Part D contract pays minimum
MLR rebates for three consecutive years, it will become ineligible to participate in open enrollment. If a Medicare Advantage or
Medicare Part D contract pays such rebates for five consecutive years, it will be terminated by CMS.
A change in our healthcare product mix may impact our profitability.
Our healthcare products that involve greater potential risk generally tend to be more profitable than administrative services
products and those healthcare products where the employer groups assume the underwriting risks. Individuals and small employer
groups are more likely to purchase our higher-risk healthcare products because such purchasers are generally unable or unwilling to
bear greater liability for healthcare expenditures. Typically, government-sponsored programs also involve our higher-risk healthcare
products. A shift of enrollees from more profitable products to less profitable products could have a material adverse effect on our
cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
If we fail to develop and maintain satisfactory relationships with hospitals, physicians, PBM service providers and other
healthcare providers, our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations may be adversely affected.
Our profitability is dependent in part upon our ability to contract on favorable terms with hospitals, physicians, PBM service
providers and supply chain partners and other healthcare providers. Physicians, hospitals and other healthcare providers may elect
not to contract with us, and the failure to secure or maintain cost-effective healthcare provider contracts on competitive terms may
result in a loss of membership or higher medical costs, which could adversely affect our business. In addition, consolidation among
healthcare providers, ACO practice management companies, and other organizational structures that physicians, hospitals and other
care providers choose, as well as the ability of larger employers to contract directly with providers, may change the way that these
providers interact with us and may change the competitive landscape. Such organizations or groups of physicians may compete
directly with us, which may impact our relationship with these providers or affect the way that we price our products and estimate
our costs and may require us to incur costs to change our operations, which could adversely affect our business, cash flows,
financial condition and results of operations. In addition, price transparency initiatives, such as the Health Plan Transparency Rule,
may impact our ability to obtain or maintain favorable contract terms. For example, beginning in 2021, hospitals will be required to
publish online payer-specific negotiated charges for each item or services the hospital provides.
Our inability to contract with providers, or if providers attempt to use their market position to negotiate more favorable
contracts or place us at a competitive disadvantage, or the inability of providers to provide adequate care, could adversely affect our
business. In addition, we do not have contracts with all providers that render services to our members and, as a result, may not have
a pre-established agreement about the amount of compensation those out-of-network providers will accept for the services they
render, which can result in significant litigation or arbitration proceedings, or provider attempts to obtain payment from our
members for the difference between the amount we have paid and the amount they have charged.
-29-
We are dependent on the success of our relationships with third parties for various services and functions.
We contract with various third parties to perform certain functions and services and provide us with certain information
technology systems. Certain of these third parties provide us with significant portions of our business infrastructure and operating
requirements. For example, a single vendor provides us with a wide range of technology infrastructure services, including end user
(help desk and field support), data center, mainframe, storage and database services, cloud infrastructure and multi-cloud
management services, and we are subject to the risks of any operational failure, termination or other restraints in this arrangement.
We could become overly dependent on key vendors, which could cause us to lose core competencies. A termination of our
agreements with, or disruption in the performance of, one or more of these service providers could result in service disruptions or
unavailability, reduced service quality and effectiveness, increased or duplicative costs or an inability to meet our obligations to our
customers. In addition, we may also have to seek alternative service providers, which may be unavailable or only available on less
favorable contract terms. Any of these outcomes could adversely affect our business, reputation, cash flows, financial condition and
operating results.
Our PBM services business in particular would be adversely affected if we are unable to contract on favorable terms with third-
party vendors, including pharmaceutical manufacturers. We delegate certain PBM administrative functions, such as claims
processing and prescription fulfillment, to CVS Health pursuant to the CVS PBM Agreement. If CVS Health fails to provide PBM
services as contractually required, we may not be able to meet the full demands of our customers, which could have a material
adverse effect on our business, reputation and results of operations. For additional information on the CVS PBM Agreement, see
“Business — Product and Service Descriptions,” in Part I, Item 1 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
The failure to effectively maintain and upgrade our information systems could adversely affect our business.
Our business depends significantly on effective information systems, and we have many different information systems for our
various businesses, including those that we have acquired as a result of our merger and acquisition activities. Our information
systems require an ongoing commitment of significant resources to maintain and enhance existing systems and develop new
systems in order to keep pace with continuing changes in information processing technology, emerging cybersecurity risks and
threats, changing customer preferences, evolving industry and regulatory standards and legal requirements, including as a result of
the ACA, the Health Plan Transparency Rule, the Appropriations Act and proposed federal data interoperability regulations. In
addition, we may from time to time obtain significant portions of our systems-related or other services or facilities from
independent third parties, which may make our operations vulnerable if such third parties fail to perform adequately.
Failure to adequately implement and maintain effective and efficient information systems with sufficiently advanced
technological capabilities, or our failure to efficiently and effectively consolidate our information systems to eliminate redundant or
obsolete applications, could result in competitive and cost disadvantages to us compared to our competitors, and a diversion of
management’s time and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If the
information we rely upon to run our business were found to be inaccurate or unreliable or if we fail to adequately maintain our
information systems and data integrity effectively, we could experience problems in determining medical cost estimates and
establishing appropriate pricing and reserves, have disputes with customers and providers, face regulatory problems, including
sanctions and penalties, incur increases in operating expenses or suffer other adverse consequences, including a decrease in
membership.
Large-scale medical emergencies may have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and
results of operations.
Natural disasters, war, terrorism, political events, global climate change and other similar occurrences could create large-scale
medical emergencies or otherwise have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of
operations. Large-scale medical emergencies can take many forms and can cause widespread illness and death and have other far-
reaching impact. For example, the ongoing COVID-19 global pandemic has caused illness, deaths, quarantines, business and school
shutdowns, reductions in business activity, travel and financial transactions, unemployment, labor shortages, supply chain
interruptions and overall economic and financial market instability. In addition, federal and state law enforcement officials have
issued warnings about potential terrorist activity involving biological and other weapons, and natural disasters such as hurricanes
and the potential for a widespread pandemic of influenza or other illness coupled with the lack of availability of appropriate
preventative medicines could have a significant impact on the health of the population
-30-
of widespread areas. If the United States were to experience widespread bioterrorism or other attacks, large-scale natural disasters
in our concentrated coverage areas or an epidemic or pandemic such as the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, our covered medical
expenses could rise, our operations could be interrupted and we could experience a material adverse effect on our business, cash
flows, financial condition and results of operations or, in the event of extreme circumstances, our viability could be threatened.
Furthermore, global climate change could result in certain types of natural disasters occurring more frequently or with more intense
effects, and may have a long-term effect on general economic conditions and the healthcare or pharmacy industry in particular,
which could adversely affect our business and financial results. For additional information, see the risk factor above describing the
impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
LEGAL, REGULATORY AND PUBLIC POLICY RISKS
We are subject to significant government regulation, and changes or proposed changes in the regulation of our business by
federal and state regulators may adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations and
the market price of our securities.
We are subject to significant state and federal regulation associated with many aspects of our business, including, but not
limited to, licensing, premiums, marketing activities, provider contracting, access and payment standards, and corporate governance
and financial reporting matters, as described in greater detail in Part I, Item 1 “Business—Regulation” in this Annual Report on
Form 10-K. Further, the integration into our business of entities that we acquire, or the expansion of our business into new areas,
may affect the way in which existing laws and rules apply to us, including by subjecting us to laws and rules that did not previously
apply to us.
Changes in existing laws, rules and regulatory interpretation or future laws, rules, regulatory interpretations or judgments could
force us to change how we conduct our business, affect the products we offer (and where we offer them), restrict revenue and
enrollment growth, increase our costs, including operating, healthcare technology and administrative costs, restrict our ability to
obtain new product approvals and implement changes in premium rates and require enhancements to our compliance infrastructure
and internal controls environment, which could adversely impact our business and results of operations. In addition, legislative
and/or regulatory policies or proposals that seek to manage the healthcare industry or otherwise impact our business may cause the
market price of our securities to decrease, even if such policies or proposals never become effective.
We are required to obtain and maintain insurance and other regulatory approvals to market certain of our products, to increase
prices for certain regulated products and to consummate some of our acquisitions and dispositions. Delays in obtaining or failure to
obtain or maintain these approvals, as well as future regulatory action by state or federal authorities, could have a material adverse
effect on the profitability or marketability of our health benefits or managed care products or on our business, financial condition
and results of operations. For example, requirements in the Health Plan Transparency Rule and the Appropriations Act including
the price comparison tool and other requirements have the potential to increase healthcare costs and our operating costs in order to
comply, and also may impact provider negotiations and market pricing. In addition, changes in government regulations or policies
that apply to government-sponsored programs such as Medicare and Medicaid including, among other things, reimbursement
levels, eligibility requirements, benefit coverage requirements and additional governmental participation, could also adversely
affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations. Where states allow certain programs to expire or have
not opted for Medicaid expansion under the ACA, we could experience reduced Medicaid enrollment and reduced growth
opportunities. If future modifications to laws and regulations significantly reduce Medicaid enrollment, our Medicaid business will
be negatively impacted.
We have experienced assessments in the past under state or federal insolvency or guaranty association laws applicable to
insurance companies, HMOs and other payers, and may experience assessments in the future if, for example, premiums established
by other companies for their health insurance products, including certain long-term care products, are inadequate to cover their
costs. Any such assessment could expose us to the risk of paying a portion of an impaired or insolvent insurance company’s claims
through state guaranty associations. We are not currently able to estimate our potential financial obligations, losses, or the
availability of offsets associated with potential guaranty association assessments; however, any significant increase in guaranty
association assessments could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of
operations.
-31-
We expect state legislatures will continue to focus on healthcare delivery and financing issues, including actions to reduce or
limit increases to premium payments, provider billing protections, and broader reforms of their health insurance markets. State
ballot initiatives can also be put to voters that would substantially impair our operating environment. If enacted into law, these state
proposals could have a material adverse impact on our business, cash flows, operations or financial condition.
Additionally, from time to time, Congress has considered, and may consider in the future, various forms of managed care
reform legislation which, if adopted, could fundamentally alter the treatment of coverage decisions under ERISA and could
increase our costs, expose us to expanded liability or require us to revise the ways in which we conduct business. There have been
legislative attempts to limit ERISA’s preemptive effect on state laws and litigants’ ability to seek damages beyond the benefits
offered under their plans. If adopted, such limitations could increase our liability exposure, permit greater state regulation of our
operations, and expand the scope of damages, including punitive damages, litigants could be awarded.
The ongoing changes to the ACA and related laws and regulations could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial
condition and results of operations.
The ongoing changes in federal and state laws and regulations stemming from the ACA, including the steps that have been
taken to amend, repeal and limit the scope and application of the ACA, continue to represent significant challenges to the U.S.
healthcare system. We are unable to predict how these events will ultimately be resolved, what impact the 2020 U.S. Presidential
and Senate elections may have, and what the ultimate impact may be on our business, including, but not limited to, our products,
services, processes and technology, and on our relationships with current and future customers and healthcare providers. The legal
challenges regarding the ACA, including a federal district court decision invalidating the ACA in its entirety, which was argued
before the U.S. Supreme Court in November 2020 and has been stayed pending the U.S. Supreme Court’s decision, continue to
contribute to this uncertainty. Further regulations and modifications to the ACA at the federal or state level, including a judicial
invalidation of the ACA, could significantly impact the market for our products, the regulations applicable to us and the fees and
taxes payable by us and otherwise have significant effects on our business and future operations, some of which may adversely
affect our results of operations and financial condition.
In general, the risk pool for the Individual market, which includes public exchange markets, has become less healthy since its
inception in 2014 and continues to exhibit risk volatility. In addition, insurers have faced uncertainties related to federal
government funding for various ACA programs. Based on our experience in public exchange markets to date, we have made
adjustments to our premium rates and geographic participation, and will continue to evaluate the performance of our public
exchange plans, the future viability of the public exchanges and availability of federal subsidies, and may make further adjustments
to our rates and participation going forward. These factors may have a material adverse effect on our results of operations if
premiums are not adequate or do not appropriately reflect the acuity of these individuals. Any variation from our expectations
regarding acuity, enrollment levels, adverse selection, or other assumptions utilized in setting premium rates could have a material
adverse effect on our results of operations, financial position, and cash flows.
For additional information related to the ACA, see Part I, Item 1 “Business” and Part II, Item 7 “Management’s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We are subject to various risks associated with our international operations.
Certain of our subsidiaries that provide services to some of our health plans operate internationally and are subject to
regulation in the jurisdictions in which they are organized or conduct business related to, among other things, taxation, intellectual
property, investment, management control, labor, anti-fraud, anti-corruption and privacy and data protection regulations. In
addition, we are subject to U.S. laws that regulate the conduct and activities of U.S.-based businesses operating abroad, such as the
Foreign Corrupt Practices Act. Violations of these laws and regulations could result in fines, criminal sanctions against us, our
officers or employees, restrictions or outright prohibitions on the conduct of our business and significant reputational harm.
We face risks related to litigation.
We are, and may in the future be, a party to a variety of legal actions that may affect our business, such as administrative
charges before government agencies, employment and employment discrimination-related suits, employee benefit claims, breach of
contract actions, tort claims and intellectual property-related litigation. In addition, because of the nature of our
-32-
business, we are subject to a variety of legal actions relating to our business operations, including the design, administration and
offering of our products and services. These could include claims relating to the denial or limitation of healthcare benefits; federal
and state false claims act laws; dispensing of drugs associated with our PBM business; professional liability claims arising out of
the delivery of healthcare and related services to the public; development or application of medical policies and coverage and
clinical guidelines; medical malpractice actions; product liability claims; allegations of anti-competitive and unfair business
activities; provider disputes over reimbursement and contracts; provider tiering programs; narrow networks; termination of provider
contracts; the recovery of overpayments from providers; self-funded business; disputes over co-payment calculations;
reimbursement of out-of-network claims; the failure to disclose certain business practices; the failure to comply with various state
or federal laws, including but not limited to, ERISA and the Mental Health Parity Act; and customer audits and contract
performance, including government contracts. These actions or proceedings could result in substantial costs to us, require our
officers to spend substantial time focused on the litigation, and result in negative media attention, and may adversely affect our
business, reputation, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows.
We are also involved in, or may in the future be party to, pending or threatened litigation of the character incidental to the
business we transact or arising out of our operations, including, but not limited to, breaches of security and violations of privacy
requirements, shareholder actions, compliance with federal and state laws and regulations (including qui tam or “whistleblower”
actions), or sales and acquisitions of businesses or assets (including as a result of the now terminated Agreement and Plan of
Merger between us and Cigna Corporation, or as more fully described under Note 14, “Commitments and Contingencies -
Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings - Cigna Corporation Merger Litigation,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K). From time to time, we are involved as a party in various
governmental investigations, audits, reviews and administrative proceedings, including challenges relating to the award of
government contracts. These investigations, audits and reviews include routine and special investigations by various state insurance
departments, various federal regulators including CMS and the HHS Office of Inspector General, state attorneys general, the
Department of Justice, and various offices of the U.S. Attorney General. Following an investigation, we may be subject to civil or
criminal fines, penalties and other sanctions if we are determined to be in violation of applicable laws or regulations. Liabilities that
may result from these actions could have a material adverse effect on our cash flows, results of operations and financial condition.
Recent court decisions and legislative activity may increase our exposure for any of these types of claims. In some cases,
substantial non-economic (including injunctive relief), treble or punitive damages may be sought. Although we maintain insurance
coverage for some of these potential liabilities, some liabilities and damages may not be covered by insurance, insurers may dispute
coverage or the amount of insurance may not be enough to cover the damages awarded. In addition, insurance coverage for all or
certain forms of liability may become unavailable or prohibitively expensive in the future. Any adverse judgment against us
resulting in such damage awards could result in negative publicity and have an adverse effect on our cash flows, results of
operations and financial condition.
There are various risks associated with providing healthcare services.
The direct provision of healthcare services by certain of our subsidiaries involves risks of additional litigation arising from
medical malpractice actions based on our treatment decisions or brought against us or our associates for alleged malpractice or
professional liability claims arising out of the delivery of healthcare and related services. In addition, liability may arise from
maintaining healthcare premises that serve the public. The defense of any actions may result in significant expenses, and if we fail
to maintain adequate insurance coverage for these liabilities, or if such insurance is not available, the resulting costs could
adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Additionally, many states in which certain of our subsidiaries operate limit the practice of medicine to licensed individuals or
professional organizations comprised of licensed individuals. Business corporations generally may not exercise control over the
medical decisions of physicians, and we are not licensed to practice medicine. Rules and regulations relating to the practice of
medicine, fee-splitting between physicians and referral sources, and similar issues vary from state to state. Further, certain federal
and state laws, including those covering our Medicare and Medicaid plans, prohibit the offer, payment, solicitation or receipt of any
form of remuneration to induce, or in return for, the referral of patient care opportunities and also generally prohibit physicians
from making referrals to any entity providing certain designated health services if the referring physician or related person has an
ownership or financial interest in the entity. Any enforcement
-33-
actions by governmental officials alleging non-compliance with these rules and regulations could adversely affect our business,
cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Our PBM services business and related operations are subject to a number of risks and uncertainties that are in addition to
those we face in our core healthcare business.
We provide PBM services through our IngenioRx business, and we are responsible to regulators and our customers for the
delivery of those PBM services that we contract to provide. Our PBM services business is subject to the risks inherent in the
dispensing, packaging, fulfillment and distribution of pharmaceuticals and other healthcare products, including exposure to
liabilities and reputational harm related to purported dispensing and other operational errors by us or our PBM services suppliers.
Any failure by us or one of our PBM services suppliers to adhere to the laws and regulations applicable to the dispensing of
pharmaceuticals could subject our PBM business to civil and criminal penalties.
Our PBM services business is subject to federal and state laws and regulations that govern its relationships with
pharmaceutical manufacturers, physicians, pharmacies and customers, including without limitation, federal and state anti-kickback
laws, beneficiary inducement laws, consumer protection laws, ERISA, HIPAA and laws related to the operation of internet and
mail-service pharmacies, as well as an increasing number of licensure, registration and other laws and accreditation standards that
impact the business practices of a PBM services business. In addition, the practice of pharmacy is subject to federal and state laws
and regulation, including those of state boards of pharmacy, individual state-controlled substance authorities, the U.S. Drug
Enforcement Agency and the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. Also, we and our third-party vendors are subject to registration
requirements and state and federal laws concerning labeling, packaging, advertising, handling and adulteration of prescription drugs
and dispensing of controlled substances. Noncompliance with applicable laws and regulations by us or our third-party vendors
could have material adverse effects on our business, results of operations, financial condition, liquidity and reputation.
Federal and state legislatures also regularly consider new regulations and changes to existing regulations for the industry that
could materially affect current industry practices and our business, including the regulation implemented by HHS in November
2020 related to rebates and the pricing of pharmaceuticals, the Appropriations Act, and potential new regulations regarding rebates,
fees from pharmaceutical companies, the development and use of formularies and other utilization management tools, the use of
average wholesale prices or other pricing benchmarks, pricing for specialty pharmaceuticals, limited access to networks and
pharmacy network reimbursement methodologies. In December 2020, the U.S. Supreme Court let stand an Arkansas law regulating
PBMs that may be a precursor to greater state regulation of PBMs.
We are a party to license agreements with the BCBSA that entitle us to the exclusive and, in certain areas, non-exclusive use
of the BCBS names and marks in our geographic territories. The termination of these license agreements or changes in the
terms and conditions of these license agreements could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and
results of operations.
Our license agreements with the BCBSA contain certain requirements and restrictions regarding our operations and our use of
the BCBS names and marks, and failure to comply with those requirements could result in a termination of the license agreements.
The license agreements may be modified by the BCBSA, which could have a material adverse effect on our future expansion plans
or results of operations. Further, BCBS licensees have certain requirements to perform administrative services for members of other
BCBS licensees. As of December 31, 2020, we provided services to approximately 32 million Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield
enrollees. If we or another BCBS licensee are not in compliance with all legal requirements or are unable to perform administrative
services as required, this could have an adverse effect on our members and our ability to maintain our licenses, which could have a
material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Upon the occurrence of an event causing termination of the license agreements, we would no longer have the right to use the
BCBS names and marks or to sell BCBS health insurance products and services in one or more of our service areas. Furthermore,
the BCBSA would be free to issue a license to use the BCBS names and marks in these service areas to another entity. Our existing
BCBS members would be provided with instructions for obtaining alternative products and services licensed by the BCBSA. We
believe that the BCBS names and marks are valuable identifiers of our products and services in the marketplace.
-34-
Upon termination of either license agreement, the BCBSA would have the right to impose a “Re-establishment Fee” upon us,
which would be used in part to fund the establishment of a replacement Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield licensee in the vacated
service area. The fee is set at $98.33 per licensed enrollee. If the Re-establishment Fee was applied to our total Blue Cross and/or
Blue Shield enrollees of approximately 32 million as of December 31, 2020, we would be assessed approximately $3 billion by the
BCBSA. As a result, termination of the license agreements would have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows,
financial condition and results of operations.
For more information on the BCBSA license agreements, including requirements, restrictions and termination events set forth
in these license agreements, see Part I, Item 1, “Business — BCBSA Licenses” of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Indiana law, other applicable laws, our articles of incorporation and bylaws, and provisions of our BCBSA license
agreements may prevent or discourage takeovers and business combinations that our shareholders might consider to be in
their best interest.
Indiana law, other applicable laws and regulations and provisions in our articles of incorporation and bylaws may delay, defer,
prevent or render more difficult a takeover attempt that our shareholders might consider to be in their best interests. For instance,
they may prevent our shareholders from receiving the benefit from any premium to the market price of our common stock offered
by a bidder in a takeover context or adversely affect the price that some investors are willing to pay for our stock.
The insurance holding company acts and certain health statutes of the states in which our insurance company or HMO
subsidiaries are regulated restrict the ability of any person to obtain control of an insurance company or HMO without prior
regulatory approval. Further, the Indiana Business Corporation Law contains business combination provisions that, in general,
prohibit for five years any business combination with a beneficial owner of 10% or more of our common stock unless the holder’s
acquisition of the stock was approved in advance by our Board of Directors.
Our articles of incorporation and bylaws contain provisions that could have anti-takeover effects and may delay, defer or
prevent a takeover attempt that our shareholders might consider to be in their best interests. Our articles of incorporation provide
that no person may beneficially own shares of voting capital stock in excess of specified ownership limits, except with the prior
approval of a majority of the “continuing directors.” The ownership limits, which may not be exceeded without the prior approval
of the BCBSA, are the following: (1) for any institutional investor (as defined in our articles of incorporation), one share less than
10% of our outstanding voting securities; (2) for any non-institutional investor (as defined in our articles of incorporation), one
share less than 5% of our outstanding voting securities; and (3) for any person, one share less than the number of shares of our
common stock or other equity securities (or a combination thereof) representing a 20% ownership interest in us.
In addition, our articles of incorporation and bylaws: divide our Board of Directors into three classes serving staggered three-
year terms (which is required by our license agreement with the BCBSA); permit our Board of Directors to determine the terms of
and issue one or more series of preferred stock without further action by shareholders; restrict the maximum number of directors
and the ability to increase that number; limit the ability of shareholders to remove directors; impose restrictions on shareholders’
ability to fill vacancies on our Board of Directors; impose advance notice requirements for shareholder proposals and nominations
of directors to be considered at meetings of shareholders; prohibit shareholders from amending certain provisions of our bylaws;
and impose restrictions on who may call a special meeting of shareholders.
The health benefits industry is subject to negative publicity, which could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial
condition and results of operations.
The health benefits industry is subject to negative publicity, which can arise from, among other things, increases in premium
rates, industry consolidation, cost of care initiatives and debate around existing or proposed legislation. Negative publicity may
result in increased regulation and legislative review of industry practices, which may further increase our costs of doing business
and adversely affect our profitability by limiting our ability to market or provide our products and services, requiring us to change
our products and services, or increasing the regulatory oversight under which we operate. In addition, any negative publicity
concerning the BCBSA or other BCBSA licensees may adversely affect us and the sale of our health benefits products and services.
Negative public perception or publicity of the health benefits industry in general, the BCBSA, other BCBSA licensees, or us or our
key vendors in particular, could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
-35-
STRATEGIC RISKS
We face competition in many of our markets, and if we fail to adequately adapt to changes in our industry and develop and
implement strategic growth opportunities, our ability to compete and grow may be adversely affected.
As a health benefits company, we operate in a highly competitive environment and in an industry that is subject to significant
changes from and competition due to legislative reform, business consolidations, new strategic alliances, new market entrants,
aggressive marketing practices, technological advancements and changing market practices such as increasing usage of telehealth.
We also will have to respond to pricing and other actions taken by existing competitors and potentially disruptive new entrants in
the public exchanges and in our other lines of business. These factors have produced and will likely continue to produce significant
pressures on our profitability. Furthermore, decisions to buy our products and services are increasingly made or influenced by
consumers, through means such as direct purchasing (for example, Medicare Advantage plans) and insurance exchanges that allow
individual choice, or by large employers that may increasingly have the ability to contract directly with providers. This creates
unique market pressures, and in order to compete effectively in the consumer-driven marketplace, we will be required to develop
and deliver innovative and potentially disruptive products and services to satisfy evolving market demands.
In addition, the PBM industry is highly competitive, and IngenioRx is subject to competition from national, regional and local
PBMs, other insurers, health plans, large retail pharmacy chains, large retail stores, supermarkets, other mail order and web
pharmacies, discount cards and specialty pharmacies. Strong competition within the PBM business has generated greater demand
for lower product and service pricing, increased revenue sharing and enhanced product and service offerings. Our inability to
maintain positive trends, contract on favorable terms with pharmaceutical manufacturers for, among other things, rebates, discounts
and administrative fees or a failure to identify and implement new ways to mitigate pricing pressures, could negatively impact our
ability to attract or retain customers, negatively impact our margins and have a material adverse effect on our business and results
of operations. In addition, legislative reforms such as the regulation issued by HHS in November 2020 related to rebates, and the
Appropriations Act, which requires reporting of plan spending, the cost of plan pharmacy benefits, enrollee premiums and any
manufacturer rebates received by the plan or issuer, may adversely affect our competitive position, cash flows, financial condition
and results of operations.
In order to profitably grow our business in the future, we need to not only grow our profitable medical membership, but also
continue to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings, including through the increased sale of our specialty products, such as
dental, vision and other supplemental products, expansion of products, expansion of our non-insurance assets and establishment of
new cost of care solutions, including innovations in PBM services. If we are unable to acquire or develop and successfully manage
new opportunities that further our strategic objectives and differentiate our products from our competitors, our ability to profitably
grow our business could be adversely affected.
We are currently dependent on the non-exclusive services of independent agents and brokers in the marketing of our healthcare
products, particularly with respect to individuals, seniors and local group customers. We face intense competition for the services
and allegiance of these independent agents and brokers, who may also market the products of our competitors. Our relationship
with our brokers and independent agents could be adversely impacted by changes in our business practices to address legislative
changes, including potential reductions in commissions and consulting fees paid to agents and brokers. We cannot ensure that we
will be able to compete successfully against current and future competitors for these services or that competitive pressures faced by
us will not materially and adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
For additional information, see “Business — Competition,” in Part I, Item 1 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We have built a significant portion of our current business through mergers and acquisitions, joint ventures and strategic
alliances, and we expect to pursue such opportunities in the future.
The following are some of the risks associated with mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures and strategic alliances, referred to
collectively as business combinations, that could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and
results of operations:
•some of the business combinations may not achieve anticipated revenues, earnings or cash flow, business opportunities,
synergies, growth prospects and other anticipated benefits;
-36-
•we may assume liabilities that were not disclosed to us or which were underestimated;
•we may experience difficulties in integrating business combinations, be unable to integrate business combinations
successfully or as quickly as expected and be unable to realize anticipated economic, operational and other benefits in a
timely manner or at all;
•business combinations, and proposed business combinations that are not completed, could disrupt our ongoing business,
lead to the incurrence of significant fees, distract management, result in the loss of key employees, divert resources, result
in tax costs or inefficiencies and make it difficult to maintain our current business standards, controls, information
technology systems, policies and procedures;
•we may finance future business combinations by issuing common stock for some or all of the purchase price, which could
dilute the ownership interests of our shareholders;
•we may compete with other firms, some of which may have greater financial and other resources, to acquire attractive
companies;
•we may experience disputes with our partners in our strategic alliances and joint ventures, which could result in litigation
or a loss of business; and
•future business combinations may make it difficult to comply with the requirements of the BCBSA and lead to an
increased risk that our BCBSA license agreements may be terminated.
We face intense competition to attract and retain employees. Further, managing key executive transition, succession and
retention is critical to our success.
Our success depends on our ability to attract and retain qualified employees and to integrate employees who have joined us
through acquisitions. We face intense competition for qualified employees, and there can be no assurance that we will be able to
attract and retain such employees or that such competition among potential employers will not result in increasing salaries. An
inability to retain existing employees or attract additional employees could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash
flows, financial condition and results of operations.
We would be adversely affected if we fail to adequately plan for the succession of our President and Chief Executive Officer
and other senior management or retain key executives. While we have succession plans in place for members of our senior
management, and employment arrangements with certain key executives, these plans and arrangements do not guarantee that the
services of our senior executives will continue to be available to us or that we will be able to attract, transition and retain suitable
successors.
FINANCIAL RISKS
As a holding company, we are dependent on dividends from our subsidiaries. These dividends are necessary to pay our
outstanding indebtedness. Our regulated subsidiaries are subject to state regulations, including restrictions on the payment
of dividends, maintenance of minimum levels of capital and restrictions on investment portfolios.
As a holding company, we are dependent on dividends and administrative expense reimbursements from our subsidiaries. Our
regulated subsidiaries are not obligated to make funds available to us, and creditors of our subsidiaries will have a superior claim to
certain of our subsidiaries’ assets. Furthermore, among other restrictions, state insurance and HMO laws may restrict the ability of
our regulated subsidiaries to pay dividends. In some states, we have made special undertakings that may limit the ability of our
regulated subsidiaries to pay dividends. In addition, our subsidiaries’ ability to make any payments to us will also depend on their
earnings, the terms of their indebtedness, business and tax considerations and other legal restrictions. Our ability to repurchase
shares or pay dividends in the future to our shareholders and meet our obligations, including paying operating expenses and debt
service on our outstanding and future indebtedness, will depend upon the receipt of dividends from our subsidiaries. An inability of
our subsidiaries to pay dividends in the future in an amount sufficient for us to meet our financial obligations may materially
adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Most of our regulated subsidiaries are subject to RBC standards or other forms of minimum capital requirements imposed by
their states of domicile that require them to report their results of risk-based capital calculations to the departments of insurance and
the NAIC. Failure to maintain the minimum RBC standards could subject our regulated subsidiaries to corrective action, including
state supervision or liquidation. Changes to the existing RBC standards and the
-37-
NAIC’s December 2020 adoption of an RBC requirement at the holding company level, which requires submission of the first
report in May 2023, could further restrict our or our regulated subsidiaries’ ability to pay dividends and adversely affect our
business. In addition, as discussed in more detail above, we are a party to license agreements with the BCBSA which contain
certain requirements and restrictions regarding our operations, including minimum capital and liquidity requirements, which could
restrict the ability of our regulated subsidiaries to pay dividends.
Our regulated subsidiaries are subject to state laws and regulations that require diversification of their investment portfolios
and limit the amount of investments in certain riskier investment categories, such as below-investment-grade fixed maturity
securities, mortgage loans, real estate and equity investments, which could generate higher returns on their investments. Failure to
comply with these laws and regulations might cause investments exceeding regulatory limitations to be treated as non-admitted
assets for purposes of measuring statutory surplus and risk-based capital, and, in some instances, require the sale of those
investments.
We have substantial indebtedness outstanding and may incur additional indebtedness in the future, which could adversely
affect our ability to pursue desirable business opportunities and to react to changes in the economy or our industry, and
exposes us to interest rate risk to the extent of our variable rate indebtedness.
Our debt service obligations require us to use a portion of our cash flow to pay interest and principal on debt instead of for
other corporate purposes, including funding future expansion. If our cash flow and capital resources are insufficient to service our
debt obligations, we may be forced to seek extraordinary dividends from our subsidiaries, sell assets, seek additional equity or debt
capital or restructure our debt. However, these measures might be unsuccessful or inadequate to meet scheduled debt service
obligations, or may not be available on commercially reasonable terms.
We may also incur future debt obligations that might subject us to restrictive covenants that could affect our financial and
operational flexibility. Our breach or failure to comply with any of these covenants could result in a default under our credit
facilities or other indebtedness. If we default under our credit agreement, the lenders could cease to make further extensions of
credit or cause all of our outstanding debt obligations under our credit agreement to become immediately due and payable, together
with accrued and unpaid interest. If the indebtedness under our notes or our credit agreement or our other indebtedness is
accelerated, we may be unable to repay or finance the amounts due, on commercially reasonable terms, or at all.
A downgrade in our credit ratings could have an adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results
of operations.
Claims-paying ability as well as financial strength and debt ratings by nationally recognized statistical rating organizations are
important factors in establishing the competitive position of insurance companies and health benefits companies. We believe our
strong credit ratings are an important factor in marketing our products to customers. In addition, if our credit ratings are
downgraded or placed under review, our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations could be adversely
impacted by limitations on future borrowings and a potential increase in our borrowing costs. Each of the ratings organizations
reviews our ratings periodically, and there can be no assurance that our current ratings will be maintained in the future.
The value of our intangible assets may become impaired.
As of December 31, 2020, we had $31 billion of goodwill and other intangible assets, representing 36% of our total
consolidated assets. In accordance with applicable accounting standards, we periodically evaluate our goodwill and other intangible
assets for potential impairment, using assumptions and judgments regarding the estimated fair value of our reporting units.
Estimated fair values might be significantly different if other reasonable assumptions and estimates were to be used. If estimated
fair values are less than the carrying values of goodwill and other intangible assets with indefinite lives in future impairment tests,
or if significant impairment indicators are noted relative to other intangible assets subject to amortization, we may be required to
record impairment losses against future income.
The value we place on intangible assets may be adversely impacted if existing or future business combinations fail to perform
in a manner consistent with our assumptions. In addition, from time to time we divest businesses, and any such divestiture could
result in significant asset impairment and disposition charges, including those related to goodwill and other intangible assets. In
addition, the estimated value of our reporting units may be impacted as a result of business decisions we
-38-
make associated with any future changes to laws and regulations, which could unfavorably affect the carrying value of certain
goodwill and other intangible assets and result in impairment charges in future periods. Any future evaluations requiring an
impairment of our goodwill and other intangible assets could materially affect our results of operations and shareholders’ equity
which could, in turn, negatively impact our debt ratings or potentially impact our compliance with existing debt covenants.
The value of our investments is influenced by varying economic and market conditions, and a decrease in value may result
in a loss charged to income.
We maintain a significant investment portfolio of cash equivalents and short-term and long-term investments in a variety of
securities, which are subject to general credit, liquidity, market and interest rate risks. As a result, we may experience a reduction in
value or loss of our investments, which may have a negative adverse effect on our results of operations, liquidity and financial
condition. Changes in the economic environment, including periods of increased volatility in the securities markets such as those
experienced in 2020 related to the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, can increase the difficulty of assessing investment impairment
and increase the risk of potential impairment of these assets. There is continuing risk that declines in fair value may occur and
material impairments may be charged to income in future periods, resulting in realized losses.
GENERAL RISKS
Changes in tax laws and regulations could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flow, financial condition and
results of operations. In addition, we may not be able to realize the value of our deferred tax assets.
Changes in tax laws and regulations , including a potential increase in U.S. corporate tax rates or changes in the deductibility
of expenses, or changes in the interpretation of tax laws and regulations by federal and/or state authorities, could have a material
impact on the future value of our deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities, could result in significant one-time charges in the
current or future taxable years and could increase our future U.S. tax expense. In addition, we are regularly audited by federal and
other tax authorities. Although we believe our tax positions comply with applicable tax law, the final determination of audits and
any related litigation in the jurisdictions where we are subject to taxation could be materially different from our historical income
provisions and accruals. These changes could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flow, financial condition and
results of operations.
In addition, any future increase in our valuation allowance with regard to our deferred tax assets would result in additional
income tax expense and a decrease in shareholders’ equity, which could materially affect our financial position and results of
operations in the period in which the increase occurs. A material decrease in shareholders’ equity could, in turn, negatively impact
our debt ratings or potentially impact our compliance with existing debt covenants.
We also face other risks that could adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations, which include:
•adverse securities and credit market conditions, which could impact our ability to meet liquidity needs;
•any requirement to restate financial results in the event of inappropriate application of accounting principles;
•a significant failure of our internal control over financial reporting;
•failure of our prevention and control systems related to employee compliance with internal policies, including data
security;
•provider fraud that is not prevented or detected and impacts our medical costs or those of self-insured customers;
•failure to protect our proprietary information; and
•failure of our corporate governance policies or procedures.
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED SEC STAFF COMMENTS.
None.
-39-
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES.
We lease our principal executive offices located at 220 Virginia Avenue, Indianapolis, Indiana. In addition to this location, we
have operating facilities located in each state where we operate as licensees of the BCBSA, in each state where Amerigroup
conducts business and in certain other states and countries where our other subsidiaries operate. A majority of these locations are
also leased properties. Our facilities support our various business segments. We modified certain of our workforce practices in 2020
in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, including having the majority of our workforce work remotely. In the third quarter of
2020, our management introduced enterprise-wide initiatives to streamline our operations and optimize our business, including a
reduction of our office space footprint. We believe that our properties are adequate and suitable for our business as presently
conducted; however, we are continuing to evaluate our real estate strategy as it relates to the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic
and the changing needs of a more remote workforce.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS.
For information regarding our legal proceedings, see Note 14, “Commitments and Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory
Proceedings,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K,
which information is incorporated herein by reference.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES.
Not applicable.
-40-
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES.
Market Information 
Our common stock, par value $0.01 per share, is listed on the NYSE under the symbol “ANTM.”
Holders
As of February 4, 2021, there were 55,764 shareholders of record of our common stock.
Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans
The information required by this Item concerning securities authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans is set
forth in Part III, Item 12 “Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters” in
this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
The following table presents information related to our repurchases of common stock for the periods indicated (in millions,
except share and per share data):
PeriodTotal Number
of Shares
PurchasedAverage
Price Paid
per ShareTotal Number
of Shares
Purchased as
Part of
Publicly
Announced
ProgramsApproximate
Dollar Value
of Shares that
May Yet Be
Purchased
Under the
Programs
October 1, 2020 to October 31, 2020 1,236,624 $288.64 1,234,200 $ 2,093 
November 1, 2020 to November 30, 2020 1,483,621 310.05 1,481,675 1,634 
December 1, 2020 to December 31, 2020 1,744,143 314.04 1,725,700 1,092 
4,464,388 4,441,575 
1Total number of shares purchased includes 22,813 shares delivered to or withheld by us in connection with employee payroll
tax withholding upon exercise or vesting of stock awards. Stock grants to employees and directors and stock issued for stock
option plans and stock purchase plans in the consolidated statements of shareholders’ equity are shown net of these shares
purchased.
2Represents the number of shares repurchased through the common stock repurchase program authorized by our Board of
Directors, which the Board evaluates periodically. During the year ended December 31, 2020, we repurchased 9,429,067
shares at an aggregate cost of $2,700 under the program, including the cost of options to purchase shares. The Board of
Directors has authorized our common stock repurchase program since 2003. On January 26, 2021, our Audit Committee,
pursuant to authorization granted by the Board of Directors, authorized a $5,000 increase to our common stock repurchase
program. No duration has been placed on our common stock repurchase program, and we reserve the right to discontinue the
program at any time.1 2 
-41-
Performance Graph
The following Performance Graph and related information compares the cumulative total return to shareholders of our
common stock for the period from December 31, 2015 through December 31, 2020, with the cumulative total return over such
period of (i) the Standard & Poor’s 500 Stock Index (the “S&P 500 Index”) and (ii) the Standard & Poor’s Managed Health Care
Index (the “S&P Managed Health Care Index”). The graph assumes an investment of $100 on December 31, 2015 in each of our
common stock, the S&P 500 Index and the S&P Managed Health Care Index (and the reinvestment of all dividends).
The comparisons shown in the graph below are based on historical data, and we caution that the stock price performance
shown in the graph below is not indicative of, and is not intended to forecast, the potential future performance of our common
stock. Information used in the graph was obtained from S&P Global Market Intelligence, a source believed to be reliable, but we
are not responsible for any errors or omissions in such information. The following graph and related information shall not be
deemed “soliciting materials” or to be “filed” with the SEC, nor shall such information be incorporated by reference into any future
filing under the Exchange Act, except to the extent that we specifically incorporate it by reference into such filing.
 December 31,
 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020
Anthem, Inc. $100 $105 $167 $197 $229 $247 
S&P 500 Index 100 112 136 130 171 203 
S&P Managed Health Care Index 100 120 172 191 229 266 
Based upon an initial investment of $100 on December 31, 2015 with dividends reinvested.
-42-
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA.
The table below provides selected consolidated financial data of Anthem. The information has been derived from our
consolidated financial statements for each of the years in the five-year period ended December 31, 2020. You should read this
selected consolidated financial data in conjunction with the audited consolidated financial statements and notes as of and for the
year ended December 31, 2020 included in Part II, Item 8 “Financial Statements and Supplementary Data,” and Part II, Item 7
“Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” included in this Annual Report on
Form 10-K.
 As of and for the Years Ended December 31
 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
(in millions, except where indicated and except per share data)     
Income Statement Data
Total operating revenue $ 120,808 $ 103,141 $ 91,341 $ 89,061 $ 84,194 
Total revenues 121,867 104,213 92,105 90,040 84,863 
Net income 4,572 4,807 3,750 3,843 2,470 
Per Share Data
Basic net income per share $ 18.23 $ 18.81 $ 14.53 $ 14.70 $ 9.39 
Diluted net income per share 17.98 18.47 14.19 14.35 9.21 
Dividends per share 3.80 3.20 3.00 2.70 2.60 
Other Data (unaudited)
Benefit expense ratio 84.6 % 86.8 % 84.2 % 86.4 % 84.8 %
Selling, general and administrative expense ratio 14.4 % 13.0 % 15.3 % 14.2 % 14.9 %
Income before income tax expense as a percentage of total
revenues 5.1 % 5.7 % 5.5 % 4.4 % 5.4 %
Net income as a percentage of total revenues 3.8 % 4.6 % 4.1 % 4.3 % 2.9 %
Medical membership (in thousands) 42,925 41,000 39,938 40,299 39,940 
Balance Sheet Data
Cash and investments $ 31,295 $ 26,127 $ 22,639 $ 25,179 $ 23,263 
Total assets 86,615 77,453 71,571 70,540 65,083 
Long-term debt, less current portion 19,335 17,787 17,217 17,382 14,359 
Total liabilities 53,416 45,725 43,030 44,037 39,982 
Total shareholders’ equity 33,199 31,728 28,541 26,503 25,101 
1 The net assets of and results of operations for Beacon, America’s 1st Choice and HealthSun are included from their respective acquisition dates of February 28,
2020, February 15, 2018 and December 21, 2017, respectively.
2 Operating revenue is obtained by adding premiums, product revenue, and administrative fees and other revenue.
3 The benefit expense ratio represents benefit expenses as a percentage of premium revenue.
4 The selling, general and administrative expense ratio represents selling, general and administrative expenses as a percentage of total operating revenue.
5 Cash and investments is obtained by adding cash and cash equivalents, current and long-term fixed maturity securities and equity securities.1 1 1
2
3
4
5
-43-
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS.
 (In Millions, Except Per Share Data or As Otherwise Stated Herein)
 This Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations (“MD&A”), should be read in
conjunction with our audited consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
References to the terms “we,” “our,” “us,” “Anthem” or the “Company” used throughout this MD&A refer to Anthem, Inc., an
Indiana corporation, and, unless the context otherwise requires, its direct and indirect subsidiaries. References to the “states”
include the District of Columbia, unless the context otherwise requires.
This section of this Annual Report on Form 10-K generally discusses 2020 and 2019 items and year-over-year comparisons
between 2020 and 2019. A detailed discussion of 2018 items and year-over-year comparisons between 2019 and 2018 that are not
included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K can be found in “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations” in Part II, Item 7 of our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2019.
Overview
We are one of the largest health benefits companies in the United States in terms of medical membership, serving
approximately 43 medical members through our affiliated health plans as of December 31, 2020. We are an independent licensee of
the Blue Cross and Blue Shield Association (“BCBSA”), an association of independent health benefit plans. We serve our members
as the Blue Cross licensee for California and as the Blue Cross and Blue Shield (“BCBS”) licensee for Colorado, Connecticut,
Georgia, Indiana, Kentucky, Maine, Missouri (excluding 30 counties in the Kansas City area), Nevada, New Hampshire, New York
(in the New York City metropolitan area and upstate New York), Ohio, Virginia (excluding the Northern Virginia suburbs of
Washington, D.C.) and Wisconsin. In a majority of these service areas, we do business as Anthem Blue Cross, Anthem Blue Cross
and Blue Shield, and Empire Blue Cross Blue Shield or Empire Blue Cross. In addition, we conduct business through arrangements
with other BCBS licensees as well as other strategic partners. Through our subsidiaries, we also serve customers in numerous states
across the country as AIM Specialty Health, Amerigroup, Aspire Health, Beacon, CareMore, Freedom Health, HealthLink,
HealthSun, Optimum HealthCare, Simply Healthcare, and/or UniCare. Also, in the second quarter of 2019, we began providing
pharmacy benefits management (“PBM”) services through our IngenioRx subsidiary. We are licensed to conduct insurance
operations in all 50 states and the District of Columbia through our subsidiaries.
We manage our operations through four reportable segments: Commercial & Specialty Business, Government Business,
IngenioRx and Other. In 2019, IngenioRx was included in our Other reportable segment. Amounts for 2019 have been reclassified
to conform to the current year presentation of our reportable segments for comparability.
Our operating revenue consists of premiums, product revenue, and administrative fees and other revenue. Premium revenue is
generated from fully-insured contracts where we indemnify our policyholders against costs for covered health and life insurance
benefits. Product revenue represents services performed by IngenioRx for unaffiliated PBM customers and includes ingredient
costs (net of any rebates or discounts), including co-payments made by or on behalf of the customer, and administrative fees.
Unaffiliated PBM customers include our self-funded groups that contract with IngenioRx for PBM services and external customers
outside of the health plans we own. Administrative fees and other revenue come from fees from our self-funded customers for the
processing of transactions or network discount savings realized, revenues from our Medicare processing business and revenues
from other health-related businesses, including disease management programs and miscellaneous other income.
Our benefit expense primarily includes costs of care for health services consumed by our fully-insured members, such as
outpatient care, inpatient hospital care, professional services (primarily physician care) and pharmacy benefit costs. All four
components are affected both by unit costs and utilization rates. Unit costs include the cost of outpatient medical procedures per
visit, inpatient hospital care per admission, physician fees per office visit and prescription drug prices. Utilization rates represent
the volume of consumption of health services and typically vary with the age and health status of our members and their social and
lifestyle choices, along with clinical protocols and medical practice patterns in each of our markets. A portion of benefit expense
recognized in each reporting period consists of actuarial estimates of claims incurred but not yet paid by
-44-
us. Any changes in these estimates are recorded in the period the need for such an adjustment arises. While we offer a diversified
mix of managed care products and services through our managed care plans, our aggregate cost of care can fluctuate based on a
change in the overall mix of these products and services. Our managed care plans include: Preferred Provider Organizations; Health
Maintenance Organizations (“HMOs”); Point-of-Service plans; traditional indemnity plans and other hybrid plans, including
Consumer-Driven Health Plans; and hospital only and limited benefit products.
We classify certain quality improvement costs as benefit expense. Quality improvement activities are those designed to
improve member health outcomes, prevent hospital readmissions and improve patient safety. They also include expenses for
wellness and health promotion provided to our members. These quality improvement costs may be comprised of expenses incurred
for: (i) medical management, including care coordination and case management; (ii) health and wellness, including disease
management services for such conditions as diabetes, high-risk pregnancies, congestive heart failure and asthma management and
wellness initiatives like weight-loss programs and smoking cessation treatments; and (iii) clinical health policy, such as
identification and use of best clinical practices to avoid harm, identifying clinical errors and safety concerns, and identifying
potential adverse drug interactions.
Our cost of products sold represents the cost of pharmaceuticals dispensed by IngenioRx for our unaffiliated PBM customers
(net of rebates or discounts), including any co-payments made by or on behalf of the customer, per-claim administrative fees for
prescription fulfillment and certain direct costs related to sales and administration of customer contracts.
Our selling, general and administrative expenses consist of fixed and variable costs. Examples of fixed costs are depreciation,
amortization and certain facilities expenses. Certain variable costs, such as premium taxes, vary directly with premium volume.
Commission expense generally varies with premium or membership volume. Other variable costs, such as salaries and benefits, do
not vary directly with changes in premium but are more aligned with changes in membership. The acquisition or loss of a
significant block of business would likely impact staffing levels and thus, associated compensation expense. Other variable costs
include professional and consulting expenses and advertising. Other factors can impact our administrative cost structure, including
systems efficiencies, inflation and changes in productivity.
Our results of operations depend in large part on our ability to accurately predict and effectively manage healthcare costs
through effective contracting with providers of care to our members, product pricing, medical management and health and wellness
programs, innovative product design and our ability to maintain or achieve improvement in our CMS Star ratings. Several
economic factors related to healthcare costs, such as regulatory mandates of coverage as well as direct-to-consumer advertising by
providers and pharmaceutical companies, have a direct impact on the volume of care consumed by our members. The potential
effect of escalating healthcare costs, any changes in our ability to negotiate competitive rates with our providers and any regulatory
or market-driven restrictions on our ability to obtain adequate premium rates to offset overall inflation in healthcare costs, including
increases in unit costs and utilization resulting from the aging of the population and other demographics, the impact of epidemics
and pandemics, as well as advances in medical technology, may impose further risks to our ability to profitably underwrite our
business, and may have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
For additional information about our business and reportable segments, see Part I, Item 1, “Business” and Note 20, “Segment
Information” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
COVID-19
In March 2020, the World Health Organization declared the outbreak of a novel strain of coronavirus (“COVID-19”) a global
health pandemic. At the onset of the pandemic, to prevent its spread, most states issued shelter-in-place or stay-at-home orders,
which generally required the businesses not considered essential to close their physical offices. While these orders were largely
lifted during the second quarter of 2020, many states and local authorities continued to impose certain restrictions on the conduct of
businesses and individuals.
The COVID-19 pandemic continues to evolve, and the virus and mitigation efforts have continued to impact the global
economy, cause market instability, increase unemployment and put pressure on the healthcare system. The COVID-19 pandemic
has impacted and will continue to impact our membership and benefit expense and has influenced and will likely continue to
influence member behavior, impacting how members access healthcare services. Although increased unemployment caused by the
COVID-19 pandemic resulted in a decline in our Local Group membership, our Medicaid
-45-
membership grew as a result of the temporary suspension of eligibility recertification efforts in response to the COVID-19
pandemic. While reduced or cancelled utilization of non-COVID-19 health services by our members decreased our claim costs
overall in 2020, in the second half of 2020 utilization of such services began to rebound, and non-COVID-19 claim costs began to
normalize as the shelter-in-place, stay-at-home orders and other restrictions on the conduct of businesses were lifted. Our expenses
in 2020 included additional costs to cover COVID-19 related testing, treatment, expanded coverage of insurance benefits, waivers
for cost-sharing and actions to support our providers. Furthermore, our expenses associated with COVID-19, including testing and
treatment and the actions taken to support our members in response to the pandemic, accelerated in the fourth quarter of 2020 and
exceeded the benefit we experienced during the quarter from the lower volume of healthcare claims attributable to decreased
utilization of non-COVID-19 health services.
We remain focused on increasing access and coverage for our members and made several changes to our membership benefits
and business operations, adopted tools and policies to assist consumers and care providers and provided support to our associates
and our local communities, which were discussed in Part I, Item 1, “Business — COVID-19,” of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Further, during 2020 we proactively took several actions to preserve our liquidity and financial flexibility and minimize the effects
of the COVID-19 pandemic, including:
•Borrowing under our senior revolving credit facility in March 2020, which was repaid in April 2020;
•Delaying certain tax payments as permitted by the IRS and the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (the
“CARES Act”); and
•Temporarily suspending our share repurchase activity in March 2020, which was resumed in late June 2020.
The COVID-19 pandemic has created unique and unprecedented challenges, and although it has impacted and will likely
continue to impact our membership and benefit expense, it did not have a material adverse effect on our reported results in 2020.
However, this may change in the future as the COVID-19 pandemic is evolving, and the extent of its impact will depend on future
developments, which are highly uncertain and cannot be predicted at this time. We will continue to monitor the COVID-19
pandemic as well as resulting legislative and regulatory changes that may impact our business. For additional discussion regarding
our risks related to the COVID-19 pandemic and our other risk factors, see Part I, Item 1A, “Risk Factors” in this Annual Report on
Form 10-K and “Business Trends” in this MD&A.
Business Trends
The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, as amended
(collectively, the “ACA”), has changed and may continue to make broad-based changes to the U.S. healthcare system. We expect
the ACA will continue to impact our business model and strategy. Also, the legal challenges regarding the ACA, including a federal
district court decision invalidating the ACA, which was argued before the U.S. Supreme Court in November 2020 and has been
stayed pending the U.S. Supreme Court’s decision, could significantly disrupt our business. We currently offer Individual ACA-
compliant products in 103 of the 143 rating regions in which we operate. Our strategy has been, and will continue to be, to only
participate in rating regions where we have an appropriate level of confidence that these markets are on a path toward
sustainability, including, but not limited to, factors such as expected financial performance, regulatory environment, and underlying
market characteristics. In addition, the continuing growth in our government-sponsored business exposes us to increased regulatory
oversight.
In the second quarter of 2019, we began using IngenioRx to market and offer PBM services to our affiliated health plan
customers throughout the country, as well as to customers outside of the health plans we own. Our comprehensive PBM services
portfolio includes features such as formulary management, pharmacy networks, a prescription drug database, member services and
mail order capabilities. IngenioRx delegates certain PBM administrative functions, such as claims processing and prescription
fulfillment, to CaremarkPCS Health, L.L.C., which is a subsidiary of CVS Health Corporation, pursuant to a five-year agreement.
With IngenioRx, we retain the responsibilities for clinical and formulary strategy and development, member and employer
experiences, operations, sales, marketing, account management and retail network strategy. From December 2009 through
December 2019, we delegated certain PBM functions and administrative services to Express Scripts, Inc. (“Express Scripts”). We
began transitioning existing members from Express Scripts to IngenioRx in the second quarter of 2019, and completed the
transition of all of our members by January 1, 2020.
Pricing Trends: We strive to price our healthcare benefit products consistent with anticipated underlying medical cost trends. We
continue to closely monitor the COVID-19 pandemic and the impacts it may have on our pricing, such as surges
-46-
in COVID-19 hospitalizations, infection rates, and the cost of COVID-19 vaccines. We frequently make adjustments to respond to
legislative and regulatory changes as well as pricing and other actions taken by existing competitors and new market entrants.
Product pricing in our Commercial & Specialty Business segment, including our Individual and Small Group lines of business,
remains competitive. Revenues from the Medicare and Medicaid programs are dependent, in whole or in part, upon annual funding
from the federal government and/or applicable state governments. The ACA imposed an annual Health Insurance Provider Fee
(“HIP Fee”) on health insurers that write certain types of health insurance on U.S. risks. We priced our affected products to cover
the impact of the HIP Fee when it was in effect. The HIP Fee was suspended for 2019, was resumed for 2020 and has been
permanently repealed beginning in 2021.
Medical Cost Trends: Our medical cost trends are primarily driven by increases in the utilization of services across all provider
types and the unit cost increases of these services. We work to mitigate these trends through various medical management programs
such as utilization management, condition management, program integrity and specialty pharmacy management, as well as benefit
design changes. There are many drivers of medical cost trends that can cause variance from our estimates, such as changes in the
level and mix of services utilized, regulatory changes, aging of the population, health status and other demographic characteristics
of our members, epidemics, pandemics, advances in medical technology, new high cost prescription drugs, and healthcare provider
or member fraud. Our underlying Local Group medical cost trends reflect the “allowed amount,” or contractual rate, paid to
providers.
The COVID-19 pandemic has caused a decrease in utilization of non-COVID-19 health services, which decreased our claim costs
in 2020. While the utilization of such services began to rebound and claim costs began to normalize in the second half of 2020,
further increases in the utilization of such services may increase our claim costs in the future and affect our medical cost trends.
Our expenses in 2020 include additional costs to cover COVID-19 related testing, treatment, expanded benefits coverage and
waivers for cost-sharing. In response to the current crisis, we expanded coverage for certain members in our affiliated health plans
for testing and treatment related to a COVID-19 diagnosis. Governmental action has required us to provide full coverage for
COVID-19 testing to our members, and future governmental action could require us to provide additional coverage, including, for
example, vaccines. Increased member demand for care, along with continued COVID-19 care, testing and vaccination costs, are
expected to result in increased future medical costs. The continued cost and volume of covered services related to the COVID-19
pandemic may have a material adverse effect on our future claim costs. We continue to closely monitor the COVID-19 pandemic
and its impacts on our business, financial condition, results of operations and medical cost trends.
For additional discussion regarding business trends, see Part I, Item 1, “Business” of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Regulatory Trends and Uncertainties
Federal and state legislation has been enacted, and is likely to continue to be enacted, in response to the COVID-19 pandemic
that has had, and we expect will continue to have, a significant impact on all of our lines of business, including mandates to waive
cost-sharing on COVID-19 testing, treatment and related services. The federal government enacted the Coronavirus Preparedness
and Response Supplemental Appropriations Act, the Families First Coronavirus Response Act and the CARES Act in March 2020,
the Paycheck Protection Program and Health Care Enhancement Act in April 2020 and the Consolidated Appropriations Act of
2021 in December 2020 (the “Appropriations Act”). These acts provide, among other things, prohibitions on prior authorization
and cost-sharing for certain items and services related to COVID-19 tests, reforms including waiving Medicare originating site
restrictions for qualified providers providing telehealth services, financial support to healthcare providers, including expansion of
the Medicare accelerated payment program to all providers receiving Medicare payments, and funding to replenish and administer
small business loan programs to help small businesses keep their workers employed and healthcare benefits covered in the group
market.
The Appropriations Act contains a number of provisions that may have a material effect upon our business, including
procedures and coverage requirements related to surprise medical bills and new mandates for continuity of care for certain patients,
price comparison tools, disclosure of broker compensation and reporting on pharmacy benefits and drug costs. The various health
plan-related requirements of the Appropriations Act will go into effect on January 1, 2022, and our first report on pharmacy
benefits and drug costs is due December 27, 2021.
Regulatory changes have also been enacted, and are likely to continue to be enacted, at the state and federal level in response
to the COVID-19 pandemic. Those changes, which could have a significant impact on health benefits, consumer
-47-
eligibility for public programs, and our cash flows, include mandated expansion of premium payment terms including the time
period for which claims can be denied for lack of payment, mandates related to prior authorizations and payment levels to
providers, additional consumer enrollment windows, and an increased ability to provide services through telehealth. We are
providing extensions to premium payment terms in certain situations and working closely with state regulators that are mandating
or requesting such relief.
The ACA presented us with new growth opportunities, but also introduced new risks, regulatory challenges and uncertainties,
and required changes in the way products are designed, underwritten, priced, distributed and administered. Changes to our business
environment are likely to continue as elected officials at the national and state levels continue to enact, and both elected officials
and candidates for election continue to propose, significant modifications to existing laws and regulations, including changes to
taxes and fees. In addition, the legal challenges regarding the ACA, including a federal district court decision invalidating the ACA
in its entirety, which was argued before the U.S. Supreme Court in November 2020 and has been stayed pending the U.S. Supreme
Court’s decision, continue to contribute to this uncertainty. In a separate development, in April 2020, the U.S. Supreme Court ruled
that the federal government is required to pay health insurance companies for amounts owed, as calculated under the risk corridor
program of the ACA. In June 2020, the U.S. Court of Federal Claims entered a final judgment stipulating that we are entitled to
reimbursement for risk corridor amounts from 2014, 2015 and 2016. At the end of December 2020, the U.S. Department of Health
and Human Services (“HHS”) issued final guidance on how to treat the risk corridor recoveries that we expect to receive. Based on
the guidance from HHS, we revised previously filed minimum medical loss ratio (“MLR”) reports and recognized the net premium
impact of the risk corridor recoveries in the fourth quarter of 2020. We will continue to evaluate the impact of the ACA as any
further developments or judicial rulings occur.
The annual HIP Fee, which has been permanently eliminated beginning in 2021, was allocated to health insurers based on the
ratio of the amount of an insurer’s net premium revenues written during the preceding calendar year to the amount of health
insurance premium for all U.S. health risk for those certain lines of business written during the preceding calendar year. The HIP
Fee was non-deductible for federal income tax purposes. Our affected products were priced to cover the increased selling, general
and administrative and income tax expenses associated with the HIP Fee when applicable. The HIP Fee was suspended for 2019.
For 2020, the HIP Fee resumed and the total amount due from allocations to health insurers was $15,523. For the year ended
December 31, 2020, we recognized $1,570 as selling, general and administrative expense related to the HIP Fee. There was no
corresponding expense for 2019 due to the suspension of the HIP Fee for 2019. The HIP Fee has been permanently eliminated
beginning in 2021.
As a result of the ACA, the HHS issued MLR regulations that require us to meet minimum MLR thresholds of 85% for Large
Group and 80% for Small Group and Individual lines of business. Plans that do not meet the minimum thresholds have to pay a
MLR rebate. For purposes of determining MLR rebates, HHS has defined the types of costs that should be included in the MLR
rebate calculation. However, certain components of the MLR calculation as defined by HHS cannot be classified consistently under
U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”). While considered benefit expense or a reduction of premium revenue by
HHS, certain of these costs are classified as other types of expense, such as selling, general and administrative expense or income
tax expense, in our GAAP basis financial statements. Accordingly, the benefit expense ratio determined using our consolidated
GAAP operating results is not comparable to the MLR calculated under HHS regulations.
The ACA also imposed a separate minimum MLR threshold of 85% for Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D prescription
drug plans (“Medicare Part D”). Medicare Advantage or Medicare Part D plans that do not meet this threshold have to pay an MLR
rebate. If a plan’s MLR is below 85% for three consecutive years, enrollment is restricted. A Medicare Advantage or Medicare Part
D plan contract will be terminated if the plan’s MLR is below 85% for five consecutive years.
For additional discussion regarding regulatory trends and uncertainties, and risk factors that could cause actual results to differ
materially from those contained in forward-looking statements made in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, see Part I, Item 1,
“Business — Regulation” and Part I, Item 1A, “Risk Factors.”
-48-
Other Significant Items
Business and Operational Matters
On February 2, 2021, we announced our entrance into an agreement with InnovaCare Health, L.P. to acquire its Puerto Rico-
based subsidiaries, including MMM Holdings, LLC (“MMM”) and its Medicare Advantage plan MMM Healthcare, LLC,
Medicaid plan and other affiliated companies. MMM is an integrated healthcare organization and seeks to provide its Medicare
Advantage and Medicaid members with a whole health experience through its network of specialized clinics and wholly owned
independent physician associations. This acquisition aligns with our vision to be an innovative, valuable and inclusive healthcare
partner by providing care management programs that improve the lives of the people we serve. The acquisition is expected to close
by the end of the second quarter of 2021 and is subject to standard closing conditions and customary approvals.
In 2020, we introduced enterprise-wide initiatives to optimize our business and as a result, recorded a charge of $653 in selling,
general and administrative expenses. We believe these initiatives largely represent the next step forward in our progression towards
becoming a more agile organization, including process automation and a reduction in our office space footprint. For additional
information, see Note 4, “Business Optimization Initiatives” and Note 18, “Leases,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
On February 28, 2020, we completed our acquisition of Beacon Health Options, Inc. (“Beacon”), the largest independently
held behavioral health organization in the country. At the time of acquisition, Beacon served more than thirty-four million
individuals across all fifty states. This acquisition aligned with our strategy to diversify into health services and deliver both
integrated solutions and care delivery models that personalize care for people with complex and chronic conditions. For additional
information, see Note 3, “Business Acquisitions,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of
this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
In February 2018, we completed our acquisition of Freedom Health, Inc., Optimum HealthCare, Inc., America’s 1st Choice of
South Carolina, Inc. and related entities. This Medicare Advantage organization offers HMO products, including Chronic Special
Needs Plans and Dual-Eligible Special Needs Plans, under its Freedom Health and Optimum HealthCare brands in Florida and its
America’s 1st Choice of South Carolina brand in South Carolina. This acquisition aligned with our plans for continued growth in
the Medicare Advantage and Special Needs populations.
Other significant transactions in recent years that have impacted or will impact our capital structure or that have influenced or
will influence how we conduct our business operations include our Board of Directors’ declarations of dividends on our common
stock, repurchases of our common stock, debt repurchases and new debt issuances (2020 and prior). For additional information
regarding these transactions, see Note 13, “Debt” and Note 15, “Capital Stock,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Litigation Matters
In the consolidated multi-district proceeding in the United States District Court for the Northern District of Alabama (the
“Court”) captioned In re Blue Cross Blue Shield Antitrust Litigation (“BCBSA Litigation”), the Blue Cross Blue Shield Association
(the “BCBSA”), and Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield licensees, including us (the “Blue plans”) have approved a settlement
agreement and release (the “Subscriber Settlement Agreement”) with the plaintiffs representing a putative nationwide class of
health plan subscribers. Generally, the lawsuits in the BCBSA Litigation challenge elements of the licensing agreements between
the BCBSA and the independently owned and operated Blue plans. The cases were brought by two putative nationwide classes of
plaintiffs, health plan subscribers and providers, and the Subscriber Settlement Agreement applies only to the putative subscriber
class. No settlement agreement has been reached with the provider plaintiffs at this time, and the defendants continue to contest the
consolidated cases brought by the provider plaintiffs.
If approved by the Court, the Subscriber Settlement Agreement will require the defendants to make a monetary settlement
payment, our portion of which is estimated to be $594, and will contain certain non-monetary terms including (i) eliminating the
“national best efforts” rule in the BCBSA license agreements (which rule limits the percentage of non-Blue revenue permitted for
each Blue plan) and (ii) allowing for some large national employers with self-funded benefit plans to request a bid for insurance
coverage from a second Blue plan in addition to the local Blue plan. We recognized our estimated payment obligation of $548, net
of third-party insurance coverage received as of December 31, 2020.
-49-
On November 30, 2020, the Court issued an order preliminarily approving the Subscriber Settlement Agreement, following
which members of the Subscriber class were provided notice of the Settlement Agreement and an opportunity to opt out of the
class. All terms of the Subscriber Settlement Agreement are subject to final approval by the Court before they become effective.
Objections to the settlement as well as the deadline for those that wish to opt-out from the settlement must be submitted by July 28,
2021. Claims must be filed by November 5, 2021. A final approval hearing has been scheduled for October 20, 2021. If the Court
grants approval of the Subscriber Settlement Agreement, and after all appellate rights have expired or have been exhausted in a
manner that affirms the Court’s final order and judgment, the defendants’ payment and non-monetary obligations under the
Subscriber Settlement Agreement will become effective. For additional information regarding this lawsuit, see Note 14,
“Commitments and Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings – Blue Cross Blue Shield Antitrust Litigation,” of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
In August 2020, the Delaware Court of Chancery ruled that neither we nor Cigna Corporation could collect damages in
connection with the now terminated Agreement and Plan of Merger, between us and Cigna Corporation. Cigna filed a notice of
appeal in November 2020 challenging the trial court’s opinion that Anthem did not owe Cigna a termination fee. Cigna filed its
appellate brief in December 2020, and we filed a response in January 2021. For additional information, see Note 14,
“Commitments and Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings - Cigna Corporation Merger Litigation,” of the Notes
to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
In January 2019, we exercised our contractual right to terminate our PBM Agreement with Express Scripts (the “ESI PBM
Agreement”) and we completed the transition of our members from Express Scripts to IngenioRx by January 1, 2020.
Notwithstanding our termination of the ESI PBM Agreement, the litigation between us and Express Scripts regarding the ESI PBM
Agreement continues. For additional information regarding this lawsuit, see Note 14, “Commitments and Contingencies -
Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings - Express Scripts, Inc. Pharmacy Benefit Management Litigation,” of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Selected Operating Performance
During the year ended December 31, 2020, total medical membership increased by 1.9, or 4.7%. Our medical membership
grew in both our Government Business and Commercial & Specialty Business segments. The increase in medical membership in
our Government Business segment was driven by organic growth in our Medicaid business due to the temporary suspension of
eligibility recertification efforts in our markets in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, as well as acquisitions, and growth in our
Medicare business. The increase in medical membership in our Commercial & Specialty Business segment was primarily driven by
growth in our self-funded business, partially offset by declines in our fully-insured Local Group membership due to negative in-
group changes as a result of increased unemployment caused by the COVID-19 pandemic.
Operating revenue for the year ended December 31, 2020 was $120,808, an increase of $17,667, or 17.1%, from the year
ended December 31, 2019. The increase in operating revenue was primarily driven by higher premium revenue in our Government
Business segment, as well as increased pharmacy product revenue related to the launch of IngenioRx.
Net income for the year ended December 31, 2020 was $4,572, a decrease of $235, or 4.9%, from the year ended
December 31, 2019. The decrease in net income was a result of lower operating results in our Commercial & Specialty Business
segment, which was largely driven by costs associated with actions taken to support our members and providers in response to the
COVID-19 pandemic and costs for COVID-19 related care, as well as our estimated payment obligation related to the BCBSA
Litigation and expenses related to our business optimization initiatives recognized in 2020, higher income tax expense, and a
decrease in net earnings from investment activities. These decreases in net income were largely offset by higher operating results in
our IngenioRx and Government Business segments.
Our fully-diluted earnings per share (“EPS”) for the year ended December 31, 2020 were $17.98, a decrease of $0.49, or 2.7%,
from the year ended December 31, 2019. Our diluted shares for the year ended December 31, 2020 were 254.3, a decrease of 6.0, or
2.3%, compared to the year ended December 31, 2019. The decrease in EPS resulted from the decrease in net income, partially
offset by the impact of a lower number of shares outstanding in 2020.
-50-
Operating cash flow for the year ended December 31, 2020 was $10,688, or approximately 2.3 times net income. Operating
cash flow for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $6,061, or approximately 1.3 times net income. The increase in operating
cash flow was primarily due to the impact of the timing of working capital changes. The increase was further due to membership
growth in our Government Business segment and higher net income in 2020, excluding the non-cash impact of accrued expenses
related to our business optimization initiatives and the BCBSA Litigation.
Our results of operations discussed throughout this MD&A are determined in accordance with GAAP. We also calculate
operating gain to further aid investors in understanding and analyzing our core operating results. We define operating revenue as
premium income, product revenue and administrative fees and other revenue. Operating gain is calculated as total operating
revenue less benefit expense, cost of products sold and selling, general and administrative expense. We use these measures as a
basis for evaluating segment performance, allocating resources, forecasting future operating periods and setting incentive
compensation targets. This information is not intended to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for income before income tax
expense, net income or EPS prepared in accordance with GAAP, and may not be comparable to similarly titled measures reported
by other companies. For additional details on operating gain, see our “Reportable Segments Results of Operations” discussion
included in this MD&A. For a reconciliation of reportable segment operating revenue to the amounts of total revenue included in
the consolidated statements of income and a reconciliation of reportable segment operating gain to income before income tax
expense, see Note 20, “Segment Information,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We intend to expand through a combination of organic growth, strategic acquisitions and efficient use of capital in both
existing and new markets. Our growth strategy is designed to enable us to take advantage of additional economies of scale, as well
as providing us access to new and evolving technologies and products. In addition, we believe geographic and product diversity
reduces our exposure to local or regional regulatory, economic and competitive pressures and provides us with increased
opportunities for growth. In 2019, we began using IngenioRx to market and offer PBM services, and we expect IngenioRx to
improve our ability to integrate pharmacy benefits within our medical and specialty platform. In 2020, we continued growing our
government-sponsored business. In all other markets, we intend to maintain our position by delivering excellent service, offering
competitively priced products, providing access to high-quality provider networks and effectively capitalizing on the brand strength
of the Blue Cross and Blue Shield names and marks.
Membership
Our medical membership includes seven different customer types: Local Group, Individual, National Accounts, BlueCard,
Medicare, Medicaid and our Federal Employees Health Benefits (“FEHB”) Program. BCBS-branded business generally refers to
members in our service areas licensed by the BCBSA. Non-BCBS-branded business refers to members in our non-BCBS-branded
Amerigroup, Freedom Health, HealthSun, Optimum HealthCare and Simply Healthcare plans, as well as Beacon, HealthLink and
UniCare members. In addition to the above medical membership, we also serve customers who purchase one or more of our other
products or services that are often ancillary to our health business.
•Local Group consists of those employer customers with less than 5% of eligible employees located outside of the
headquarter state, as well as customers with more than 5% of eligible employees located outside of the headquarter state
with up to 5,000 eligible employees. In addition, Local Group includes Student Health and UniCare members. Local
Group accounts are generally sold through brokers or consultants who work with industry specialists from our in-house
sales force and are offered both on and off the public exchanges. Local Group insurance premiums may be based on
claims incurred by the group or sold on a self-insured basis. The customer’s buying decision is typically based upon the
size and breadth of our networks, customer service, the quality of our medical management services, the administrative
cost included in our quoted price, our financial stability, our reputation and our ability to effectively service large complex
accounts. Local Group accounted for 36.4%, 38.2% and 39.4% of our medical members at December 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018, respectively.
•Individual consists of individual customers under age 65 and their covered dependents. Individual policies are generally
sold through independent agents and brokers, retail partnerships, our in-house sales force or via the exchanges. Individual
business is sold on a fully-insured basis. We offer on-exchange products through public exchanges and off-exchange
products. Federal premium subsidies are available only for certain public exchange Individual products. Unsubsidized
Individual customers are generally more sensitive to product pricing and, to a lesser extent, the configuration of the
network and the efficiency of administration. Customer turnover is generally®
-51-
higher with Individual as compared to Local Group. Individual business accounted for 1.6%, 1.7% and 1.6% of our
medical members at December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
•National Accounts generally consist of multi-state employer groups primarily headquartered in an Anthem service area
with at least 5% of the eligible employees located outside of the headquarter state and with more than 5,000 eligible
employees. Some exceptions are allowed based on broker and consultant relationships. Service area is defined as the
geographic area in which we are licensed to sell BCBS products. National Accounts are generally sold through
independent brokers or consultants retained by the customer working with our in-house sales force. We believe we have an
advantage when competing for very large National Accounts due to the size and breadth of our networks and our ability to
access the national provider networks of other BCBS companies at their competitive local market rates. National Accounts
represented 18.0%, 18.5% and 19.0% of our medical members at December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
•BlueCard host customers represent enrollees of Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield plans not owned by Anthem who receive
healthcare services in our BCBSA licensed markets. BlueCard membership consists of estimated host members using the
national BlueCard program. Host members are generally members who reside in or travel to a state in which an Anthem
subsidiary is the Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield licensee and who are covered under an employer-sponsored health plan
issued by a non-Anthem controlled BCBSA licensee (the “home plan”). We perform certain functions including claims
pricing and administration for BlueCard members, for which we receive administrative fees from the BlueCard
members’ home plans. Other administrative functions, including maintenance of enrollment information and customer
service, are performed by the home plan. Host members are computed using, among other things, the average number of
BlueCard claims received per month. BlueCard host membership accounted for 14.1%, 14.8% and 14.6% of our
medical members at December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
•Medicare customers are Medicare-eligible individual members age 65 and over who have enrolled in Medicare
Supplement plans; Medicare Advantage, including Special Needs Plans (“SNPs”), also known as Medicare Advantage
SNPs; Medicare Part D; and dual-eligible programs through Medicare-Medicaid Plans (“MMPs”). Medicare Supplement
plans typically pay the difference between healthcare costs incurred by a beneficiary and amounts paid by Medicare.
Medicare Advantage plans provide Medicare beneficiaries with a managed care alternative to traditional Medicare and
often include a Medicare Part D benefit. In addition, our Medicare Advantage SNPs provide tailored benefits to special
needs individuals who are institutionalized or have severe or disabling chronic conditions and to dual-eligible customers,
who are low-income seniors and persons under age 65 with disabilities. Medicare Advantage SNPs are coordinated care
plans specifically designed to provide targeted care, covering all the healthcare services considered medically necessary
for members and often providing professional care coordination services, with personal guidance and programs that help
members maintain their health. Medicare Advantage membership also includes Medicare Advantage members in our
Group Retiree Solutions business who are related to National Accounts, retired members of Local Group accounts, or
retired members of groups who are not affiliated with our Commercial accounts who have selected a Medicare Advantage
product through us. Medicare Part D offers a prescription drug plan to Medicare and MMP beneficiaries. MMP, which was
established as a result of the passage of the ACA, is a demonstration program focused on serving members who are dually
eligible for Medicaid and Medicare. Medicare Supplement and Medicare Advantage products are marketed in the same
manner, primarily through independent agents and brokers. Medicare business accounted for 5.5%, 5.2% and 4.6% of our
medical members at December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
•Medicaid membership represents eligible members who receive healthcare benefits through publicly funded healthcare
programs, including Medicaid, ACA-related Medicaid expansion programs, Temporary Assistance for Needy Families,
programs for seniors and people with disabilities, Children’s Health Insurance Programs, and specialty programs such as
those focused on long-term services and support, HIV/AIDS, foster care, behavioral health and/or substance abuse
disorders, and intellectual disabilities or developmental disabilities, among others. Total Medicaid program business
accounted for 20.6%, 17.7% and 16.8% of our medical members at December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.®
®
®
® ®
® ®
-52-
•FEHB members consist of United States government employees and their dependents within our geographic markets
through our participation in the national contract between the BCBSA and the U.S. Office of Personnel Management.
FEHB business accounted for 3.8% of our medical members at December 31, 2020 and 3.9% at both December 31, 2019
and 2018.
In addition to reporting our medical membership by customer type, we report by funding arrangement according to the level of
risk that we assume in the product contract. Our two principal funding arrangement categories are fully-insured and self-funded.
Fully-insured products are products in which we indemnify our policyholders against costs for health benefits. Self-funded products
are offered to customers, generally larger employers, who elect to retain most or all of the financial risk associated with their
employees’ healthcare costs. Some self-funded customers choose to purchase stop loss coverage to limit their retained risk.
-53-
The following table presents our medical membership by customer type, funding arrangement and reportable segment as of
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018. Also included below is other membership by product. At this time, the following table does
not include membership resulting from our acquisition of Beacon. The medical membership and other membership presented are
unaudited and in certain instances include estimates of the number of members represented by each contract at the end of the
period.
 December  31 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
(In thousands) 2020 2019 2018 Change % Change Change % Change
Medical Membership
Customer T ype
Local Group 15,614 15,682 15,733 (68) (0.4) % (51) (0.3) %
Individual 680 684 655 (4) (0.6) % 29 4.4 %
National:
National Accounts 7,736 7,596 7,588 140 1.8 % 8 0.1 %
BlueCard 6,059 6,060 5,838 (1) — % 222 3.8 %
Total National 13,795 13,656 13,426 139 1.0 % 230 1.7 %
Medicare:
Medicare Advantage 1,428 1,214 1,006 214 17.6 % 208 20.7 %
Medicare Supplement 933 905 846 28 3.1 % 59 7.0 %
Total Medicare 2,361 2,119 1,852 242 11.4 % 267 14.4 %
Medicaid 8,852 7,265 6,716 1,587 21.8 % 549 8.2 %
FEHB 1,623 1,594 1,556 29 1.8 % 38 2.4 %
Total Medical Membership by Customer T ype 42,925 41,000 39,938 1,925 4.7 % 1,062 2.7 %
Funding Arrangement
Self-Funded 25,629 25,418 25,287 211 0.8 % 131 0.5 %
Fully-Insured 17,296 15,582 14,651 1,714 11.0 % 931 6.4 %
Total Medical Membership by Funding
Arrangement 42,925 41,000 39,938 1,925 4.7 % 1,062 2.7 %
Reportable Segment
Commercial & Specialty Business 30,089 30,022 29,814 67 0.2 % 208 0.7 %
Government Business 12,836 10,978 10,124 1,858 16.9 % 854 8.4 %
Total Medical Membership by Reportable Segment 42,925 41,000 39,938 1,925 4.7 % 1,062 2.7 %
Other Membership
Life and Disability Members 5,064 5,259 4,795 (195) (3.7) % 464 9.7 %
Dental Members 6,385 6,263 5,807 122 1.9 % 456 7.9 %
Dental Administration Members 1,316 5,516 5,327 (4,200) (76.1) % 189 3.5 %
Vision Members 7,536 7,261 6,946 275 3.8 % 315 4.5 %
Medicare Part D Standalone Members 413 283 309 130 45.9 % (26) (8.4) %
December 31, 2020 Compared to December 31, 2019
Medical Membership
Total medical membership grew in both our Government Business and Commercial & Specialty Business segments as well as
by funding arrangement. Fully-insured membership increased primarily due to growth in our Medicaid and Medicare businesses,
partially offset by membership decreases in our fully-insured Local Group business. Local Group membership decreased due to
negative in-group changes as a result of increased unemployment caused by the COVID-19 pandemic,®
-54-
which was partially offset by sales exceeding lapses. Self-funded medical membership increased primarily as a result of
membership increases in our National Accounts business driven by our acquisition of a third-party administrator. Medicaid
membership increased primarily due to organic growth in existing markets due to the temporary suspension of eligibility
recertification during the COVID-19 pandemic as well as our acquisition of Medicaid plans in Missouri and Nebraska in 2020.
Medicare membership increased primarily due to higher sales.
Other Membership
Our other membership can be impacted by changes in our medical membership, as our medical members often purchase our
other products that are ancillary to our health business. Life and disability membership decreased due to higher lapses in our fully-
insured Local Group business. Dental membership increased primarily due to new sales and growth in our National Accounts and
membership growth in our FEHB program, as well as new sales in our Individual product offerings. Dental administration
membership decreased due to the lapse of a large dental administration services contract. Vision membership increased due to
higher sales in our Medicare and Local Group businesses.
Consolidated Results of Operations
Our consolidated summarized results of operations and other information for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018 are as follows:                                                        
  Change
 Years Ended December 31 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
 2020 2019 2018 $ % $ %
Total operating revenue $120,808 $103,141 $ 91,341 $17,667 17.1 %$11,800 12.9 %
Net investment income 877 1,005 970 (128) (12.7) % 35 3.6 %
Net realized gains (losses) on
financial instruments 182 67 (206) 115 (171.6) % 273 (132.5) %
Total r evenues 121,867 104,213 92,105 17,654 16.9 % 12,108 13.1 %
Benefit expense 88,045 81,786 71,895 6,259 7.7 % 9,891 13.8 %
Cost of products sold 8,953 1,992 — 6,961 349.4 % 1,992 NM
Selling, general and administrative
expense 17,450 13,364 14,020 4,086 30.6 % (656) (4.7) %
Other expense 1,181 1,086 1,122 95 8.7 % (36) (3.2) %
Total expenses 115,629 98,228 87,037 17,401 17.7 % 11,191 12.9 %
Income befor e income tax expense 6,238 5,985 5,068 253 4.2 % 917 18.1 %
Income tax expense 1,666 1,178 1,318 488 41.4 % (140) (10.6) %
Net income $ 4,572 $ 4,807 $ 3,750 $ (235) (4.9) %$1,057 28.2 %
Average diluted shares outstanding 254.3 260.3 264.2 (6.0) (2.3) % (3.9) (1.5) %
Diluted net income per share $ 17.98 $ 18.47 $ 14.19 $(0.49) (2.7) %$ 4.28 30.2 %
Effective tax rate 26.7 % 19.7 % 26.0 % 700bp (630)bp
Benefit expense ratio 84.6 % 86.8 % 84.2 % (220)bp 260bp
Selling, general and administrative
expense ratio  14.4 % 13.0 % 15.3 % 140bp (230)bp
Income before income tax expense as
a percentage of total revenues 5.1 % 5.7 % 5.5 % (60)bp 20bp
Net income as a percentage of total
revenues 3.8 % 4.6 % 4.1 % (80)bp 50bp
Certain of the following definitions are also applicable to all other results of operations tables in this discussion:
NM Not meaningful.
1 Includes interest expense, amortization of other intangible assets and loss on extinguishment of debt.
2 Benefit expense ratio represents benefit expense as a percentage of premium revenue. Premiums for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018 were $104,109, $94,173 and $85,421, respectively . Premiums are included in total operating revenue presented above.1 
3 3
2 3 3
4 3 3
3 3
3 3
-55-
3 bp = basis point; one hundred basis points = 1%.
4 Selling, general and administrative expense ratio represents selling, general and administrative expense as a percentage of total operating
revenue.
Year Ended December 31, 2020 Compared to the Year Ended December 31, 2019
Total operating revenue increased as a result of higher premium revenue due mainly to membership growth in our Government
Business segment related to our Medicaid and Medicare businesses and rate increases designed to cover the impact of the HIP Fee
reinstatement for 2020. The increase in operating revenue was further attributable to an increase in pharmacy product revenue as
we completed the transition of all of our unaffiliated PBM customers to IngenioRx between the second quarter of 2019 and January
1, 2020. The increase in operating revenue was partially offset by a decrease in premiums in our Commercial & Specialty Business
segment related to fully-insured membership declines as a result of increased unemployment caused by the COVID-19 pandemic.
Net investment income decreased primarily due to losses from other invested assets and lower yields on our short term
investments. The losses on our other invested assets were primarily due to losses from energy sector private equity funds
recognized in 2020 as a result of a decrease in the worldwide demand for energy due to the COVID-19 pandemic.
Net realized gains on financial instruments increased primarily due to the changes in the fair values of our investments in
equity securities. This increase was partially offset by a decrease in net realized gains on sales of equity securities.
Benefit expense increased primarily due to increased costs as a result of growth in our Medicaid and Medicare membership
and overall cost trends across our businesses including increased expense to cover COVID-19 related costs such as testing,
treatment, expanded coverage of insurance benefits, waivers for cost-sharing and actions taken to support our members in response
to the pandemic. These increases were partially offset by the lower volume of healthcare claims experienced resulting from
decreased utilization of non-COVID-19 health services during the COVID-19 pandemic.
Our benefit expense ratio decreased primarily due to the COVID-19 impact of lower utilization rates of healthcare benefits,
and to a lesser extent, the HIP Fee reinstatement for 2020. These decreases were partially offset by increased benefit costs
associated with actions taken to support our members in response to the pandemic and COVID-19 related care. The decreases were
further offset by the impact of retroactive rate adjustments in our Medicaid business and premium credits provided in response to
the COVID-19 pandemic to our members enrolled in select Individual plans and fully-insured employer customers.
Cost of products sold increased as we completed the transition of all of our unaffiliated PBM customers to IngenioRx between
the second quarter of 2019, when it began its operations, and January 1, 2020.
Selling, general and administrative expense increased primarily due to the reinstatement of the HIP Fee for 2020 and increased
spend to support growth in our businesses. The increase was further due to the recognition of expenses related to our business
optimization initiatives and the BCBSA Litigation during 2020.
Our selling, general and administrative expense ratio increased as a result of the higher selling, general and administrative
expenses discussed above, partially offset by the growth in operating revenue.
Our effective income tax rate increased primarily due to the reinstatement of the non-tax deductible HIP Fee for 2020.
Our net income as a percentage of total revenue decreased as a result of all factors discussed above.
Reportable Segments Results of Operations
Beginning in 2020, IngenioRx met the quantitative thresholds for a reportable segment and the results of our operations are
now described through four reportable segments: Commercial & Specialty Business, Government Business, IngenioRx and Other.
We use operating gain to evaluate the performance of our reportable segments. Operating gain is calculated as total operating
revenue less benefit expense, cost of products sold and selling, general and administrative expense. It does not include net
investment income, net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments, interest expense, amortization of other intangible assets,
loss on extinguishment of debt or income taxes, as these items are managed in a corporate shared service environment and are not
the responsibility of operating segment management.
-56-
The discussion of segment results presented below is based on operating gain, as described above, and operating margin, which
is calculated as operating gain divided by operating revenue. Our definition of operating gain and operating margin may not be
comparable to similarly titled measures reported by other companies. We use these measures as a basis for evaluating segment
performance, allocating resources, forecasting future operating periods and setting incentive compensation targets. This information
is not intended to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for income before income tax expense, net income or EPS, prepared
in accordance with GAAP. For our 2019 segment reporting, operating gain generated from IngenioRx activities were allocated and
included in our Commercial & Specialty Business and Government Business based upon their utilization of those services, which
aligns with the method by which we assessed the 2019 operating performance of our reportable segments. Beginning January 1,
2020, we are managing the operating performance of each of our segments on a standalone basis. Prior year 2019 allocations were
not restated to conform to the 2020 presentation; however, operating margins for IngenioRx were approximately 8% in 2019. For
additional information, see Note 20, “Segment Information,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II,
Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
The following table presents a summary of our reportable segment financial information for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018:
    Change
 Years Ended December  31 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
 2020 2019 2018 $ % $ %
Operating Revenue
Commercial & Specialty Business $ 36,699 $ 37,421 $ 35,782 $ (722) (1.9) %$ 1,639 4.6 %
Government Business 71,572 62,632 55,348 8,940 14.3 % 7,284 13.2 %
IngenioRx 21,91 1 5,402 — 16,509 305.6 % 5,402 NM
Other 6,057 2,293 1,519 3,764 164.2 % 774 51.0 %
Eliminations (15,431) (4,607) (1,308) (10,824) 234.9 % (3,299) 252.2 %
Total operating revenue $120,808 $103,141 $ 91,341 $17,667 17.1 %$11,800 12.9 %
Operating Gain (Loss)
Commercial & Specialty Business $ 2,681 $ 4,032 $ 3,600 (1,351) (33.5) % 432 12.0 %
Government Business 2,444 2,056 1,928 388 18.9 % 128 6.6 %
IngenioRx 1,361 — — 1,361 NM — NM
Other (126) (89) (102) (37) 41.6 % 13 (12.7) %
Operating Margin
Commercial & Specialty Business 7.3 10.8 % 10.1 % (350)bp 70bp
Government Business 3.4 3.3 % 3.5 % 10bp (20)bp
IngenioRx 6.2 — % NM NM NM
NM    Not meaningful.
1 Includes expenses of $524 for the BCBSA Litigation and $311 for business optimization initiatives recognized in 2020.
2    Includes expenses of $205 for business optimization initiatives and $24 for the BCBSA Litigation recognized in 2020.
3    Includes expenses of $4 for business optimization initiatives recognized in 2020.
4    Includes expenses of $133 for business optimization initiatives recognized in 2020.
5    bp = basis point; one hundred basis points = 1%.
Year Ended December 31, 2020 Compared to the Year Ended December 31, 2019
Commercial & Specialty Business
Operating revenue decreased primarily due to fully-insured membership declines as a result of increased unemployment caused
by the COVID-19 pandemic. The decrease in operating revenue was further attributable to the absence of pharmacy1
2
3
4
5 5
5 5
-57-
administrative fee revenue that is now being recognized within the IngenioRx segment and the impact of premium credits provided
to certain members in response to the COVID-19 pandemic. These decreases were partially offset by higher premium revenue
resulting from rate increases designed to cover the impact of the HIP Fee reinstatement for 2020.
The decrease in operating gain was primarily driven by costs associated with actions taken to support our members and
providers in response to the pandemic and COVID-19 related care, as well as expenses for the BCBSA Litigation and business
optimization initiatives recognized in 2020. The decrease was further attributable to the shift of pharmacy earnings to our
IngenioRx segment and the impact of premium credits provided to certain members in response to the COVID-19 pandemic. The
decrease was partially offset by the impact of the lower volume of healthcare claims attributable to decreased utilization of non-
COVID-19 health services during the COVID-19 pandemic.
Government Business
Operating revenue increased primarily due to higher premium revenue as a result of membership growth in our Medicaid
business driven by the temporary suspension of eligibility recertification efforts during the COVID-19 pandemic, acquisitions and
new expansions, as well as membership growth in our Medicare business. The increase in premium revenue was further attributable
to the HIP Fee reinstatement for 2020.
The increase in operating gain was primarily driven by the lower volume of healthcare claims attributable to decreased
utilization of non-COVID-19 health services during the COVID-19 pandemic. The increase was partially offset by costs associated
with actions taken to support our members in response to the pandemic and COVID-19 related care and retroactive rate adjustments
and higher experience-rated refunds in our Medicaid business. The increase in operating gain was further offset by increased spend
to support growth and expenses for business optimization initiatives recognized in 2020.
IngenioRx
Operating revenue and operating gain increased as a result of the transition of our existing members to IngenioRx, which
commenced its operations during the second quarter of 2019. Operating revenue represents product revenues from services
performed for our fully-insured affiliated health plans and self-funded customers and external customers outside of the health plans
we own. Product revenues and cost of goods sold for our fully-insured affiliated health plan customers are eliminated in
consolidation. Operating gain represents operating revenue less cost of products sold and selling, general and administrative
expenses.
Other
Operating revenue increased due to our acquisition of Beacon in February 2020 and higher administrative fees and other
revenue from services performed by DBG in certain markets.
The increase in operating loss was driven by expenses recognized for our business optimization initiatives.
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
We prepare our consolidated financial statements in conformity with GAAP. Application of GAAP requires management to
make estimates and assumptions that affect the amounts reported in our consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes
and within this MD&A. We consider our most important accounting policies that require significant estimates and management
judgment to be those policies with respect to liabilities for medical claims payable, income taxes, goodwill and other intangible
assets, investments and retirement benefits, which are discussed below. Our other significant accounting policies are summarized in
Note 2, “Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in
Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We continually evaluate the accounting policies and estimates used to prepare the consolidated financial statements. In general,
our estimates are based on historical experience, evaluation of current trends, information from third-party professionals and
various other assumptions that we believe to be reasonable under the known facts and circumstances. Estimates can require a
significant amount of judgment, and a different set of assumptions could result in material changes to our reported results.
-58-
Medical Claims Payable
The most subjective accounting estimate in our consolidated financial statements is our liability for medical claims payable. At
December 31, 2020, this liability was $11,359 and represented 21% of our total consolidated liabilities. We record this liability and
the corresponding benefit expense for incurred but not paid claims, including the estimated costs of processing such claims.
Incurred but not paid claims include (1) an estimate for claims that are incurred but not reported, as well as claims reported to us
but not yet processed through our systems, which approximated 96%, or $10,925, of our total medical claims liability as of
December 31, 2020; and (2) claims reported to us and processed through our systems but not yet paid, which approximated 4%, or
$434, of the total medical claims payable as of December 31, 2020. The level of claims payable processed through our systems but
not yet paid may fluctuate from one period-end to the next, from approximately 1% to 5% of our total medical claims liability, due
to timing of when claim payments are made.
Liabilities for both claims incurred but not reported and reported but not yet processed through our systems are determined in
the aggregate, employing actuarial methods that are commonly used by health insurance actuaries and meet Actuarial Standards of
Practice. Actuarial Standards of Practice require that the claim liabilities be appropriate under moderately adverse circumstances.
We determine the amount of the liability for incurred but not paid claims by following a detailed actuarial process that uses both
historical claim payment patterns as well as emerging medical cost trends to project our best estimate of claim liabilities. Under this
process, historical paid claims data is formatted into “claim triangles,” which compare claim incurred dates to the dates of claim
payments. This information is analyzed to create “completion factors” that represent the average percentage of total incurred claims
that have been paid through a given date after being incurred. Completion factors are applied to claims paid through the period-end
date to estimate the ultimate claim expense incurred for the period. Actuarial estimates of incurred but not paid claim liabilities are
then determined by subtracting the actual paid claims from the estimate of the ultimate incurred claims. 
For the most recent incurred months (typically the most recent two months), the percentage of claims paid for claims incurred
in those months is generally low. This makes the completion factor methodology less reliable for such months. Therefore, incurred
claims for recent months are not projected from historical completion and payment patterns; rather, they are projected by estimating
the claims expense for those months based on recent claims expense levels and healthcare trend levels (“trend factors”).
Because the reserve methodology is based upon historical information, it must be adjusted for known or suspected operational
and environmental changes. These adjustments are made by our actuaries based on their knowledge and their estimate of emerging
impacts to benefit costs and payment speed. Circumstances to be considered in developing our best estimate of reserves include
changes in utilization levels, unit costs, mix of business, benefit plan designs, provider reimbursement levels, processing system
conversions and changes, claim inventory levels, claim processing patterns, claim submission patterns and operational changes
resulting from business combinations. A comparison of prior period liabilities to re-estimated claim liabilities based on subsequent
claims development is also considered in making the liability determination. In our comparison to prior periods, the methods and
assumptions are not changed as reserves are recalculated; rather, the availability of additional paid claims information drives
changes in the re-estimate of the unpaid claim liability. To the extent appropriate, changes in such development are recorded as a
change to current period benefit expense. The impact from COVID-19 on healthcare utilization and medical claims submission
patterns has increased estimation uncertainty on our incurred but not reported liability at December 31, 2020. Slowdowns in claims
submission patterns and increases in utilization levels for COVID-19 testing and treatment during the fourth quarter of 2020 are the
primary factors that lead to the increased estimation uncertainty.
We regularly review and set assumptions regarding cost trends and utilization when initially establishing claim liabilities. We
continually monitor and adjust the claims liability and benefit expense based on subsequent paid claims activity. If it is determined
that our assumptions regarding cost trends and utilization are materially different than actual results, our income statement and
financial position could be impacted in future periods. Adjustments of prior year estimates may result in additional benefit expense
or a reduction of benefit expense in the period an adjustment is made. Further, due to the considerable variability of healthcare
costs, adjustments to claim liabilities occur each period and are sometimes significant as compared to the net income recorded in
that period. Prior period development is recognized immediately upon the actuary’s judgment that a portion of the prior period
liability is no longer needed or that an additional liability should have been accrued. That determination is made when sufficient
information is available to ascertain that the re-estimate of the liability is reasonable.
-59-
While there are many factors that are used as a part of the estimation of our medical claims payable liability, the two key
assumptions having the most significant impact on our incurred but not paid claims liability as of December 31, 2020 were the
completion and trend factors. As discussed above, these two key assumptions can be influenced by utilization levels, unit costs, mix
of business, benefit plan designs, provider reimbursement levels, processing system conversions and changes, claim inventory
levels, claim processing patterns, claim submission patterns and operational changes resulting from business combinations.
There is variation in the reasonable choice of completion factors by duration for durations of three months through twelve
months where the completion factors have the most significant impact. As previously discussed, completion factors tend to be less
reliable for the most recent months and therefore are not specifically utilized for months one and two. In our analysis for the claim
liabilities at December 31, 2020, the variability in months three to five was estimated to be between 40 and 90 basis points, while
months six through twelve have much lower estimated variability ranging from 0 to 30 basis points.
The difference in completion factor assumptions, assuming moderately adverse experience, results in variability of 2%, or
approximately $204, in the December 31, 2020 incurred but not paid claims liability, depending on the completion factors chosen.
It is important to note that the completion factor methodology inherently assumes that historical completion rates will be reflective
of the current period. However, it is possible that the actual completion rates for the current period will develop differently from
historical patterns and therefore could fall outside the possible variations described herein.
The other major assumption used in the establishment of the December 31, 2020 incurred but not paid claim liability was the
trend factors. In our analysis for the period ended December 31, 2020, there was a 320 basis point differential in the high and low
trend factors assuming moderately adverse experience. This range of trend factors would imply variability of 4%, or approximately
$427, in the incurred but not paid claims liability, depending upon the trend factors used. Because historical trend factors are often
not representative of current claim trends, the trend experience for the most recent six to nine months, plus knowledge of recent
events likely affecting current trends, have been taken into consideration in establishing the incurred but not paid claims liability at
December 31, 2020. The COVID-19 pandemic continues to have a significant impact on 2020 dates of service. Our expenses
associated with COVID-19 accelerated in the fourth quarter of 2020 and exceeded the benefit from lower volume of healthcare
claims attributable to decreased utilization of non-COVID-19 health services. We will continue to monitor emerging experience in
order to better understand the possible implications to our reserves.
See Note 12, “Medical Claims Payable,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a reconciliation of the beginning and ending balance for medical claims payable for the years
ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018. Components of the total incurred claims for each year include amounts accrued for
current year estimated claims expense as well as adjustments to prior year estimated accruals. In Note 12, “Medical Claims
Payable,” the line labeled “Net incurred medical claims: Prior years redundancies” accounts for those adjustments made to prior
year estimates. The impact of any reduction of “Net incurred medical claims: Prior years redundancies” may be offset as we
establish the estimate of “Net incurred medical claims: Current year.” Our reserving practice is to consistently recognize the
actuarial best estimate of our ultimate liability for our claims. When we recognize a release of the redundancy, we disclose the
amount that is not in the ordinary course of business, if material.  
The ratio of current year medical claims paid as a percent of current year net medical claims incurred was 87.7% for 2020,
89.3% for 2019 and 90.2% for 2018. This ratio serves as an indicator of claims processing speed whereby 2020 claims were
processed at a slower speed than in 2019 and 2018.
We calculate the percentage of prior year redundancies in the current year as a percent of prior year net incurred claims payable
less prior year redundancies in the current year in order to demonstrate the development of the prior year reserves. For the year
ended December 31, 2020, this metric was 8.0%, largely driven by favorable trend factor development at the end of 2019 as well as
favorable completion factor development from 2019. For the year ended December 31, 2019, this metric was 7.4%, largely driven
by favorable trend factor development at the end of 2018 as well as favorable completion factor development from 2018. For the
year ended December 31, 2018, this metric was 13.7%, largely driven by favorable trend factor development at the end of 2017 as
well as favorable completion factor development from 2017.
We calculate the percentage of prior year redundancies in the current year as a percent of prior year net incurred medical
claims to indicate the percentage of redundancy included in the preceding year calculation of current year net incurred
-60-
medical claims. We believe this calculation supports the reasonableness of our prior year estimate of incurred medical claims and
the consistency in our methodology. For the year ended December 31, 2020, this metric was 0.8%, which was calculated using the
redundancy of $637. This metric was 0.7% for 2019 and 1.3% for 2018. We believe these metrics demonstrate an appropriate level
of reserve conservatism.
The following table shows the variance between total net incurred medical claims as reported in Note 12, “Medical Claims
Payable,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, for
each of 2019 and 2018 and the incurred claims for such years had it been determined retrospectively (computed as the difference
between “net incurred medical claims – current year” for the year shown and “net incurred medical claims – prior years
redundancies” for the immediately following year):
 Years Ended December 31
 2019 2018
Total net incurred medical claims, as reported $ 78,195 $ 68,651 
Retrospective basis, as described above 78,058 69,081 
Variance $ 137 $ (430)
Variance to total net incurred medical claims, as reported 0.2 % (0.6)%
Given that our business is primarily short tailed (which means that medical claims are generally paid within twelve months of
the member receiving service from the provider), the variance to total net incurred medical claims, as reported above, is used to
assess the reasonableness of our estimate of ultimate incurred medical claims for a given calendar year with the benefit of one year
of experience. We expect that substantially all of the development of the 2020 estimate of medical claims payable will be known
during 2021.
The 2019 variance to total net incurred medical claims, as reported of 0.2% was greater than the 2018 percentage of
(0.6)%. This was driven by the fact that the change in the prior year redundancy reported for 2020 as compared to 2019 was greater
than the change in the prior year redundancy reported for 2019 as compared to 2018.
Income Taxes
We account for income taxes in accordance with the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) guidance, which
requires, among other things, the separate recognition of deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities. Such deferred tax assets and
deferred tax liabilities represent the tax effect of temporary differences between financial reporting and tax reporting measured at
tax rates enacted at the time the deferred tax asset or liability is recorded. A valuation allowance must be established for deferred
tax assets if it is “more likely than not” that all or a portion may be unrealized. Our judgment is required in determining an
appropriate valuation allowance.
At each financial reporting date, we assess the adequacy of the valuation allowance by evaluating each of our deferred tax
assets based on the following:
•the types of temporary differences that created the deferred tax asset;
•the amount of taxes paid in prior periods and available for a carry-back claim;
•the tax rate at which the deferred tax assets will likely be utilized in the future;
•the forecasted future taxable income, and therefore, likely future deduction of the deferred tax item; and
•any significant other issues impacting the likely realization of the benefit of the temporary differences.
We, like other companies, frequently face challenges from tax authorities regarding the amount of taxes due. These challenges
include questions regarding the timing and amount of deductions that we have taken on our tax returns. In evaluating any additional
tax liability associated with various positions taken in our tax return filings, we record additional liabilities for potential adverse tax
outcomes. Based on our evaluation of our tax positions, we believe we have appropriately accrued for uncertain tax benefits, as
required by the applicable guidance. To the extent we prevail in matters we have accrued for, our future effective tax rate would be
reduced and net income would increase. If we are required to pay more
-61-
than accrued, our future effective tax rate would increase and net income would decrease. Our effective tax rate and net income in
any given future period could be materially impacted.
In the ordinary course of business, we are regularly audited by federal and other tax authorities, and from time to time, these
audits result in proposed assessments. We believe our tax positions comply with applicable tax law, and we intend to defend our
positions vigorously through the federal, state and local appeals processes. We believe we have adequately provided for any
reasonably foreseeable outcome related to these matters. Accordingly, although their ultimate resolution may require additional tax
payments, we do not anticipate any material impact on our results of operations or financial condition from these matters.
For additional information, see Note 8, “Income Taxes,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II,
Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
Our consolidated goodwill at December 31, 2020 was $21,691 and other intangible assets were $9,405. The sum of goodwill
and other intangible assets represented 35.9% of our total consolidated assets and 93.7% of our consolidated shareholders’ equity at
December 31, 2020.
We follow FASB guidance for business combinations and goodwill and other intangible assets, which specifies the types of
acquired intangible assets that are required to be recognized and reported separately from goodwill. Under the guidance, goodwill
and other intangible assets (with indefinite lives) are not amortized but are tested for impairment at least annually. Furthermore,
goodwill and other intangible assets are allocated to reporting units for purposes of the annual impairment test. Our impairment
tests require us to make assumptions and judgments regarding the estimated fair value of our reporting units, which include
goodwill and other intangible assets. In addition, certain other intangible assets with indefinite lives, such as trademarks, are also
tested separately.
We complete our annual impairment tests of existing goodwill and other intangible assets with indefinite lives during the fourth
quarter of each year. These tests involve the use of estimates related to the fair value of goodwill at the reporting unit level and
other intangible assets with indefinite lives, and require a significant degree of management judgment and the use of subjective
assumptions. Certain interim impairment tests are also performed when potential impairment indicators exist or changes in our
business or other triggering events occur. We have the option of first performing a qualitative assessment for each reporting unit to
determine whether it is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is less than its carrying amount, which is an
indication that our goodwill may be impaired. These qualitative impairment tests include assessing events and factors that could
affect the fair value of the indefinite-lived intangible assets. Our procedures include assessing our financial performance,
macroeconomic conditions, industry and market considerations, various asset specific factors and entity specific events. If we
determine that a reporting unit’s goodwill may be impaired after utilizing these qualitative impairment analysis procedures, we are
required to perform a quantitative impairment test.
Our quantitative impairment test utilizes the projected income and market valuation approaches for goodwill and the projected
income approach for our indefinite lived intangible assets. Use of the projected income and market valuation approaches for our
goodwill impairment test reflects our view that both valuation methodologies provide a reasonable estimate of fair value. The
projected income approach is developed using assumptions about future revenue, expenses and net income derived from our
internal planning process. These estimated future cash flows are then discounted. Our assumed discount rate is based on our
industry’s weighted-average cost of capital. Market valuations are based on observed multiples of certain measures including
revenue; earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization; and book value of invested capital (debt and equity) and
include market comparisons to publicly traded companies in our industry.
We did not incur any impairment losses as a result of our 2020 annual impairment tests, as it was determined that it is more
likely than not that the estimated fair values of our reporting units were substantially in excess of the carrying values as of
December 31, 2020. Additionally, we do not believe that the estimated fair values of our reporting units are at risk of becoming
impaired in the next twelve months.
If estimated fair values are less than the carrying values of goodwill and other intangibles with indefinite lives in future annual
impairment tests, or if significant impairment indicators are noted relative to other intangible assets subject to amortization, we may
be required to record impairment losses against future income.
-62-
For additional information, see Note 3, “Business Acquisitions” and Note 10, “Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets,” of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. 
Investments
Current and long-term marketable investment securities were $25,554 at December 31, 2020 and represented 29.5% of our
total consolidated assets at December 31, 2020. We classify fixed maturity securities in our investment portfolio as “available-for-
sale” and report those securities at fair value. Certain fixed maturity securities are available to support current operations and,
accordingly, we classify such investments as current assets without regard to their contractual maturity. Investments used to satisfy
contractual, regulatory or other requirements are classified as long-term, without regard to contractual maturity.
Our impairment review is subjective and requires a high degree of judgment. We conduct this review on a quarterly basis,
using both qualitative and quantitative factors. Such factors considered include the extent to which a security’s market value has
been less than its cost, the reasons for the decline in value (i.e., credit event compared to liquidity, general credit spread widening,
currency exchange rate or interest rate factors), financial condition and near term prospects of the issuer, including the credit ratings
and changes in the credit ratings of the issuer, recommendations of investment advisors, and forecasts of economic, market or
industry trends.
Prior to 2020, our fixed maturity securities were evaluated for other-than-temporary impairment where credit-related
impairments were presented within the other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in our consolidated statements of
income with an adjustment to the security’s amortized cost basis. Effective January 1, 2020, if a fixed maturity security is in an
unrealized loss position and we have the intent to sell the fixed maturity security, or it is more likely than not that we will have to
sell the fixed maturity security before recovery of its amortized cost basis, we write down the fixed maturity security’s cost basis to
fair value and record an impairment loss in our consolidated statements of income. For impaired fixed maturity securities that we
do not intend to sell or if it is more likely than not that we will not have to sell such securities, but we expect that we will not fully
recover the amortized cost basis, we recognize the credit component of the impairment as an allowance for credit loss in our
consolidated balance sheets and record an impairment loss in our consolidated statements of income. The non-credit component of
the impairment is recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income. Furthermore, unrealized losses entirely caused by non-
credit-related factors related to fixed maturity securities for which we expect to fully recover the amortized cost basis continue to be
recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income.
The credit component of an impairment is determined primarily by comparing the net present value of projected future cash
flows with the amortized cost basis of the fixed maturity security. The net present value is calculated by discounting our best
estimate of projected future cash flows at the effective interest rate implicit in the fixed maturity security at the date of purchase.
For mortgage-backed and asset-backed securities, cash flow estimates are based on assumptions regarding the underlying collateral,
including prepayment speeds, vintage, type of underlying asset, geographic concentrations, default rates, recoveries and changes in
value. For all other securities, cash flow estimates are driven by assumptions regarding probability of default, including changes in
credit ratings and estimates regarding timing and amount of recoveries associated with a default.
We have a committee of accounting and investment associates and management that is responsible for managing the
impairment review process. We believe we have adequately reviewed our investment securities for impairment and that our
investment securities are carried at fair value. We have established an allowance for credit loss and recorded credit loss expense as
a reflection of our expected impairment losses. Given the inherent uncertainty of changes in market conditions and the significant
judgments involved, there is continuing risk that declines in fair value may occur and additional impairment losses on investments
may be recorded in future periods.
In addition to marketable investment securities, we held additional long-term investments of $4,285, or 4.9% of total
consolidated assets, at December 31, 2020. These long-term investments consisted primarily of certain other equity investments,
the cash surrender value of corporate-owned life insurance policies and real estate. Due to their less liquid nature, these investments
are classified as long-term.
The COVID-19 pandemic and efforts to prevent its spread have significantly impacted the global economy, causing market
instability and declines in the fair value of our investment holdings in the energy sector and consumer-driven
-63-
industries such as travel, entertainment and retail. While the markets have stabilized since the onset of the COVID-19 pandemic,
the extent and length of the recovery remain uncertain. Further, the energy sector and consumer-driven industries remain distressed.
Given this market uncertainty, there is a risk that our investments that have declined may not recover in future periods.
Through our investing activities, we are exposed to financial market risks, including those resulting from changes in interest
rates and changes in equity market valuations. We manage market risks through our investment policy, which establishes credit
quality limits and limits on investments in individual issuers. Ineffective management of these risks could have an impact on our
future results of operations and financial condition. Our investment portfolio includes fixed maturity securities with a fair value of
$23,995 at December 31, 2020. The weighted-average credit rating of these securities was “A” as of December 31, 2020. Included
in this balance are investments in fixed maturity securities of states, municipalities and political subdivisions of $1,010 that are
guaranteed by third parties. With the exception of twenty-one securities with a fair value of $34, these securities are all investment-
grade and carry a weighted-average credit rating of “AA” as of December 31, 2020. The securities are guaranteed by a number of
different guarantors, and we do not have any material exposure to any single guarantor, neither indirectly through the guarantees,
nor directly through investment in the guarantor. Further, due to the high underlying credit rating of the issuers, the weighted-
average credit rating of the fixed maturity securities without a guarantee, for which such information is available, was “A” as of
December 31, 2020.
Fair values of fixed maturity and equity securities are based on quoted market prices, where available. These fair values are
obtained primarily from third-party pricing services, which generally use Level I or Level II inputs for the determination of fair
value in accordance with FASB guidance for fair value measurements and disclosures. We have controls in place to review the
pricing services’ qualifications and procedures used to determine fair values. In addition, we periodically review the pricing
services’ pricing methodologies, data sources and pricing inputs to ensure the fair values obtained are reasonable.
We obtain quoted market prices for each security from the pricing services, which are derived through recently reported trades
for identical or similar securities, making adjustments through the reporting date based upon available market observable
information. For securities not actively traded, the pricing services may use quoted market prices of comparable instruments or
discounted cash flow analyses, incorporating inputs that are currently observable in the markets for similar securities. Inputs that
are often used in these valuation methodologies include, but are not limited to, broker quotes, benchmark yields, credit spreads,
default rates and prepayment speeds. As we are responsible for the determination of fair value, we perform analysis on the prices
received from the pricing services to determine whether the prices are reasonable estimates of fair value. Our analysis includes
procedures such as a review of month-to-month price fluctuations and price comparisons to secondary pricing services. There were
no adjustments to quoted market prices obtained from the pricing services during the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019.
In certain circumstances, it may not be possible to derive pricing model inputs from observable market activity, and therefore,
such inputs are estimated internally. Such securities are designated Level III in accordance with FASB guidance. Securities
designated Level III at December 31, 2020 totaled $392 and represented approximately 1.3% of our total assets measured at fair
value on a recurring basis. Our Level III securities primarily consisted of certain corporate securities and equity securities for which
observable inputs were not always available and the fair values of these securities were estimated using inputs including, but not
limited to, prepayment speeds, credit spreads, default rates and benchmark yields.
For additional information, see Part II, Item 7A, “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk,” and Note 2,
“Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies,” Note 5, “Investments,” and Note 7, “Fair Value,” of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Retirement Benefits
Pension Benefits
We sponsor defined benefit pension plans for some of our employees. These plans are accounted for in accordance with FASB
guidance for retirement benefits, which requires that amounts recognized in financial statements be determined on an actuarial
basis. As permitted by the guidance, we calculate the value of plan assets as described below. Further, the difference between our
expected rate of return and the actual performance of plan assets, as well as certain changes in pension liabilities, are amortized
over future periods. 
-64-
An important factor in determining our pension expense is the assumption for expected long-term return on plan assets. As of
our December 31, 2020 measurement date, we selected a weighted-average long-term rate of return on plan assets of 6.72%. We
use a total portfolio return analysis in the development of our assumption. Factors such as past market performance, the long-term
relationship between fixed maturity and equity securities, interest rates, inflation and asset allocations are considered in the
assumption. The assumption includes an estimate of the additional return expected from active management of the investment
portfolio. Peer data and an average of historical returns are also reviewed for appropriateness of the selected assumption. We
believe our assumption of future returns is reasonable. However, if we lower our expected long-term return on plan assets, future
contributions to the pension plan and pension expense would likely increase.
This assumed long-term rate of return on assets is applied to a calculated value of plan assets, which recognizes changes in the
fair value of plan assets in a systematic manner over three years, producing the expected return on plan assets that is included in the
determination of pension expense. We apply a corridor approach to amortize unrecognized actuarial gains or losses. Under this
approach, only accumulated net actuarial gains or losses in excess of 10% of the greater of the projected benefit obligation or the
fair value of plan assets are amortized over the average remaining service or lifetime of the workforce as a component of pension
expense. The net deferral of past asset gains or losses affects the calculated value of plan assets and, ultimately, future pension
expense. 
The discount rate reflects the current rate at which the pension liabilities could be effectively settled at the end of the year
based on our most recent measurement date. We use the annual spot rate approach for setting our discount rate. Under the spot rate
approach, individual spot rates from a full yield curve of published rates are used to discount each plan’s cash flows to determine
the plan’s obligation. At the December 31, 2020 measurement date, the weighted-average discount rate under the annual spot rate
approach was 2.24%, compared to 3.11% at the December 31, 2019 measurement date. The net effect of changes in the discount
rate, as well as the net effect of other changes in actuarial assumptions and experience, have been deferred and amortized as a
component of pension expense in accordance with FASB guidance.
In managing the plan assets, our objective is to be a responsible fiduciary while minimizing financial risk. Plan assets include a
diversified mix of equity securities, investment grade fixed maturity securities and other types of investments across a range of
sectors and levels of capitalization to maximize long-term return for a prudent level of risk. In addition to producing a reasonable
return, the investment strategy seeks to minimize the volatility in our expense and cash flow.
Effective January 1, 2019, we curtailed the benefits under the Anthem Cash Balance Plan B pension plan. All grandfathered
participants no longer have pay credits added to their accounts, but continue to earn interest on existing account balances.
Participants continue to earn years of pension service for vesting purposes.
Other Postretirement Benefits
We provide most associates with certain medical, vision and dental benefits upon retirement. We use various actuarial
assumptions, including a discount rate and the expected trend in healthcare costs, to estimate the costs and benefit obligations for
our retiree benefits.
At our December 31, 2020 measurement date, the selected discount rate for all plans was 1.99%, compared to a discount rate
of 2.93% at the December 31, 2019 measurement rate. We developed this rate using the annual spot rate approach as described
above.
The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of pre-Medicare (those who are not currently
eligible for Medicare benefits) other benefits at our December 31, 2020 measurement date was 7.00% for 2021 with a gradual
decline to 4.50% by the year 2033. The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of post-Medicare
(those who are currently eligible for Medicare benefits) other benefits at our December 31, 2020 measurement date was 5.50% for
2021 with a gradual decline to 4.50% by the year 2033. These estimated trend rates are subject to change in the future.
For additional information regarding our retirement benefits, see Note 11, “Retirement Benefits,” of the Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
-65-
New Accounting Pronouncements
For information regarding new accounting pronouncements that were issued or became effective during the year ended
December 31, 2020 that had, or are expected to have, a material impact on our financial position, results of operations or financial
statement disclosures, see the “Recently Adopted Accounting Guidance” and “Recent Accounting Guidance Not Yet Adopted”
sections of Note 2, “Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Liquidity and Capital Resources
Introduction
Our cash receipts result primarily from premiums, product revenue, administrative fees and other revenue, investment income,
proceeds from the sale or maturity of our investment securities, proceeds from borrowings, and proceeds from the issuance of
common stock under our employee stock plans. Cash disbursements result mainly from claims payments, administrative expenses,
taxes, purchases of investment securities, interest expense, payments on borrowings, acquisitions, capital expenditures, repurchases
of our debt securities and common stock and the payment of cash dividends. Cash outflows fluctuate with the amount and timing of
settlement of these transactions. Any future decline in our profitability would likely have an unfavorable impact on our liquidity.
The COVID-19 pandemic and the related mitigation efforts have significantly impacted the economy, causing market
instability and increasing unemployment in the United States. While the full impact of COVID-19 on our business remains
uncertain, it could have a material adverse effect on our claim payments, collection of our premiums, product or administrative fee
revenues, our investments and our ability to access credit. Additional discussion regarding the impact of COVID-19 can be found
elsewhere in this MD&A.
We manage our cash, investments and capital structure so we are able to meet the short-term and long-term obligations of our
business while maintaining financial flexibility and liquidity. We forecast, analyze and monitor our cash flows to enable investment
and financing within the overall constraints of our financial strategy.
To preserve our liquidity and financial flexibility and to minimize the effects of the COVID-19 pandemic, we proactively took
several actions during 2020, including borrowing under our senior revolving credit facility in March 2020, which was repaid in
April 2020; delaying certain tax payments as permitted by the IRS and the CARES Act; and temporarily suspending our share
repurchase activity in March 2020, which was resumed in late June 2020. We may take additional actions going forward to
maximize our liquidity, including increasing our borrowings from existing or new Federal Home Loan Bank memberships and
other available borrowings. We will continue to monitor the market conditions and seek to act in a prudent manner.
A substantial portion of the assets held by our regulated subsidiaries are in the form of cash and cash equivalents and
investments. After considering expected cash flows from operating activities, we generally invest cash that exceeds our near term
obligations in longer term marketable fixed maturity securities to improve our overall investment income returns. Our investment
strategy is to make investments consistent with insurance statutes and other regulatory requirements, while preserving our asset
base. Our investments are generally available-for-sale to meet liquidity and other needs. Our subsidiaries pay out excess capital
annually in the form of dividends to their respective parent companies for general corporate use, as permitted by applicable
regulations.
The availability of financing in the form of debt or equity is influenced by many factors, including our profitability, operating
cash flows, debt levels, debt ratings, contractual restrictions, regulatory requirements and market conditions. The securities and
credit markets have in the past experienced higher than normal volatility, although current market conditions are more stable.
During recent years, the federal government and various governmental agencies have taken a number of steps to strengthen the
regulation of the financial services market. In addition, governments around the world have developed their own plans to provide
stability and security in the credit markets and to ensure adequate capital in certain financial institutions. Further, in response to the
COVID-19 pandemic, the federal government has established a number of programs to provide liquidity to the financial system that
provides lending to states, municipalities, and eligible businesses. 
-66-
A summary of our major sources and uses of cash and cash equivalents for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
is as follows:
 Years Ended December  31 $ Change
 2020 2019 2018 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
Sour ces of Cash:
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 10,688 $ 6,061 $ 3,827 $ 4,627 $ 2,234 
Proceeds from sales, maturities, calls and redemptions of
investments, net of purchases — — 1,929 — (1,929)
Issuance of common stock under Equity Units stock purchase
contracts — — 1,250 — (1,250)
Issuances of commercial paper and short- and long-term debt,
net of repayments — 608 — (608) 608 
Issuances of common stock under employee stock plans 176 187 173 (11) 14 
Other sources of cash, net 315 — — 315 — 
Total sources of cash 11,179 6,856 7,179 4,323 (323)
Uses of Cash:
Purchases of investments, net of proceeds from sales,
maturities, calls and redemptions (3,433) (1,919) — (1,514) (1,919)
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (2,700) (1,701) (1,685) (999) (16)
Purchases of subsidiaries, net of cash acquired (1,976) — (1,760) (1,976) 1,760 
Purchases of property and equipment (1,021) (1,077) (1,208) 56 131 
Repayments of commercial paper and short- and long-term
debt, net of issuances (298) — (1,086) (298) 1,086 
Cash dividends (954) (818) (776) (136) (42)
Other uses of cash, net — (338) (337) 338 (1)
Total uses of cash (10,382) (5,853) (6,852) (4,529) 999 
Effect of foreign exchange rates on cash and cash equivalents 7 — (2) 7 2 
Net increase in cash and cash equivalents $ 804 $ 1,003 $ 325 $ (199) $ 678 
Liquidity—Year Ended December 31, 2020 Compared to Year Ended December 31, 2019
The increase in cash provided by operating activities was primarily due to the impact of the timing of working capital changes.
The increase was further due to membership growth in our Government Business segment and higher net income in 2020,
excluding the non-cash impact of accrued expenses related to our business optimization initiatives and the BCBSA Litigation.
Other significant changes in sources and uses of cash year-over-year included increases in cash used for acquisitions, net
purchases of investments and cash used for repurchase and retirement of common stock.
Financial Condition
We maintained a strong financial condition and liquidity position, with consolidated cash, cash equivalents and investments in
fixed maturity and equity securities of $31,295 at December 31, 2020. Since December 31, 2019, total cash, cash equivalents and
investments in fixed maturity and equity securities increased by $5,168, primarily due to cash generated from operations. This
increase was partially offset by cash used for common stock repurchases, acquisitions, purchases of property and equipment and
cash dividends paid to shareholders.
Many of our subsidiaries are subject to various government regulations that restrict the timing and amount of dividends and
other distributions that may be paid to their respective parent companies. Certain accounting practices prescribed by insurance
regulatory authorities, or statutory accounting practices, differ from GAAP. Changes that occur in statutory accounting practices, if
any, could impact our subsidiaries’ future dividend capacity. In addition, we have agreed to certain
-67-
undertakings to regulatory authorities, including the requirement to maintain certain capital levels in certain of our subsidiaries.
At December 31, 2020, we held $1,747 of cash, cash equivalents and investments at the parent company, which are available
for general corporate use, including investment in our businesses, acquisitions, potential future common stock repurchases and
dividends to shareholders, repurchases of debt securities and debt and interest payments. 
Debt
Periodically, we access capital markets and issue debt (“Notes”) for long-term borrowing purposes, for example, to refinance
debt, to finance acquisitions or for share repurchases. Certain of these Notes may have a call feature that allows us to redeem the
Notes at any time at our option and/or a put feature that allows a Note holder to redeem the Notes upon the occurrence of both a
change in control event and a downgrade of the Notes below an investment grade rating. For more information on our debt,
including redemptions and issuances, see Note 13, “Debt” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II,
Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We calculate our consolidated debt-to-capital ratio, a non-GAAP measure, from the amounts presented on our audited
consolidated balance sheets included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Our debt-to-capital ratio is calculated
as total debt divided by total debt plus total shareholders’ equity. Total debt is the sum of short-term borrowings, current portion of
long-term debt, long-term debt, less current portion, and lease liabilities. We believe our debt-to-capital ratio assists investors and
rating agencies in measuring our overall leverage and additional borrowing capacity. In addition, our bank covenants include a
maximum debt-to-capital ratio that we cannot and did not exceed. Our debt-to-capital ratio may not be comparable to similarly
titled measures reported by other companies. Our consolidated debt-to-capital ratio was 38.7% and 39.5% as of December 31, 2020
and 2019, respectively.
Our senior debt is rated “A” by S&P Global, “BBB” by Fitch Ratings, Inc., “Baa2” by Moody’s Investor Service, Inc. and
“bbb+” by AM Best Company, Inc. We intend to maintain our senior debt investment grade ratings. If our credit ratings are
downgraded, our business, financial condition and results of operations could be adversely impacted by limitations on future
borrowings and a potential increase in our borrowing costs.
Future Sources and Uses of Liquidity
We have a shelf registration statement on file with the SEC to register an unlimited amount of any combination of debt or
equity securities in one or more offerings. Specific information regarding terms and securities being offered will be provided at the
time of an offering. Proceeds from future offerings are expected to be used for general corporate purposes, including, but not
limited to, the repayment of debt, investments in or extensions of credit to our subsidiaries and the financing of possible
acquisitions or business expansions.
We have a senior revolving credit facility (the “5-Year Facility”) with a group of lenders for general corporate purposes. In
June 2019, we amended and restated the credit agreement for the 5-Year Facility to, among other things, extend the maturity date
from August 2020 to June 2024 and decrease the amount of credit available from $3,500 to $2,500. In June 2019, we also entered
into a 364-day senior revolving credit facility (the “364-Day Facility”) with a group of lenders for general corporate purposes,
which provides for credit in the amount of $1,000. In May 2020, we amended and extended the 364-Day Facility, which now
matures in June 2021. Our ability to borrow under these credit facilities is subject to compliance with certain covenants. We do not
believe the restrictions contained in these covenants materially affect our financial or operating flexibility. As of December 31,
2020, we were in compliance with all of our debt covenants. There were no amounts outstanding under the 5-Year Facility or the
364-Day Facility at December 31, 2020.
Through certain subsidiaries, we have entered into multiple 364-day lines of credit (the “Subsidiary Credit Facilities”) with
separate lenders for general corporate purposes. The Subsidiary Credit Facilities provide combined credit up to $300. Our ability to
borrow under the Subsidiary Credit Facilities is subject to compliance with certain covenants. At December 31, 2020, we had no
outstanding borrowings under the Subsidiary Credit Facilities.
We have a $3,500 commercial paper program, the proceeds of which may be used for general corporate purposes. Should
commercial paper issuance be unavailable, we have the ability to use a combination of cash on hand and/or our two senior
revolving credit facilities, which provide for combined credit in the amount of $3,500, to redeem any outstanding commercial
-68-
paper upon maturity. While there is no assurance in the current economic environment, we believe the lenders participating in our
credit facilities, if market conditions allow, would be willing to provide financing in accordance with their legal obligations. At
December 31, 2020, we had $250 outstanding under our commercial paper program.
We are a member, through certain subsidiaries, of the Federal Home Loan Bank of Indianapolis, the Federal Home Loan Bank
of Cincinnati, the Federal Home Loan Bank of Atlanta and the Federal Home Loan Bank of New York, collectively (the “FHLBs”).
As a member, we have the ability to obtain short-term cash advances, subject to certain minimum collateral requirements. At
December 31, 2020, we had no outstanding short-term borrowings from the FHLBs.
As discussed in “Financial Condition” above, many of our subsidiaries are subject to various government regulations that
restrict the timing and amount of dividends and other distributions that may be paid. Based upon these requirements, we currently
estimate that approximately $2,505 of dividends will be paid to the parent company during 2021. During 2020, we received $3,618
of dividends from our subsidiaries.
We regularly review the appropriate use of capital, including acquisitions, common stock and debt security repurchases and
dividends to shareholders. The declaration and payment of any dividends or repurchases of our common stock or debt is at the
discretion of our Board of Directors and depends upon our financial condition, results of operations, future liquidity needs,
regulatory and capital requirements and other factors deemed relevant by our Board of Directors.
On January 26, 2021, our Audit Committee declared a quarterly cash dividend to shareholders of $1.13 per share on the
outstanding shares of our common stock. This quarterly dividend is payable on March 25, 2021 to the shareholders of record as of
March 10, 2021.
Under our Board of Directors’ authorization, we maintain a common stock repurchase program. As of December 31, 2020, we
had Board authorization of $1,092 to repurchase our common stock. On January 26, 2021, our Audit Committee, pursuant to
authorization granted by the Board of Directors, authorized a $5,000 increase to our common stock repurchase program.
For additional information regarding our sources and uses of capital, see Note 5, “Investments,” Note 6, “Derivative Financial
Instruments,” Note 13, “Debt” and Note 15, “Capital Stock–Use of Capital–Dividends and Stock Repurchase Program” of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Contractual Obligations and Commitments
Our estimated contractual obligations and commitments as of December 31, 2020 are as follows:
  Payments Due by Period
TotalLess than
 1 Year 1-3 Years 3-5 YearsMore than
 5 Years
On-Balance Sheet:
Debt $ 31,066 $ 1,679 $ 3,953 $ 17,641 $ 7,793 
Operating leases, including imputed interest 982 197 336 213 236 
Investment commitments 20 11 7 1 1 
Other long-term liabilities 716 9 284 281 142 
Off-Balance Sheet:
Purchase obligations 5,761 975 3,143 1,523 120 
Operating leases, including imputed interest 139 6 24 24 85 
Investment commitments 1,320 270 448 61 541 
Total contractual obligations and commitments $ 40,004 $ 3,147 $ 8,195 $ 19,744 $ 8,918 
1 Includes estimated interest expense. 
2 See Note 18, “Leases,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.1 
2
3
4 
5
2
6
-69-
3 Represents low income housing tax credits.
4 Primarily consists of reserves for future policy benefits, projected other postretirement benefits, deferred compensation, supplemental
executive retirement plan liabilities and certain other miscellaneous long-term obligations. Estimated future payments for funded pension
benefits have been excluded from this table, as we had no funding requirements under ERISA at December 31, 2020 as a result of the value
of the assets in the plans.
5 Includes estimated payments for future services under contractual arrangements from third-party service contracts.
6 Includes unfunded capital commitments for alternative investments.
The above table does not contain $282 of gross liabilities for uncertain tax positions and interest for which we cannot
reasonably estimate the timing of the resolutions with the respective taxing authorities. For further information, see Note 8,
“Income Taxes,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
In addition to the contractual obligations and commitments discussed above, we have a variety of other contractual agreements
related to acquiring materials and services used in our operations. However, we do not believe these other agreements contain
material noncancelable commitments. 
We believe that funds from future operating cash flows, cash and investments and funds available under our senior revolving
credit facilities and/or from public or private financing sources will be sufficient for future operations and commitments, and for
capital acquisitions and other strategic transactions.
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements
We do not have any off-balance sheet derivative instruments, guarantee transactions, agreements or other contractual
arrangements or any indemnification agreements that will require funding in future periods. We have not transferred assets to an
unconsolidated entity that serves as credit, liquidity or market risk support to such entity. We do not hold any variable interest in an
unconsolidated entity where such entity provides us with financing, liquidity, market risk or credit risk support.
Risk-Based Capital
Our regulated subsidiaries’ states of domicile have statutory risk-based capital (“RBC”) requirements for health and other
insurance companies and HMOs largely based on the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (“NAIC”) Risk-Based
Capital (RBC) For Health Organizations Model Act (“RBC Model Act”). These RBC requirements are intended to measure capital
adequacy, taking into account the risk characteristics of an insurer’s investments and products. The NAIC sets forth the formula for
calculating the RBC requirements, which are designed to take into account asset risks, insurance risks, interest rate risks and other
relevant risks with respect to an individual insurance company’s business. In general, under the RBC Model Act, an insurance
company must submit a report of its RBC level to the state insurance department or insurance commissioner, as appropriate, at the
end of each calendar year. Our regulated subsidiaries’ respective RBC levels as of December 31, 2020, which was the most recent
date for which reporting was required, were in excess of all applicable mandatory RBC requirements. In addition to exceeding
these RBC requirements, we are in compliance with the liquidity and capital requirements for a licensee of the BCBSA and with
the tangible net worth requirements applicable to certain of our California subsidiaries.
For additional information, see Note 22, “Statutory Information,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included
in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. 
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK. 
(In Millions, Except As Otherwise Stated Herein)
As a result of our investing and borrowing activities, we are exposed to financial market risks, including those resulting from
changes in interest rates and changes in market valuations. Potential impacts discussed below are based upon sensitivity analyses
performed on our financial position as of December 31, 2020. Actual results could vary from these estimates. Our primary
objectives with our investment portfolio are to provide safety and preservation of capital, sufficient liquidity to meet cash flow
requirements, the integration of investment strategy with the business operations and an attainment of a competitive after-tax total
return.
-70-
Investments
Our investment portfolio is exposed to three primary sources of risk: credit quality risk, interest rate risk and market valuation
risk.
The primary risks associated with our fixed maturity securities, which are classified as available-for-sale, are credit quality risk
and interest rate risk. Credit quality risk is defined as the risk of a credit event, such as a ratings downgrade or default, to an
individual fixed maturity security and the potential loss attributable to that event. Credit quality risk is managed through our
investment policy, which establishes credit quality limitations on the overall portfolio as well as diversification and percentage
limits on securities of individual issuers. The result is a well-diversified portfolio of fixed maturity securities, with an average credit
rating of approximately “A.” Interest rate risk is defined as the potential for economic losses on fixed maturity securities due to a
change in market interest rates. Our fixed maturity portfolio is invested primarily in U.S. government securities, corporate bonds,
asset-backed bonds, mortgage-related securities and municipal bonds, all of which have exposure to changes in the level of market
interest rates. Interest rate risk is managed by maintaining asset duration within a band based upon our liabilities, operating
performance and liquidity needs. Additionally, we have the capability of holding any security to maturity, which would allow us to
realize full par value.
Investments in fixed maturity securities include corporate securities, which account for 45.4% of our total fixed maturity
securities at December 31, 2020 and are subject to credit/default risk. In a declining economic environment, corporate yields will
usually increase, prompted by concern over the ability of corporations to make interest payments, thus causing a decrease in the
price of corporate securities, and the decline in value of the corporate fixed maturity portfolio. We manage this risk through
fundamental credit analysis, diversification of issuers and industries and an average credit rating of our corporate fixed maturity
portfolio of approximately “BBB.”
Market risk for fixed maturity securities is addressed by actively managing the duration, allocation and diversification of our
investment portfolio. We have evaluated the impact on the fixed maturity portfolio’s fair value considering an immediate 100 basis
point change in interest rates. A 100 basis point increase in interest rates would result in an approximate $998 decrease in fair
value, whereas a 100 basis point decrease in interest rates would result in an approximate $1,039 increase in fair value. While we
classify our fixed maturity securities as “available-for-sale” for accounting purposes, we believe our cash flows and the duration of
our portfolio should allow us to hold securities to maturity, thereby avoiding the recognition of losses should interest rates rise
significantly.
Our equity portfolio is comprised of large capitalization and small capitalization domestic equities, foreign equities, exchange-
traded funds and index mutual funds. Our equity portfolio is subject to the volatility inherent in the stock market, driven by
concerns over economic conditions, earnings and sales growth, inflation, and consumer confidence. These systemic risks cannot be
managed through diversification alone. However, more routine risks, such as stock/industry specific risks, are managed by
investing in a diversified equity portfolio.
Our other invested assets, reported within our long-term investments, are primarily subject to private market exposures,
including private equity, real estate, and private credit investments. These investments are also indirectly subject to market
valuation risk, as public market valuations will form a basis for valuations for these investments. Given their illiquid nature, we
focus on appropriate sizing of these investments relative to our liquidity needs and risk tolerance. Our risk tolerance is formed by
the level of illiquidity and short-term price movements from market valuation risk we are willing to accept relative to the higher
long-term expected returns over the life of these investments.
As of December 31, 2020, 6.1% of our marketable investments were equity securities. An immediate 10% decrease in each
equity investment’s value, arising from market movement, would result in a fair value decrease of $156. Alternatively, an
immediate 10% increase in each equity investment’s value, attributable to the same factor, would result in a fair value increase of
$156.
For additional information regarding our investments, see Note 5, “Investments,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements included in Part II, Item 8 and “Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates - Investments” within Part II, Item 7
“Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” included in this Annual Report on
Form 10-K.
-71-
Long-Term Debt
Our total long-term debt at December 31, 2020 consisted of senior unsecured notes, convertible debentures, commercial paper
and subordinated surplus notes issued by one of our insurance subsidiaries. At December 31, 2020, the carrying value and
estimated fair value of our long-term debt was $20,035 and $24,269, respectively. This debt is subject to interest rate risk, as these
instruments have fixed interest rates and the fair value is affected by changes in market interest rates. Should interest rates increase
or decrease in the future, the estimated fair value of our fixed rate debt would decrease or increase accordingly.
For additional information regarding our long-term debt, see Note 7, “Fair Value” and Note 13, “Debt,” of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Derivatives
We have exposure to economic losses due to interest rate risk arising from changes in the level or volatility of interest rates. We
attempt to mitigate our exposure to interest rate risk through the use of derivative financial instruments. These strategies include the
use of interest rate swaps and forward contracts, which are used to lock-in interest rates or to hedge (on an economic basis) interest
rate risks associated with variable rate debt. We have used these types of instruments as designated hedges against specific
liabilities.
Changes in interest rates will affect the estimated fair value of these derivatives. As of December 31, 2020, we recorded a net
asset of $37, the estimated fair value of the swaps at that date. We have evaluated the impact on the interest rate swaps’ fair value
considering an immediate 100 basis point change in interest rates. A 100 basis point increase in interest rates would result in an
approximate $18 decrease in fair value, whereas a 100 basis point decrease in interest rates would result in an approximate $18
increase in fair value.
For additional information regarding our derivatives, see Note 6, “Derivative Financial Instruments” of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
-72-
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA.
 
ANTHEM, INC.
 CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 Years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
 Contents
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 74
Audited Consolidated Financial Statements:
Consolidated Balance Sheets 76
Consolidated Statements of Income 77
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 78
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 79
Consolidated Statements of Shareholders’ Equity 80
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 81
-73-
Report of Independent Register ed
Public Accounting Firm
To the Shareholders and the Board of Directors of Anthem, Inc.
 
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Anthem, Inc. (the Company) as of December 31, 2020 and 2019,
the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, shareholders’ equity, and cash flows for each of the three
years in the period ended December 31, 2020, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at
Item 15(c) (collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements
present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company at December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2020, in conformity with U.S. generally
accepted accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in
Internal Control—Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
(2013 framework), and our report dated February 18, 2021 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
 
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the
Company’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required
to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements,
whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test
basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the
accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current period audit of the financial statements that was
communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are
material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The
communication of the critical audit matter does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated financial statements, taken as a
whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the critical audit matter or
on the account or disclosures to which it relates.
-74-
Valuation of Incurred but Not Paid Claims
Description of the
MatterMedical claims payable was $11,359 million at December 31, 2020, a significant portion of which
related to the Company’s estimate for claims that are incurred but not paid. As discussed in Note 2 to the
consolidated financial statements, the Company’s liability for incurred but not paid claims is determined
using actuarial methods that include a number of factors and assumptions, including completion factors,
which represent the average percentage of total incurred claims that have been paid through a given date
after being incurred based on historical paid claims data, and trend factors, which represent an estimate
of claims expense based on recent claims expense levels and healthcare cost levels. There is significant
uncertainty inherent in determining management’s best estimate of completion and trend factors, which
are used to calculate actuarial estimates of incurred but not paid claims.
Auditing management’s estimate of incurred but not paid claims was complex and required the
involvement of our actuarial specialists due to the highly judgmental nature of the completion and trend
factor assumptions used in the valuation process. The significant judgment was primarily due to the
sensitivity of management’s best estimate of completion and trend factor assumptions, which have a
significant impact on the valuation of incurred but not paid claims.
How We Addressed
the Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of controls
over the Company’s actuarial process for estimating the liability for incurred but not paid claims. These
audit procedures included among others, testing management review controls over completion and trend
factor assumptions and the review and approval processes that management has in place for estimating
the liability for incurred but not paid claims.
To test the Company’s liability for incurred but not paid claims, our audit procedures included, among
others, testing the completeness and accuracy of the underlying claims and membership data recorded in
the source claims processing and disbursement systems to the data used by management in developing
completion and trend factor assumptions and agreeing a sample of incurred and paid claims to source
documentation. With the support of actuarial specialists, we analyzed the Company’s completion and
trend factor assumptions based on historical claim experience and emerging cost trends, and
independently calculated a range of reasonable reserve estimates for comparison to management’s best
estimate of the liability for incurred but not paid claims. Additionally, we performed a review of the prior
period liabilities for incurred but not paid claims to subsequent claims development.
                                    /s/ ERNST & YOUNG LLP
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1944.
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 18, 2021
 
-75-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets
December 31,
 2020December 31,
 2019
(In millions, except share data)   
Assets
Current assets:
Cash and cash equivalents $ 5,741 $ 4,937 
Fixed maturity securities, current (amortized cost of $22,222 and $19,021; allowance for credit losses of $7 and $0) 23,433 19,676 
Equity securities 1,559 1,009 
Premium receivables 5,279 5,014 
Self-funded receivables 2,849 2,570 
Other receivables 2,830 2,807 
Other current assets 4,060 3,020 
Total current assets 45,751 39,033 
Long-term investments:
Fixed maturity securities (amortized cost of $532 and $487; allowance for credit losses of $0 and $0) 562 505 
Other invested assets 4,285 4,258 
Property and equipment, net 3,483 3,133 
Goodwill 21,691 20,500 
Other intangible assets 9,405 8,674 
Other noncurrent assets 1,438 1,350 
Total assets $ 86,615 $ 77,453 
Liabilities and shareholders’ equity
Liabilities
Current liabilities:
Medical claims payable $ 11,359 $ 8,842 
Other policyholder liabilities 4,590 3,050 
Unearned income 1,259 1,017 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses 5,493 4,198 
Short-term borrowings — 700 
Current portion of long-term debt 700 1,598 
Other current liabilities 6,052 4,127 
Total current liabilities 29,453 23,532 
Long-term debt, less current portion 19,335 17,787 
Reserves for future policy benefits 794 759 
Deferred tax liabilities, net 2,019 2,227 
Other noncurrent liabilities 1,815 1,420 
Total liabilities 53,416 45,725 
Commitments and contingencies—Note 14
Shareholders’ equity
Preferred stock, without par value, shares authorized - 100,000,000; shares issued and outstanding - none — — 
Common stock, par value $0.01, shares authorized - 900,000,000; shares issued and outstanding - 245,401,430 and
252,922,161 3 3 
Additional paid-in capital 9,244 9,448 
Retained earnings 23,802 22,573 
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) 150 (296)
Total shareholders’ equity 33,199 31,728 
Total liabilities and shareholders’ equity $ 86,615 $ 77,453 
See accompanying notes.
-76-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Income
 Years Ended December 31
(In millions, except per share data) 2020 2019 2018
Revenues
Premiums $ 104,109 $ 94,173 $ 85,421 
Product revenue 10,384 2,760 — 
Administrative fees and other revenue 6,315 6,208 5,920 
Total operating revenue 120,808 103,141 91,341 
Net investment income 877 1,005 970 
Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments 182 67 (206)
Total revenues 121,867 104,213 92,105 
Expenses
Benefit expense 88,045 81,786 71,895 
Cost of products sold 8,953 1,992 — 
Selling, general and administrative expense 17,450 13,364 14,020 
Interest expense 784 746 753 
Amortization of other intangible assets 361 338 358 
Loss on extinguishment of debt 36 2 11 
Total expenses 115,629 98,228 87,037 
Income before income tax expense 6,238 5,985 5,068 
Income tax expense 1,666 1,178 1,318 
Net income $ 4,572 $ 4,807 $ 3,750 
Net income per share
Basic $ 18.23 $ 18.81 $ 14.53 
Diluted $ 17.98 $ 18.47 $ 14.19 
Dividends per share $ 3.80 $ 3.20 $ 3.00 
See accompanying notes.
-77-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Compr ehensive Income
 
 Years Ended December 31
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net income $ 4,572 $ 4,807 $ 3,750 
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax:
Change in net unrealized gains/losses on investments 428 680 (418)
Change in non-credit component of impairment losses on
investments — — (2)
Change in net unrealized gains/losses on cash flow hedges 12 (16) 37 
Change in net periodic pension and postretirement costs (1) 26 (90)
Foreign currency translation adjustments 7 — (1)
Other comprehensive income (loss) 446 690 (474)
Total comprehensive income $ 5,018 $ 5,497 $ 3,276 
 
See accompanying notes.
-78-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
 Years Ended December  31
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Operating activities
Net income $ 4,572  $ 4,807  $ 3,750  
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:
Net realized (gains) losses on financial instruments (182) (67) 206 
Depreciation and amortization 1,154  1,133  1,132  
Deferred income taxes (540) 81 91 
Impairment of property and equipment 198 — — 
Share-based compensation 283 294 226 
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:
Receivables, net (256) (1,053 ) (695)
Other invested assets (32) (48) (1)
Other assets (283) (170) (26)
Policy liabilities 3,528  1,826  (1,059 )
Unearned income 202 115 (36)
Accounts payable and other liabilities 1,978  (445) 97 
Income taxes 72 (325) 323 
Other , net (6) (87) (181)
Net cash pr ovided by operating activities 10,688  6,061  3,827  
Investing activities
Purchases of investments (19,492 ) (22,954 ) (9,671 )
Proceeds from sale of investments 11,318  18,598  9,662  
Maturities, calls and redemptions from investments 4,741  2,437  1,938  
Changes in securities lending collateral (849) 254 (149)
Purchases of subsidiaries, net of cash acquired (1,976 ) — (1,760 )
Purchases of property and equipment (1,021 ) (1,077 ) (1,208 )
Other , net (45) (50) (71)
Net cash used in investing activities (7,324 ) (2,792 ) (1,259 )
Financing activities
Net repayments of commercial paper borrowings (150) (297) (107)
Proceeds from long-term borrowings 2,484  2,473  835 
Repayments of long-term borrowings (1,932 ) (1,123 ) (1,684 )
Proceeds from short-term borrowings 970 7,590  9,120  
Repayments of short-term borrowings (1,670 ) (8,035 ) (9,250 )
Changes in securities lending payable 849 (254) 150 
Proceeds from issuance of common stock under Equity Units stock purchase contracts — — 1,250  
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (2,700 ) (1,701 ) (1,685 )
Cash dividends (954) (818) (776)
Proceeds from issuance of common stock under employee stock plans 176 187 173 
Taxes paid through withholding of common stock under employee stock plans (128) (84) (81)
Other , net 488 (204) (186)
Net cash used in financing activities (2,567 ) (2,266 ) (2,241 )
Effect of for eign exchange rates on cash and cash equivalents 7 — (2)
Change in cash and cash equivalents 804 1,003  325 
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of year 4,937  3,934  3,609  
Cash and cash equivalents at end of year $ 5,741  $ 4,937  $ 3,934  
See accompanying notes.
-79-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Shar eholders’ Equity
 Common Stock
Additional
 Paid-in
 CapitalAccumulated
 Other
 Comprehensive
 Income (Loss)Total
 Shareholders’
 Equity (In millions)Number
 of SharesPar
 ValueRetained
 Earnings
January 1, 2018 256.1  $ 3 $ 8,547  $ 18,374  $ (421)$ 26,503  
Net income — — — 3,750  — 3,750  
Other comprehensive loss — — — — (474) (474)
Issuance of common stock under Equity Units
stock purchase contracts 6.0 — 1,250  — — 1,250  
Premiums for and settlement of equity options — — 1 — — 1 
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (6.8) — (243) (1,442 ) — (1,685 )
Dividends and dividend equivalents — — — (785) — (785)
Issuance of common stock under employee stock
plans, net of related tax benefits 2.1 — 318 — — 318 
Convertible debenture conversions — — (337) — — (337)
Adoption of Accounting Standards Update No.
2018-02 — — — 91 (91) — 
December 31, 2018 257.4  3 9,536  19,988  (986) 28,541  
Adoption of Accounting Standards Update No.
2016-02 — — — 26 — 26 
January 1, 2019 257.4  3 9,536  20,014  (986) 28,567  
Net income — — — 4,807  — 4,807  
Other comprehensive income — — — — 690 690 
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (6.3) — (275) (1,426 ) — (1,701 )
Dividends and dividend equivalents — — — (822) — (822)
Issuance of common stock under employee stock
plans, net of related tax benefits 1.8 — 396 — — 396 
Convertible debenture conversions — — (209) — — (209)
December 31, 2019 252.9  3 9,448  22,573  (296) 31,728  
Adoption of Accounting Standards Update No.
2016-13 (Note 2) — — — (35) — (35)
January 1, 2020 252.9  3 9,448  22,538  (296) 31,693  
Net income — — — 4,572  — 4,572  
Other comprehensive income — — — — 446 446 
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (9.4) — (353) (2,347 ) — (2,700 )
Dividends and dividend equivalents — — — (961) — (961)
Issuance of common stock under employee stock
plans, net of related tax benefits 1.9 — 330 — — 330 
Convertible debenture repurchases and
conversions — — (181) — — (181)
December 31, 2020 245.4  $ 3 $ 9,244  $ 23,802  $ 150 $ 33,199  
See accompanying notes.
-80-
Anthem, Inc.
 
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
 
December 31, 2020
 
(In Millions, Except Per Share Data or As Otherwise Stated Herein)
1. Organization
References to the terms “we,” “our,” “us” or “Anthem” used throughout these Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
refer to Anthem, Inc., an Indiana corporation, and unless the context otherwise requires, its direct and indirect subsidiaries.
We are one of the largest health benefits companies in the United States in terms of medical membership, serving
approximately 43 medical members through our affiliated health plans as of December 31, 2020. We offer a broad spectrum of
network-based managed care plans to Large Group, Small Group, Individual, Medicaid and Medicare markets. Our managed care
plans include: Preferred Provider Organizations (“PPOs”); Health Maintenance Organizations (“HMOs”); Point-of-Service plans;
traditional indemnity plans and other hybrid plans, including Consumer-Driven Health Plans; and hospital only and limited benefit
products. In addition, we provide a broad array of managed care services to self-funded customers, including claims processing,
stop loss insurance, actuarial services, provider network access, medical cost management, disease management, wellness programs
and other administrative services. We provide an array of specialty and other insurance products and services such as pharmacy
benefits management (“PBM”), dental, vision, life and disability insurance benefits, radiology benefit management and analytics-
driven personal healthcare. We also provide services to the federal government in connection with our Federal Health Products &
Services business, which administers the Federal Employees Health Benefits (“FEHB”) Program.
We are an independent licensee of the Blue Cross and Blue Shield Association (“BCBSA”), an association of independent
health benefit plans. We serve our members as the Blue Cross licensee for California and as the Blue Cross and Blue Shield
(“BCBS”) licensee for Colorado, Connecticut, Georgia, Indiana, Kentucky, Maine, Missouri (excluding 30 counties in the Kansas
City area), Nevada, New Hampshire, New York (in the New York City metropolitan area and upstate New York), Ohio, Virginia
(excluding the Northern Virginia suburbs of Washington, D.C.) and Wisconsin. In a majority of these service areas, we do business
as Anthem Blue Cross, Anthem Blue Cross and Blue Shield, and Empire Blue Cross Blue Shield or Empire Blue Cross. We also
conduct business through arrangements with other BCBS licensees as well as other strategic partners. Through our subsidiaries, we
also serve customers in numerous states across the country as AIM Specialty Health, Amerigroup, Aspire Health, Beacon,
CareMore, Freedom Health, HealthLink, HealthSun, Optimum HealthCare, Simply Healthcare, and/or UniCare. Also, in the second
quarter of 2019, we began providing PBM services through our IngenioRx subsidiary. We are licensed to conduct insurance
operations in all 50 states and the District of Columbia through our subsidiaries.
2. Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies
Basis of Presentation: The accompanying consolidated financial statements include the accounts of Anthem and its
subsidiaries and have been prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”). All significant
intercompany accounts and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation.
Certain of our subsidiaries operate outside of the United States and have functional currencies other than the U.S. dollar
(“USD”). We translate the assets and liabilities of those subsidiaries to USD using the exchange rate in effect at the end of the
period. We translate the revenues and expenses of those subsidiaries to USD using the average exchange rates in effect during the
period. The net effect of these translation adjustments is included in “Foreign currency translation adjustments” in our consolidated
statements of comprehensive income.
Reclassifications: Certain prior year amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation.
-81-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Use of Estimates: The preparation of consolidated financial statements in conformity with GAAP requires us to make
estimates and assumptions that affect the amounts reported in our consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes.
Actual results could differ from those estimates.
Cash and Cash Equivalents: Cash and cash equivalents includes available cash and all highly liquid investments with
maturities of three months or less when purchased. We control a number of bank accounts that are used exclusively to hold
customer funds for the administration of customer benefits, and we have cash and cash equivalents on deposit to meet certain
regulatory requirements. These amounts totaled $170 and $215 at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, and are included in
the cash and cash equivalents line on our consolidated balance sheets.
Investments: We classify fixed maturity securities in our investment portfolio as “available-for-sale” and report those
securities at fair value. Certain fixed maturity securities are available to support current operations and, accordingly, we classify
such investments as current assets without regard to their contractual maturity. Investments used to satisfy contractual, regulatory or
other requirements are classified as long-term, without regard to contractual maturity.
Prior to 2020, our fixed maturity securities were evaluated for other-than-temporary impairment where credit-related
impairments were presented within the other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in our consolidated statements of
income with an adjustment to the security’s amortized cost basis. Effective January 1, 2020, if a fixed maturity security is in an
unrealized loss position and we have the intent to sell the fixed maturity security, or it is more likely than not that we will have to
sell the fixed maturity security before recovery of its amortized cost basis, we write down the fixed maturity security’s cost basis to
fair value and record an impairment loss in our consolidated statements of income. For impaired fixed maturity securities that we
do not intend to sell or if it is more likely than not that we will not have to sell such securities, but we expect that we will not fully
recover the amortized cost basis, we recognize the credit component of the impairment as an allowance for credit loss in our
consolidated balance sheets and record an impairment loss in our consolidated statements of income. The non-credit component of
the impairment is recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income. Furthermore, unrealized losses entirely caused by non-
credit-related factors related to fixed maturity securities for which we expect to fully recover the amortized cost basis continue to be
recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income.
The credit component of an impairment is determined primarily by comparing the net present value of projected future cash
flows with the amortized cost basis of the fixed maturity security. The net present value is calculated by discounting our best
estimate of projected future cash flows at the effective interest rate implicit in the fixed maturity security at the date of purchase.
For mortgage-backed and asset-backed securities, cash flow estimates are based on assumptions regarding the underlying collateral,
including prepayment speeds, vintage, type of underlying asset, geographic concentrations, default rates, recoveries and changes in
value. For all other securities, cash flow estimates are driven by assumptions regarding probability of default, including changes in
credit ratings and estimates regarding timing and amount of recoveries associated with a default.
For asset-backed securities included in fixed maturity securities, we recognize income using an effective yield based on
anticipated prepayments and the estimated economic life of the securities. When estimates of prepayments change, the effective
yield is recalculated to reflect actual payments to date and anticipated future payments. The net investment in the securities is
adjusted to the amount that would have existed had the new effective yield been applied since the purchase date of the securities.
Such adjustments are reported within net investment income.
In accordance with the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) guidance, the changes in fair value of our marketable
equity securities are recognized in our results of operations within net realized gains and losses on financial instruments.
We have corporate-owned life insurance policies on certain participants in our deferred compensation plans and other members
of management. The cash surrender value of the corporate-owned life insurance policies is reported under the caption “Other
invested assets” in our consolidated balance sheets.
We use the equity method of accounting for investments in companies in which our ownership interest may enable us to
influence the operating or financial decisions of the investee company. Our proportionate share of equity in net income of these
unconsolidated affiliates is reported within net investment income. The equity method investments are reported under the caption
“Other invested assets” in our consolidated balance sheets.
-82-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Investment income is recorded when earned. All securities sold resulting in investment gains and losses are recorded on the
trade date. Realized gains and losses are determined on the basis of the cost or amortized cost of the specific securities sold.
We participate in securities lending programs whereby marketable securities in our investment portfolio are transferred to
independent brokers or dealers in exchange for cash and securities collateral. Under FASB guidance related to accounting for
transfers and servicing of financial assets and extinguishments of liabilities, we recognize the collateral as an asset, which is
reported as securities lending collateral on our consolidated balance sheets, and we record a corresponding liability for the
obligation to return the collateral to the borrower, which is reported as securities lending payable. The securities on loan are
reported in the applicable investment category on our consolidated balance sheets. Unrealized gains or losses on securities lending
collateral are included in accumulated other comprehensive income as a separate component of shareholders’ equity. The market
value of loaned securities and that of the collateral pledged can fluctuate in non-synchronized fashions. To the extent the loaned
securities’ value appreciates faster or depreciates slower than the value of the collateral pledged, we are exposed to the risk of the
shortfall. As a primary mitigating mechanism, the loaned securities and collateral pledged are marked to market on a daily basis and
the shortfall, if any, is collected accordingly. Secondarily, the collateral level is set at 102% of the value of the loaned securities,
which provides a cushion before any shortfall arises. The investment of the cash collateral is subject to market risk, which is
managed by limiting the investments to higher quality and shorter duration instruments.
Receivables: Receivables are reported net of amounts for expected credit losses. The allowance for doubtful accounts is based
on historical collection trends, future forecasts and our judgment regarding the ability to collect specific accounts.
Premium receivables include the uncollected amounts from insured groups, individuals and government programs. Premium
receivables are reported net of an allowance for doubtful accounts of $146 and $237 at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Self-funded receivables include administrative fees, claims and other amounts due from self-funded customers. Self-funded
receivables are reported net of an allowance for doubtful accounts of $54 and $46 at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Other receivables include pharmacy rebates, provider advances, claims recoveries, reinsurance receivables, proceeds due from
brokers on investment trades, other government receivables and other miscellaneous amounts due to us. These receivables are
reported net of an allowance for doubtful accounts of $374 and $242 at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Income Taxes: We file a consolidated income tax return. Deferred income tax assets and liabilities are recognized for
temporary differences between the financial statement and tax return basis of assets and liabilities based on enacted tax rates and
laws. The deferred tax benefits of the deferred tax assets are recognized to the extent realization of such benefits is more likely than
not. Deferred income tax expense or benefit generally represents the net change in deferred income tax assets and liabilities during
the year, excluding the impact from amounts initially recorded for business combinations, if any, and amounts recorded to
accumulated other comprehensive income. Current income tax expense represents the tax consequences of revenues and expenses
currently taxable or deductible on various income tax returns for the year reported.
We account for income tax contingencies in accordance with FASB guidance that contains a model to address uncertainty in
tax positions and clarifies the accounting for income taxes by prescribing a minimum recognition threshold, which all income tax
positions must achieve before being recognized in the financial statements.
Property and Equipment: Property and equipment is recorded at cost, net of accumulated depreciation. Depreciation is
computed principally by the straight-line method over estimated useful lives ranging from fifteen to thirty-nine years for buildings
and improvements, three to five years for computer equipment and software, and the lesser of the remaining life of the building
lease, if any, or seven years for furniture and other equipment. Leasehold improvements are depreciated over the term of the related
lease. Certain costs related to the development or purchase of internal-use software are capitalized and amortized over estimated
useful lives ranging from five to ten years.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets: FASB guidance requires business combinations to be accounted for using the
acquisition method of accounting, and it also specifies the types of acquired intangible assets that are required to be
-83-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
recognized and reported separately from goodwill. Goodwill represents the excess of the cost of acquisition over the fair value of
net assets acquired. Other intangible assets represent the values assigned to customer relationships, provider and hospital networks,
Blue Cross and Blue Shield and other trademarks, licenses and other agreements, such as non-compete. Goodwill and other
intangible assets are allocated to reportable segments based on the relative fair value of the components of the businesses acquired.
Goodwill and other intangible assets with indefinite lives are not amortized but are tested for impairment at least annually.
Goodwill and other intangible assets are allocated to reporting units for purposes of the annual goodwill impairment test. Other
intangible assets with indefinite lives, such as trademarks, are tested for impairment separately. We complete our annual
impairment tests of existing goodwill and other intangible assets with indefinite lives during the fourth quarter of each year. Our
impairment tests require us to make assumptions and judgments regarding the estimated fair value of our reporting units, including
goodwill and other intangible assets with indefinite lives. Certain interim impairment tests are also performed when potential
impairment indicators exist or changes in our business or other triggering events occur.
FASB guidance allows for qualitative assessments of whether it is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is
less than its carrying amount for purposes of a goodwill impairment analysis and whether it is more likely than not that an
indefinite-lived intangible asset is impaired for purposes of an indefinite-lived intangible asset impairment analysis. Estimated fair
values developed based on our assumptions and judgments might be different if other reasonable assumptions and estimates were to
be used. Qualitative analysis involves assessing situations and developments that could affect key drivers used to evaluate whether
the fair value of our goodwill and indefinite-lived intangible assets are impaired. Our procedures include assessing our financial
performance, macroeconomic conditions, industry and market considerations, various asset specific factors, and entity specific
events.
Quantitative analysis must be performed if qualitative analyses are not conclusive. Entities also have the option to bypass the
assessment of qualitative factors and proceed directly to performing quantitative analyses. Fair value for purposes of a quantitative
goodwill impairment test is calculated using a blend of the projected income and market valuation approaches. The projected
income approach is developed using assumptions about future revenue, expenses and net income derived from our internal planning
process. Our assumed discount rate is based on our industry’s weighted-average cost of capital and reflects volatility associated
with the cost of equity capital. Market valuations include market comparisons to publicly traded companies in our industry and are
based on observed multiples of certain measures including revenue; earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization
(“EBITDA”); and book value of invested capital.
A goodwill impairment loss is recognized to the extent that the carrying amount exceeds the asset’s fair value. This
determination is made at the reporting unit level and consists of one step. The fair value of a reporting unit is determined and
compared to its carrying amount. If the carrying amount of a reporting unit exceeds its fair value, an impairment loss is recognized.
This goodwill impairment loss is equal to the excess of the reporting unit’s carrying amount over its fair value.
Fair value for purposes of a quantitative impairment test for indefinite-lived intangible assets is estimated using a projected
income approach. We recognize an impairment loss when the estimated fair value of indefinite-lived intangible assets is less than
the carrying value. If significant impairment indicators are noted relative to other intangible assets subject to amortization, we may
be required to record impairment losses against future income.
Derivative Financial Instruments: We primarily invest in the following types of derivative financial instruments: interest rate
swaps, futures, forward contracts, put and call options, swaptions, embedded derivatives and warrants. Derivatives embedded
within non-derivative instruments, such as options embedded in convertible fixed maturity securities, are bifurcated from the host
instrument when the embedded derivative is not clearly and closely related to the host instrument. Our use of derivatives is limited
by statutes and regulations promulgated by the various regulatory bodies to which we are subject, and by our own derivative policy.
Our derivative use is generally limited to hedging purposes, on an economic basis, and we generally do not use derivative
instruments for speculative purposes.
We have exposure to economic losses due to interest rate risk arising from changes in the level or volatility of interest rates. We
attempt to mitigate our exposure to interest rate risk through active portfolio management, including rebalancing our existing
portfolios of assets and liabilities, as well as changing the characteristics of investments to be purchased or sold in the future. In
addition, derivative financial instruments are used to modify the interest rate exposure of certain liabilities or forecasted
transactions. These strategies include the use of interest rate swaps and forward contracts, which are used to lock-
-84-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
in interest rates or to hedge, on an economic basis, interest rate risks associated with variable rate debt. We have used these types of
instruments as designated hedges against specific liabilities.
All investments in derivatives are recorded as assets or liabilities at fair value. If certain correlation, hedge effectiveness and
risk reduction criteria are met, a derivative may be specifically designated as a hedge of exposure to changes in fair value or cash
flow. The accounting for changes in the fair value of a derivative depends on the intended use of the derivative and the nature of
any hedge designation thereon. Amounts excluded from the assessment of hedge effectiveness, if any, are reported in results of
operations immediately. If the derivative is not designated as a hedge, the gain or loss resulting from the change in the fair value of
the derivative is recognized in results of operations in the period of change. Cash flows associated with the settlement of non-
designated derivatives are shown on a net basis in investing activity in our consolidated statements of cash flow.
From time to time, we may also purchase derivatives to hedge, on an economic basis, our exposure to foreign currency
exchange fluctuations associated with the operations of certain of our subsidiaries. We generally use futures or forward contracts
for these transactions. We generally do not designate these contracts as hedges and, accordingly, the changes in fair value of these
derivatives are recognized in results of operations immediately.
Credit exposure associated with non-performance by the counterparties to derivative instruments is generally limited to the
uncollateralized fair value of the asset related to instruments recognized in the consolidated balance sheets. We attempt to mitigate
the risk of non-performance by selecting counterparties with high credit ratings and monitoring their creditworthiness and by
diversifying derivatives among multiple counterparties. At December 31, 2020, we believe there were no material concentrations of
credit risk with any individual counterparty.
We generally enter into master netting agreements, which reduce credit risk by permitting net settlement of transactions with
the same counterparty. Certain of our derivative agreements also contain credit support provisions that require us or the
counterparty to post collateral if there are declines in the derivative fair value or our credit rating. The derivative assets and
derivative liabilities are reported at their fair values net of collateral and netting by the counterparty.
Retirement Benefits: We recognize the funded status of pension and other postretirement benefit plans on the consolidated
balance sheets based on fiscal-year-end measurements of plan assets and benefit obligations. Prepaid pension benefits represent
prepaid costs related to defined benefit pension plans and are reported with other noncurrent assets. Postretirement benefits
represent outstanding obligations for retiree medical, life, vision and dental benefits. Liabilities for pension and other
postretirement benefits are reported with current and noncurrent liabilities based on the amount by which the actuarial present value
of benefits payable in the next twelve months included in the benefit obligation exceeds the fair value of plan assets.
We determine the expected return on plan assets using the calculated value of plan assets, which recognizes changes in the fair
value of plan assets in a systematic manner over three years. We apply a corridor approach to amortize unrecognized actuarial gains
or losses. Under this approach, only accumulated net actuarial gains or losses in excess of 10% of the greater of the projected
benefit obligation or the fair value of plan assets are amortized over the average remaining service or lifetime of the workforce as a
component of net periodic benefit cost.
The discount rate reflects the current rate at which the pension liabilities could be effectively settled at the end of the year
based on our most recent measurement date. We use the annual spot rate approach for setting our discount rate. Under the spot rate
approach, individual spot rates from a full yield curve of published rates are used to discount each plan’s cash flows to determine
the plan’s obligations.
The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of other postretirement benefits are based on an
initial assumed healthcare cost trend rate declining to an ultimate healthcare cost trend rate over a select number of years.
Medical Claims Payable: Liabilities for medical claims payable include estimated provisions for incurred but not paid claims
on an undiscounted basis, as well as estimated provisions for expenses related to the processing of claims. Incurred but not paid
claims include (1) an estimate for claims that are incurred but not reported, as well as claims reported to us but not yet processed
through our systems; and (2) claims reported to us and processed through our systems but not yet paid.
-85-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Liabilities for both claims incurred but not reported and reported but not yet processed through our systems are determined in
the aggregate, employing actuarial methods that are commonly used by health insurance actuaries and meet Actuarial Standards of
Practice. Actuarial Standards of Practice require that the claim liabilities be appropriate under moderately adverse circumstances.
We determine the amount of the liability for incurred but not paid claims by following a detailed actuarial process that uses both
historical claim payment patterns as well as emerging medical cost trends to project our best estimate of claim liabilities. Under this
process, historical paid claims data is formatted into “claim triangles,” which compare claim incurred dates to the dates of claim
payments. This information is analyzed to create “completion factors” that represent the average percentage of total incurred claims
that have been paid through a given date after being incurred. Completion factors are applied to claims paid through the period-end
date to estimate the ultimate claim expense incurred for the period. Actuarial estimates of incurred but not paid claim liabilities are
then determined by subtracting the actual paid claims from the estimate of the ultimate incurred claims. 
For the most recent incurred months (typically the most recent two months), the percentage of claims paid for claims incurred
in those months is generally low. This makes the completion factor methodology less reliable for such months. Therefore, incurred
claims for recent months are not projected from historical completion and payment patterns; rather, they are projected by estimating
the claims expense for those months based on recent claims expense levels and healthcare trend levels (“trend factors”).
We regularly review and set assumptions regarding cost trends and utilization when initially establishing claim liabilities. We
continually monitor and adjust the claims liability and benefit expense based on subsequent paid claims activity. If it is determined
that our assumptions regarding cost trends and utilization are materially different than actual results, our income statement and
financial position could be impacted in future periods.
Premium deficiencies are recognized when it is probable that expected claims and administrative expenses will exceed future
premiums on existing medical insurance contracts without consideration of investment income. Determination of premium
deficiencies for longer duration life and disability contracts includes consideration of investment income. For purposes of premium
deficiencies, contracts are deemed to be either short or long duration and are grouped in a manner consistent with our method of
acquiring, servicing and measuring the profitability of such contracts. Once established, premium deficiencies are released
commensurate with actual claims experience over the remaining life of the contract. No premium deficiencies were established at
December 31, 2020 or 2019.
Benefit expense includes incurred medical claims as well as quality improvement expenses for our fully-insured members.
Quality improvement activities are those designed to improve member health outcomes, prevent hospital readmissions and improve
patient safety. They also include expenses for wellness and health promotion provided to our members.
Reserves for Future Policy Benefits: Reserves for future policy benefits include liabilities for life and long-term disability
insurance policy benefits based upon interest, mortality and morbidity assumptions from published actuarial tables, modified based
upon our experience. Future policy benefits also include liabilities for insurance policies for which some of the premiums received
in earlier years are intended to pay anticipated benefits to be incurred in future years. Future policy benefits are continually
monitored and reviewed, and when reserves are adjusted, differences are reflected in benefit expense.
The current portion of reserves for future policy benefits relates to the portion of such reserves that we expect to pay within
one year. We believe that our liabilities for future policy benefits, along with future premiums received, are adequate to satisfy our
ultimate benefit liability; however, these estimates are inherently subject to a number of variable circumstances. Consequently, the
actual results could differ materially from the amounts recorded in our consolidated financial statements.
 Other Policyholder Liabilities: Other policyholder liabilities include rate stabilization reserves associated with retrospectively
rated insurance contracts and certain case-specific reserves. Other policyholder liabilities also include liabilities for premium
refunds based upon the minimum medical loss ratio (“MLR”), the relative health risk of members, and other contractual or
regulatory requirements. Rate stabilization reserves represent accumulated premiums that exceed what customers owe us based on
actual claim experience. The timing of payment of these retrospectively rated refunds is based on the contractual terms with our
customers and can vary from period to period based on the specific contractual requirements.
We are required to meet certain minimum MLR thresholds prescribed by the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and
the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, as amended (collectively the “ACA”). If we do not meet or
-86-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
exceed the minimum MLR thresholds specified by the ACA, we are required to pay rebates to certain customers. Minimum MLR
rebates are calculated by subsidiary, state and applicable line of business (Large Group, Small Group, Individual and Medicare) in
accordance with regulations issued by the Department of Health and Human Services (“HHS”). Such calculations are made using
estimated calendar year medical loss expense and premiums, as defined by HHS.
We follow HHS guidelines for determining the types of expenses that may be included in our minimum MLR rebate
calculations, which differ from benefit expense and premiums as reported in our consolidated financial statements prepared in
conformity with GAAP. Certain amounts reported as expense in our consolidated GAAP financial statements may be reported as a
reduction of premiums in accordance with HHS regulations. In addition, profit amounts included in our payments to third-party
administrative service providers are recorded as benefit expense in our consolidated GAAP financial statements, while HHS does
not allow for the inclusion of these expenses within the medical loss expense for purposes of calculating minimum MLR.
Revenue Recognition: Premiums for fully-insured contracts are recognized as revenue over the period insurance coverage is
provided, and, if applicable, net of amounts recognized for MLR rebates, risk adjustment, reinsurance and risk corridor under
contractual premium stabilization arrangements, the ACA or other regulatory requirements. Premium payments from contracted
government agencies are based on eligibility lists produced by the government agencies. Premiums related to the unexpired
contractual coverage periods are reflected in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets as unearned income. Premiums include
revenue adjustments for retrospectively rated contracts where revenue is based on the estimated loss experience of the contract.
Premium rates for certain lines of business are subject to approval by the Department of Insurance of each respective state.
Additionally, delays in annual premium rate changes from contracted government agencies require that we defer the recognition of
any increases to the period in which the premium rates become final. The value of the impact can be significant in the period in
which it is recognized depending on the magnitude of the premium rate increase, the membership to which it applies and the length
of the delay between the effective date of the rate increase and the final contract date. Premium rate decreases are recognized in the
period the change in premium rate becomes effective and the change in the rate is known, which may be prior to the period when
the contract amendment affecting the rate is finalized.
Administrative fees and other revenue include revenue from certain group contracts that provide for the group to be at risk for
all, or with supplemental insurance arrangements, a portion, of their claims experience. We charge these self-funded groups an
administrative fee, which is based on the number of members in a group or the group’s claim experience. In addition,
administrative fees and other revenue include amounts received for the administration of Medicare or certain other government
programs. Under our self-funded arrangements, revenue is recognized as administrative services are performed. All benefit
payments under these programs are excluded from benefit expense.
Product revenue includes revenue for services performed by our IngenioRx PBM for unaffiliated PBM customers. Unaffiliated
PBM customers include our self-funded groups that have contracted with IngenioRx for PBM services and, beginning on January 1,
2020, third-party health plans. Product revenues and costs of goods sold for our affiliated health plans are eliminated in
consolidation. Product revenue for PBM services is recognized using the gross method at the negotiated contract price when
IngenioRx has concluded that it is the principal and it controls the services before prescription drugs are transferred to the customer.
IngenioRx determined it is the principal due to its contractual rights to design and develop a listing of prescription drugs offered to
the customer (formulary management); its control over establishing the pharmacy network available to the customer to have its
prescription fulfilled (network management); and its discretion over establishing the pricing for prescription drugs. Overall, control
over these activities indicate IngenioRx is primarily responsible for fulfilling the promise to provide PBM services. Product
revenue includes ingredient costs (net of any rebates or discounts), including any co-payments made by or on behalf of the
customer, and administrative fees. IngenioRx recognizes revenue when control of the prescription drugs is transferred to customers,
in an amount it expects to be entitled to in exchange for the products or services provided.
For our non-fully-insured contracts, we had no material contract assets, contract liabilities or deferred contract costs recorded
on our consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2020. Revenue recognized in 2020 and 2019 from performance obligations
related to prior years, such as due to changes in transaction price, was not material. For contracts that have an original expected
duration of greater than one year, revenue expected to be recognized in future periods related to unfulfilled contractual performance
obligations and contracts with variable consideration related to undelivered performance obligations is not material.
-87-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Cost of Products Sold: IngenioRx’s cost of products sold includes the cost of prescription drugs dispensed to unaffiliated PBM
customers (net of rebates or discounts). This cost includes any co-payments made by or on behalf of the customer. Cost of products
sold also includes per-claim administrative fees for prescription fulfillment by its vendor and certain IngenioRx direct costs related
to sales and administration of customer contracts.
Share-Based Compensation: Our current compensation philosophy provides for share-based compensation, including stock
options, restricted stock awards and an employee stock purchase plan. Stock options are granted for a fixed number of shares with
an exercise price at least equal to the fair value of the shares at the date of the grant. Restricted stock awards are issued at the fair
value of the stock on the grant date. The employee stock purchase plan allows for a purchase price per share which is 90% of the
fair value of a share of common stock on the lower of the first or last trading day of the plan quarter. The employee stock purchase
plan discount is recognized as compensation expense based on GAAP guidance. All other share-based payments to employees are
recognized as compensation expense in our consolidated statements of income based on their fair values. Additionally, excess tax
benefits, which result from actual tax benefits realized when awards vest or options are exercised exceeding deferred tax benefits
previously recognized based on grant date fair value, are recognized as tax benefits in the income statement. Our share-based
employee compensation plans and assumptions are described in Note 15, “Capital Stock.”
Advertising and Marketing Costs: We use print, broadcast and other advertising to promote our products and to develop our
corporate image. We market our products through direct marketing activities and an extensive network of independent agents,
brokers and retail partnerships for Individual and Medicare customers, and for certain Local Group customers with a smaller
employee base. Products for National Accounts and Local Group customers with a larger employee base are generally sold through
independent brokers or consultants retained by the customer who work with industry specialists from our in-house sales force. In
the Individual and Small Group markets, we offer products through state or federally facilitated marketplaces, or public exchanges,
and off-exchange products. The cost of advertising and marketing for product promotion is expensed as incurred, while advertising
and marketing costs associated with our corporate image are expensed when first aired. Total advertising and marketing expense
was $558, $467 and $385 for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Health Insurance Provider Fee: The ACA imposed an annual Health Insurance Provider Fee (“HIP Fee”) on health insurers
that write certain types of health insurance on U.S. risks, which has been permanently repealed effective January 1, 2021. The HIP
Fee was allocated to health insurers based on the ratio of the amount of an insurer’s net premium revenues written during the
preceding calendar year to the amount of health insurance premium for all U.S. health risk for those certain lines of business
written during the preceding calendar year. We recorded our estimated liability for the HIP Fee in full at the beginning of the year
with a corresponding deferred asset that was amortized on a straight-line basis to selling, general and administrative expense. The
final calculation and payment of the annual HIP Fee was due by September 30 of each fee year. The HIP Fee was non-deductible
for federal income tax purposes. Our affected products were priced to cover the increased selling, general and administrative and
income tax expenses associated with the HIP Fee when it was in effect. The total amount due from allocations to health insurers
was $14,300 for 2018. The HIP Fee was suspended for 2019, resumed and increased to $15,523 for 2020 and has been permanently
eliminated beginning in 2021. For the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2018, we recognized $1,570 and $1,544, respectively, as
selling, general and administrative expense related to the HIP Fee. There was no corresponding expense for 2019 due to the
suspension of the HIP Fee for 2019.
Leases: We lease office space and certain computer and related equipment under noncancelable operating leases. We determine
whether an arrangement is or contains a lease at its inception. We recognize lease liabilities based on the present value of the
minimum lease payments not yet paid by using the lease term, any amounts probable of being owed under any residual value
guarantees and the discount rate determined at lease commencement. As our leases do not generally provide an implicit rate, we use
our incremental secured borrowing rate commensurate with the underlying lease terms to determine the present value of our lease
payments. Our lease liabilities may include amounts for options to extend or terminate a lease when it is reasonably certain that we
will exercise that option. We recognize operating right-of-use (“ROU”) assets at an amount equal to the lease liability adjusted for
prepaid or accrued rent, the remaining balance of any lease incentives and unamortized initial direct costs.
The operating lease liabilities are reported in other current liabilities and other noncurrent liabilities and the related ROU assets
are reported in other noncurrent assets on our consolidated balance sheets. Lease expense for our operating leases is calculated on a
straight-line basis over the lease term and is reported in selling, general and administrative expense on ourth
-88-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
consolidated statements of income. For our office space leases, we account for the lease and non-lease components (such as
common area maintenance) as a single lease component. We also do not recognize a lease liability or ROU asset for our office
space leases whose lease terms, at commencement, are twelve months or less and that do not include a purchase option or option to
extend that we are reasonably certain to exercise.
We assess our ROU assets for impairment when there are indicators and compare the carrying amount of the ROU asset to its
estimated undiscounted future cash flows. If the estimated undiscounted future cash flows are less than the carrying amount of the
ROU asset, an impairment calculation is performed. An impairment loss is recorded for the difference of the ROU asset’s carrying
value that exceeds its estimated discounted cash flows. During 2020, we recorded $258 for impairment and abandonment of ROU
assets. See Note 18, “Leases” for additional information about the ROU asset impairment and abandonment charges.
Earnings per Share: Earnings per share amounts, on a basic and diluted basis, have been calculated based upon the weighted-
average common shares outstanding for the period.
Basic earnings per share excludes dilution and is computed by dividing income available to common shareholders by the
weighted-average number of common shares outstanding for the period. Diluted earnings per share may include the dilutive effect
of stock options, restricted stock, convertible debentures and Equity Units, using the treasury stock method. See Note 13, “Debt,”
for a description of our Equity Units. The treasury stock method assumes exercise of stock options and vesting of restricted stock,
with the assumed proceeds used to purchase common stock at the average market price for the period. The difference between the
number of shares assumed issued and number of shares assumed purchased represents the dilutive shares.
Recently Adopted Accounting Guidance: The FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2021-01, Reference Rate
Reform (Topic 848) (“ASU 2021-01”) in January 2021, and Accounting Standards Update No. 2020-04, Reference Rate Reform
(Topic 848): Facilitation of the Effects of Reference Rate Reform on Financial Reporting (“ASU 2020-04”) in March 2020. ASU
2021-01 and ASU 2020-04 provide optional expedients and exceptions for applying GAAP to contract modifications and hedging
relationships, subject to meeting certain criteria, that reference the London Interbank Offered Rate (“LIBOR”) or another reference
rate expected to be discontinued because of the reference rate reform. The provisions must be applied at a Topic, Subtopic, or
Industry Subtopic level for all transactions other than derivatives, which may be applied at a hedging relationship level. We adopted
ASU 2021-01 on January 7, 2021 and ASU 2020-04 on November 2, 2020, and the adoptions did not have an impact on our
consolidated financial position, results of operations or cash flows.
In November 2019, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2019-11, Codification Improvements to Topic 326,
Financial Instruments—Credit Losses. In May 2019, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2019-05, Financial
Instruments—Credit Losses (Topic 326): Targeted Transition Relief. In April 2019, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update
No. 2019-04, Codification Improvements to Topic 326, Financial Instruments—Credit Losses, Topic 815, Derivatives and Hedging,
and Topic 825, Financial Instruments. In November 2018, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-19,
Codification Improvements to Topic 326, Financial Instruments—Credit Losses. These updates provide an option to irrevocably
elect to measure certain individual financial assets at fair value instead of amortized cost and provide additional clarification and
implementation guidance on certain aspects of the previously issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-13, Financial
Instruments—Credit Losses (Topic 326): Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments (“ASU 2016-13") and have the
same effective date and transition requirements as ASU 2016-13. ASU 2016-13 introduces a current expected credit loss model for
measuring expected credit losses for certain types of financial instruments held at the reporting date based on historical experience,
current conditions and reasonable supportable forecasts. ASU 2016-13 replaces the incurred loss model for measuring expected
credit losses, requires expected losses on available-for-sale debt securities to be recognized through an allowance for credit losses
rather than as reductions in the amortized cost of the securities and provides for additional disclosure requirements. ASU 2016-13
requires a cumulative-effect adjustment to the opening balance of retained earnings on the balance sheet at the date of adoption and
a prospective transition approach for debt securities for which an other-than-temporary impairment had been recognized before the
adoption date. The effect of a prospective transition approach is to maintain the same amortized cost basis before and after the date
of adoption. We adopted ASU 2016-13 on January 1, 2020, and recognized a cumulative-effect adjustment of $35 to our opening
retained earnings for credit related allowances on receivables. The adoption did not have an impact on our consolidated statements
of income or cash flows.
-89-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
In August 2018, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-15, Intangibles—Goodwill and Other—Internal-Use
Software (Subtopic 350-40): Customer’s Accounting for Implementation Costs Incurred in a Cloud Computing Arrangement that is
a Service Contract (“ASU 2018-15”). The amendments in ASU 2018-15 require implementation costs incurred by customers in
cloud computing arrangements to be deferred and recognized over the term of the arrangement, if those costs would be capitalized
by the customer in a software licensing arrangement under the internal-use software guidance. The amendments also require an
entity to disclose the nature of its hosting arrangements and adhere to certain presentation requirements in its balance sheet, income
statement and statement of cash flows. We adopted ASU 2018-15 on January 1, 2020 using a prospective approach for all
implementation costs incurred after the date of adoption, and the adoption did not have an impact on our consolidated financial
position, results of operations or cash flows.
In August 2018, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-14, Compensation—Retirement Benefits - Defined
Benefit Plans—General (Subtopic 715-20): Disclosure Framework—Changes to the Disclosure Requirements for Defined Benefit
Plans (“ASU 2018-14”). The amendments in ASU 2018-14 eliminate, add, and modify certain disclosure requirements for
employers that sponsor defined benefit pension or other postretirement plans. We adopted the disclosure requirements of ASU
2018-14 on December 31, 2020, and the adoption did not have an impact on our consolidated financial position, results of
operations or cash flows.
In August 2018, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-13, Fair Value Measurement (Topic 820):
Disclosure Framework—Changes to the Disclosure Requirements for Fair Value Measurement (“ASU 2018-13”). The amendments
in ASU 2018-13 eliminate, add, and modify certain disclosure requirements for fair value measurements. The amendments became
effective for interim and annual periods beginning after December 15, 2019, with early adoption permitted for either the entirety of
ASU 2018-13 or only the provisions that eliminate or modify disclosure requirements. We early adopted the provisions that
eliminate and modify disclosure requirements, on a retrospective basis, effective in our 2018 Annual Report on Form 10-K. We
adopted the new disclosure requirements on January 1, 2020, on a prospective basis.
In January 2017, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2017-04, Intangibles - Goodwill and Other (Topic 350):
Simplifying the Test for Goodwill Impairment (“ASU 2017-04”). This update removes Step 2 of the goodwill impairment test under
the then-existing guidance, which required a hypothetical purchase price allocation. The new guidance requires an impairment
charge to be recognized for the amount by which the carrying amount exceeds the reporting unit’s fair value. We adopted ASU
2017-04 on January 1, 2020, and the adoption did not have an impact on our consolidated financial position, results of operations or
cash flows.
Recent Accounting Guidance Not Yet Adopted: In November 2020, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2020-
11, Financial Services—Insurance (Topic 944): Effective Date and Early Application (“ASU 2020-11”). The amendments in ASU
2020-11 make changes to the effective date and early application of Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-12, Financial Services
—Insurance (Topic 944): Targeted Improvements to the Accounting for Long-Duration Contracts (“ASU 2018-12”) which was
issued in November 2018. The amendments in ASU 2020-11 have extended the original effective date by one year and now the
amendments are required for our interim and annual reporting periods beginning after December 15, 2022. The amendments in
ASU 2018-12 make changes to a variety of areas to simplify or improve the existing recognition, measurement, presentation and
disclosure requirements for long-duration contracts issued by an insurance entity. The amendments require insurers to annually
review the assumptions they make about their policyholders and update the liabilities for future policy benefits if the assumptions
change. The amendments also simplify the amortization of deferred contract acquisition costs and add new disclosure requirements
about the assumptions insurers use to measure their liabilities and how they may affect future cash flows. The amendments related
to the liability for future policy benefits for traditional and limited-payment contracts and deferred acquisition costs are to be
applied to contracts in force as of the beginning of the earliest period presented, with an option to apply such amendments
retrospectively with a cumulative-effect adjustment to the opening balance of retained earnings as of the earliest period presented.
The amendments for market risk benefits are to be applied retrospectively. We are currently evaluating the effects the adoption of
ASU 2020-11 and ASU 2018-12 will have on our consolidated financial position, results of operations, cash flows, and related
disclosures.
In October 2020, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2020-08, Codification Improvements to Subtopic 310-20,
Receivables—Nonrefundable Fees and Other Costs (“ASU 2020-08”). The amendments clarify when an entity should assess
whether a callable debt security is within the scope of accounting guidance, which impacts the amortization period for
nonrefundable fees and other costs. ASU 2020-08 is effective for interim and annual reporting periods beginning
-90-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
after December 15, 2020, with early adoption permitted. Upon adoption, the amendments are to be applied on a prospective basis as
of the beginning of the period of adoption for existing or newly purchased callable debt securities. We adopted ASU 2020-08 on
January 1, 2021, and the adoption did not have an impact on our consolidated financial position, results of operations or cash flows.
In August 2020, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2020-06, Debt—Debt with Conversion and Other Options
(Subtopic 470-20) and Derivatives and Hedging—Contracts in Entity’s Own Equity (Subtopic 815-40): Accounting for Convertible
Instruments and Contracts in an Entity’s Own Equity (“ASU 2020-06”). The amendments eliminate two of the three accounting
models that require separate accounting for convertible features of debt securities, simplify the contract settlement assessment for
equity classification, require the use of the if-converted method for all convertible instruments in the diluted earnings per share
calculation and expand disclosure requirements. The amendments are effective for our annual and interim reporting periods
beginning after December 15, 2021, with early adoption permitted for reporting periods beginning after December 15, 2020. The
guidance can be applied on a full retrospective basis to all periods presented or a modified retrospective basis with a cumulative
effect adjustment to the opening balance of retained earnings during the period of adoption. We are currently evaluating the effects
the adoption of ASU 2020-06 will have on our consolidated financial statements and disclosures.
In December 2019, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2019-12, Income Taxes (Topic 740): Simplifying the
Accounting for Income Taxes (“ASU 2019-12”). The amendments in ASU 2019-12 remove certain exceptions to the general
principles in Accounting Standards Codification Topic 740. The amendments also clarify and amend existing guidance to improve
consistent application. The amendments are effective for our annual reporting periods beginning after December 15, 2020, with
early adoption permitted. The transition method (retrospective, modified retrospective, or prospective basis) related to the
amendments depends on the applicable guidance, and all amendments for which there is no transition guidance specified are to be
applied on a prospective basis. We adopted ASU 2019-12 on January 1, 2021, and the adoption did not have an impact on our
consolidated financial position, results of operations or cash flows.
There were no other new accounting pronouncements that were issued or became effective during the year ended
December 31, 2020 that had, or are expected to have, a material impact on our financial position, results of operations, cash flows
or financial statement disclosures.
3. Business Acquisitions
Pending Acquisition of MMM Holdings LLC and Affiliates
On February 2, 2021, we announced our entrance into an agreement with InnovaCare Health, L.P. to acquire its Puerto Rico-
based subsidiaries, including MMM Holdings, LLC (“MMM”) and its Medicare Advantage plan MMM Healthcare, LLC,
Medicaid plan and other affiliated companies. MMM is an integrated healthcare organization and seeks to provide its Medicare
Advantage and Medicaid members with a whole health experience through its network of specialized clinics and wholly owned
independent physician associations. This acquisition aligns with our vision to be an innovative, valuable and inclusive healthcare
partner by providing care management programs that improve the lives of the people we serve. The acquisition is expected to close
by the end of the second quarter of 2021 and is subject to standard closing conditions and customary approvals.
Beacon Health Options, Inc.
On February 28, 2020, we completed our acquisition of Beacon Health Options, Inc. (“Beacon”) the largest independently held
behavioral health organization in the country. At the time of acquisition, Beacon served more than thirty-four million individuals
across all fifty states. This acquisition aligned with our strategy to diversify into health services and deliver both integrated
solutions and care delivery models that personalize care for people with complex and chronic conditions.
In accordance with FASB accounting guidance for business combinations, the consideration transferred was allocated to the
preliminary fair value of Beacon’s assets acquired and liabilities assumed, including identifiable intangible assets. The excess of the
consideration transferred over the preliminary fair value of net assets acquired resulted in preliminary goodwill of $1,072 at
December 31, 2020, all of which was allocated to our Other segment. Preliminary goodwill recognized from the acquisition of
Beacon primarily relates to the future economic benefits arising from the assets acquired and is consistent with
-91-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
our stated intentions and strategy. As of December 31, 2020, the initial accounting for the acquisition has not been finalized. Any
additional payments or receipts of cash resulting from contractual purchase price adjustments or any subsequent adjustments made
to the assets acquired or liabilities assumed during the measurement period will continue to be recorded as an adjustment to
goodwill.
The preliminary fair value of the net assets acquired from Beacon includes $752 of other intangible assets at December 31,
2020, which primarily consist of finite-lived customer relationships with amortization periods ranging from 9 to 21 years. The
results of operations of Beacon are included in our consolidated financial statements within our Other segment for the period
following February 28, 2020. The pro forma effects of this acquisition for prior periods were not material to our consolidated
results of operations.
4.    Business Optimization Initiatives
During 2020, our management introduced enterprise-wide initiatives to optimize our business and, as a result, we recorded a
charge of $653 in selling, general and administrative expenses. This charge includes $258 for impairment and abandonment of
operating-lease related right-of-use assets, $198 for impairment and abandonment of property and equipment and $197 for future
payments for employee termination costs in connection with the repositioning and reskilling of our workforce. The charges
recognized in the Commercial & Specialty Business, Government Business, IngenioRx and Other segments in 2020, were $311,
$205, $4 and $133, respectively. See also Note 20, “Segment Information”. We expect most of the employee termination costs to be
paid by the end of 2021. We believe these initiatives largely represent the next step forward in our progression towards becoming a
more agile organization, including process automation and a reduction in our office space footprint.
A summary of the employee termination costs activity for the year ended December 31, 2020 and ending balance at December
31, 2020 is as follows:
Commercial &
Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business IngenioRx Other Total
2020 Business Optimization Initiatives
Employee termination costs:
Costs incurred in 2020 $ 96 $ 92 $ 1 $ 8 $ 197 
Payments made in 2020 (4) (4) — (2) (10)
Total liabilities for employee termination costs ending
balance at December 31, 2020 $ 92 $ 88 $ 1 $ 6 $ 187 
-92-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
5. Investments
A summary of current and long-term fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale, at December 31, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
Non-Credit
 Component of
 Impairment
Recognized in
 Accumulated
 Other
 Comprehensive
 LossCost or
 Amortized
 CostGross
 Unrealized
 GainsGross Unrealized LossesAllowance
For Credit
LossesEstimated
 Fair Value  Less than
 12 Months12 Months
 or Greater
December 31, 2020:
Fixed maturity securities:
United States Government
securities $ 765 $ 11 $ (2)$ — $ — $ 774 $ — 
Government sponsored securities 63 6 — — — 69 — 
Foreign government securities 290 17 (2) — — 305 — 
States, municipalities and political
subdivisions, tax-exempt 5,185 395 (1) — — 5,579 — 
Corporate securities 10,233 697 (20) (11) (7) 10,892 (1)
Residential mortgage-backed
securities 4,208 154 (8) (9) — 4,345 (2)
Commercial mortgage-backed
securities 73 3 (1) (3) — 72 — 
Other securities 1,937 33 (5) (6) — 1,959 — 
Total fixed maturity securities $22,754 $1,316 $ (39)$ (29)$ (7)$23,995 $ (3)
December 31, 2019
Fixed maturity securities:
United States Government
securities $ 524 $ 4 $ (3)$ — $ — $ 525 $ — 
Government sponsored securities 136 5 — — — 141 — 
States, municipalities and political
subdivisions, tax-exempt 4,592 262 (3) — — 4,851 — 
Corporate securities 8,870 339 (9) (15) — 9,185 (3)
Residential mortgage-backed
securities 3,654 87 (6) (3) — 3,732 — 
Commercial mortgage-backed
securities 84 2 — — — 86 — 
Other securities 1,648 21 (3) (5) — 1,661 — 
Total fixed maturity securities $19,508 $ 720 $ (24)$ (23)$ — $20,181 $ (3)
-93-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
For fixed maturity securities in an unrealized loss position at December 31, 2020 and 2019, the following table summarizes the
aggregate fair values and gross unrealized losses by length of time those securities have continuously been in an unrealized loss
position.
 Less than 12 Months 12 Months or Greater
 Number of
SecuritiesEstimated
Fair ValueGross
Unrealized
 LossNumber of
SecuritiesEstimated
Fair ValueGross
Unrealized
 Loss
(Securities are whole amounts)       
December 31, 2020:
Fixed maturity securities:
United States Government securities 27 $ 301 $ (2) — $ — $ — 
Government sponsored securities — — — 1 — — 
Foreign government securities 55 35 (2) 9 4 — 
States, municipalities and political
subdivisions, tax-exempt 36 57 (1) 1 3 — 
Corporate securities 646 765 (20) 150 169 (11)
Residential mortgage-backed securities 224 442 (8) 90 110 (9)
Commercial mortgage-backed securities 6 16 (1) 3 4 (3)
Other securities 207 509 (5) 79 179 (6)
Total fixed maturity securities 1,201 $ 2,125 $ (39) 333 $ 469 $ (29)
December 31, 2019
Fixed maturity securities:
United States Government securities 27 $ 250 $ (3) 2 $ 1 $ — 
Government sponsored securities 14 12 — 3 1 — 
States, municipalities and political
subdivisions, tax-exempt 114 306 (3) 14 11 — 
Corporate securities 386 558 (9) 224 286 (15)
Residential mortgage-backed securities 321 635 (6) 189 237 (3)
Commercial mortgage-backed securities 1 3 — 4 8 — 
Other securities 166 415 (3) 113 358 (5)
Total fixed maturity securities 1,029 $ 2,179 $ (24) 549 $ 902 $ (23)
Below are discussions by security type for unrealized losses and credit losses as of December 31, 2020:
Corporate securities: An allowance for credit losses on certain retail, travel and entertainment, energy, and basic materials sector
fixed maturity corporate securities has been determined based on qualitative and quantitative factors including credit rating, decline
in fair value and industry condition along with other available market data. With multiple risk factors present, these securities were
reviewed for expected future cash flow to determine the portion of unrealized losses that were credit related and to record an
allowance for credit losses. Unrealized losses on our other corporate securities were largely due to market conditions relating to the
COVID-19 pandemic; however, qualitative factors did not indicate a credit loss as of December 31, 2020. We do not intend to sell
these investments and it is likely we will not have to sell these investments prior to maturity or recovery of amortized cost.
As for the remaining securities shown in the table above, unrealized losses on these securities have not been recognized into
income because we do not intend to sell these investments and it is likely that we will not be required to sell these investments prior
to their anticipated recovery. The decline in fair value is largely due to changes in interest rates and other market conditions. We
have evaluated these securities for any change in credit rating and have determined that no allowance is necessary. The fair value is
expected to recover as the securities approach maturity.
-94-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The table below presents a roll-forward by major security type of the allowance for credit losses on fixed maturity securities
available-for-sale held at period end for the year ended December 31, 2020:
Year Ended December 31, 2020Corporate
SecuritiesForeign
Government
Securities Total
Allowance for credit losses:
Beginning balance $ — $ — $ — 
Additions for securities for which no previous expected credit losses were
recognized 64 1 65 
Securities sold during the period (17) (1) (18)
Decreases to the allowance for credit losses on securities (40) — (40)
Total allowance for credit losses $ 7 $ — $ 7 
The amortized cost and fair value of fixed maturity securities at December 31, 2020, by contractual maturity, are shown below.
Expected maturities may differ from contractual maturities because the issuers of the securities may have the right to prepay
obligations.
Amortized
 CostEstimated
 Fair Value
Due in one year or less $ 592 $ 595 
Due after one year through five years 5,981 6,261 
Due after five years through ten years 6,874 7,296 
Due after ten years 5,026 5,426 
Mortgage-backed securities 4,281 4,417 
Total fixed maturity securities $ 22,754 $ 23,995 
Equity Securities
A summary of current equity securities at December 31, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
December 31, 2020December 31, 2019
Equity Securities:
Exchange traded funds $ 1,154 $ 44 
Fixed maturity mutual funds 144 643 
Common equity securities 201 237 
Private equity securities 60 85 
Total $ 1,559 $ 1,009 
-95-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Investment Income
The major categories of net investment income for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 are as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Fixed maturity securities $ 725 $ 721 $ 681 
Equity securities 71 100 86 
Cash equivalents 28 64 51 
Other 91 149 193 
Investment income 915 1,034 1,011 
Investment expense (38) (29) (41)
Net investment income $ 877 $ 1,005 $ 970 
Investment Gains
Net realized investment gains/losses and the net change in unrealized appreciation/depreciation on investments for the years
ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 are as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Net realized gains (losses):
Fixed maturity securities:
Gross realized gains from sales $ 175 $ 125 $ 85 
Gross realized losses from sales (105) (59) (116)
Impairment losses recognized in income (7) (13) (9)
Net realized gains (losses) from sales of fixed maturity securities 63 53 (40)
Equity securities:
Gross realized gains 269 147 77 
Gross realized losses (75) (84) (276)
Net realized gains (losses) on equity securities 194 63 (199)
Other investments:
Gross realized gains from sales 18 3 27 
Gross realized losses from sales — (1) — 
Impairment losses recognized in income (91) (34) (17)
Net realized gains (losses) from sales of other investments (73) (32) 10 
Net realized gains (losses) on investments 184 84 (229)
Change in net unrealized gains (losses) on investments:
Fixed maturity securities 575 874 (529)
Equity securities — — — 
Other investments (5) — 5 
Total change in net unrealized gains (losses) on investments 570 874 (524)
Deferred income tax (expense) benefit (142) (194) 106 
Change in net unrealized gains (losses) on investments 428 680 (418)
Net realized gains (losses) on investments and change in net unrealized gains
(losses) on investments $ 612 $ 764 $ (647)
-96-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The gains and losses related to equity securities for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019 are as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Net realized gains (losses) recognized on equity securities $ 194 $ 63 $ (199)
Less: Net realized (gains) losses recognized on equity securities sold
during the period (61) (39) 57 
Unrealized gains (losses) recognized in income on equity securities still
held at December 31 $ 133 $ 24 $ (142)
A primary objective in the management of our fixed maturity and equity portfolios is to maximize total return relative to
underlying liabilities and respective liquidity needs. In achieving this goal, assets may be sold to take advantage of market
conditions or other investment opportunities as well as tax considerations. Sales will generally produce realized gains and losses. In
the ordinary course of business, we may sell securities at a loss for a number of reasons, including, but not limited to: (i) changes in
the investment environment; (ii) expectations that the fair value could deteriorate further; (iii) desire to reduce exposure to an issuer
or an industry; (iv) changes in credit quality; or (v) changes in expected cash flow.
Proceeds from sales, maturities, calls or redemptions of fixed maturity securities and the related gross realized gains and gross
realized losses for the years ended December 31 are as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Proceeds $ 11,122 $ 8,351 $ 8,380 
Gross realized gains 175 125 85 
Gross realized losses (105) (59) (116)
A significant judgment in the valuation of investments is the determination of when a credit loss has occurred. We follow a
consistent and systematic process for recognizing impairments on securities that sustain credit declines in value. We have
established a committee responsible for the impairment review process. The decision to impair a security incorporates both
quantitative criteria and qualitative information. The impairment review process considers a number of factors including, but not
limited to: (i) the extent to which the fair value is less than book value, (ii) the financial condition and near term prospects of the
issuer, (iii) our intent and ability to retain impaired investments for a period of time sufficient to allow for any anticipated recovery
in fair value, (iv) our intent to sell or the likelihood that we will need to sell a fixed maturity security before recovery of its
amortized cost basis, (v) whether the debtor is current on interest and principal payments, (vi) the reasons for the decline in value
(i.e., credit event compared to liquidity, general credit spread widening, currency exchange rate or interest rate factors) and
(vii) general market conditions and industry or sector specific factors. For securities that are deemed to be credit impaired, an
allowance is created.
Investment securities are exposed to various risks, such as interest rate, market and credit. Due to the level of risk associated
with certain investment securities and the level of uncertainty related to changes in the value of investment securities, it is possible
that changes in these risk factors in the near term could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations or shareholders’
equity.
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, there were no individual investments that exceeded 10% of shareholders’ equity.
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, there were three and zero, respectively, fixed maturity investments that did not produce
income during the years then ended.
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had committed approximately $1,320 and $999, respectively, to future capital calls
from various third-party investments in exchange for an ownership interest in the related entities.
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, securities with carrying values of approximately $562 and $505, respectively, were deposited
by our insurance subsidiaries under requirements of regulatory authorities.
-97-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Securities Lending Programs
The fair value of the collateral received at the time of the securities lending transactions amounted to $1,199 and $351 at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. The value of the collateral represented 102% and 103% of the market value of the
securities on loan at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
The remaining contractual maturities of our securities lending transactions at December 31, 2020 is as follows:
Overnight
and
Continuous
Securities lending transactions
Cash $ 1,056 
United States Government securities 143 
Total $ 1,199 
-98-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
6. Derivative Financial Instruments
We primarily invest in the following types of derivative financial instruments: interest rate swaps, futures, forward contracts,
put and call options, swaptions, embedded derivatives and warrants. We also enter into master netting agreements which reduce
credit risk by permitting net settlement of transactions. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had received collateral of $37 and $22,
respectively, related to our derivative financial instruments.
A summary of the aggregate contractual or notional amounts and estimated fair values related to derivative financial
instruments at December 31, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
 Contractual/
Notional
 Amount Balance Sheet LocationEstimated Fair Value
Asset (Liability)
December 31, 2020
Hedging instruments
Interest rate swaps - fixed to floating $ 575 Other assets/other liabilities $ 37 $ — 
Non-hedging instruments
Interest rate swaps 27 Equity securities — — 
Futures 183 Equity securities 6 (5)
Subtotal non-hedging 210 Subtotal non-hedging 6 (5)
Total derivatives $ 785 Total derivatives 43 (5)
Amounts netted — — 
Net derivatives $ 43 $ (5)
December 31, 2019
Hedging instruments
Interest rate swaps - fixed to floating $ 1,200 Other assets/other liabilities $ 22 $ (1)
Non-hedging instruments
Interest rate swaps 1 Equity securities — — 
Futures 134 Equity securities 1 — 
Subtotal non-hedging 135 Subtotal non-hedging 1 — 
Total derivatives $ 1,335 Total derivatives 23 (1)
Amounts netted (1) 1 
Net derivatives $ 22 $ — 
-99-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Fair Value Hedges
We have entered into various interest rate swap contracts to convert a portion of our interest rate exposure on our long-term
debt from fixed rates to floating rates. The floating rates payable on all of our fair value hedges are benchmarked to the LIBOR. A
summary of our outstanding fair value hedges at December 31, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
Type of Fair Value HedgesYear
 Entered
 IntoOutstanding Notional AmountInterest Rate
 Received Expiration Date 2020 2019
Interest rate swap 2020 $ 75 $ — 4.101 % September 1, 2027
Interest rate swap 2018 50 50 4.101 September 1, 2027
Interest rate swap 2018 450 450 3.300 January 15, 2023
Interest rate swap 2018 — 90 4.350 August 15, 2020
Interest rate swap 2017 — 50 4.350 August 15, 2020
Interest rate swap 2015 — 200 4.350 August 15, 2020
Interest rate swap 2014 — 150 4.350 August 15, 2020
Interest rate swap 2013 — 10 4.350 August 15, 2020
Interest rate swap 2012 — 200 4.350 August 15, 2020
Total notional amount outstanding $ 575 $ 1,200 
The following amounts were recorded on our consolidated balance sheets related to cumulative basis adjustments for fair value
hedges at December 31, 2020 and 2019:
Balance Sheet Classification in Which
Hedged Item is IncludedCarrying Amount of Hedged LiabilityCumulative Amount of Fair Value Hedging
Adjustment Included in the Carrying Amount of the
Hedged Liability
2020 2019 2020 2019
Current portion of long term-debt $ 700 $ 1,598 $ 37 $ 22 
Long-term debt 19,335 17,787 — (1)
Cash Flow Hedges
We have entered into a series of forward starting pay fixed interest rate swaps with the objective of eliminating the variability
of cash flows in the interest payments on future financings that were anticipated at the time of entering into the swaps. During
2020, swaps in the notional amount of $725 were terminated. All swaps have expired or were terminated as of December 31, 2020.
The unrecognized loss for all expired and terminated cash flow hedges included in accumulated other comprehensive income
(loss), net of tax, was $250 and $262 at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. As of December 31, 2020, the total amount of
amortization over the next twelve months for all cash flow hedges is estimated to increase interest expense by approximately $14.
No amounts were excluded from effectiveness testing.
-100-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A summary of the effect of cash flow hedges in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
Hedge
Loss 
 Recognized
 in Other
 Comprehensive
 Income (Loss)Income Statement
Location of
 Loss
 Reclassification
 from Accumulated
 Other Comprehensive 
 Income (Loss)Hedge Loss
Reclassified from
 Accumulated
 Other
 Comprehensive
 Income (Loss) Type of Cash Flow Hedge
Year ended December 31, 2020
Forward starting pay fixed swaps $ — Interest expense $ (15)
Year ended December 31, 2019
Forward starting pay fixed swaps (35) Interest expense (15)
Year ended December 31, 2018
Forward starting pay fixed swaps (33) Interest expense (14)
Income Statement Relationship of Fair Value and Cash Flow Hedging
A summary of the relationship between the effects of fair value and cash flow hedges on the total amount of income and
expense presented in our consolidated statements of income for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
Classification and Amount of Gain (Loss) Recognized in Income on Fair Value and Cash Flow
Hedging Relationships
2020 2019 2018
Net Realized
Gains (Losses)
on Financial
InstrumentsInterest
ExpenseNet Realized
Gains (Losses)
on Financial
InstrumentsInterest
ExpenseNet Realized
Gains (Losses)
on Financial
InstrumentsInterest
Expense
Total amount of income or expense in the income
statement in which the effects of fair value or cash
flow hedges are recorded $ 182 $ (784)$ 67 $ (746)$ (206)$ (753)
Gain (loss) on fair value hedging relationships:
Interest rate swaps:
Hedged items — (15) — 2 — — 
Derivatives designated as hedging
instruments — 15 — (2) — — 
Loss on cash flow hedging relationships:
Forward starting pay fixed swaps:
Amount of loss reclassified from accumulated
other comprehensive loss into net income — (15) — (15) — (14)
-101-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Non-Hedging Derivatives
A summary of the effect of non-hedging derivatives on our consolidated statements of income for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
Type of Non-hedging DerivativesIncome Statement Location of
Gain (Loss) RecognizedDerivative
Gain (Loss)
 Recognized
Year ended December 31, 2020
Interest rate swaps Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments $ (1)
Options Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments (5)
Futures Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments 4 
Total $ (2)
Year ended December 31, 2019
Interest rate swaps Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments $ 1 
Options Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments (8)
Futures Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments (10)
Total $ (17)
Year ended December 31, 2018
Interest rate swaps Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments $ 14 
Options Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments 1 
Futures Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments 8 
Total $ 23 
7. Fair Value
Assets and liabilities recorded at fair value in the consolidated balance sheets are categorized based upon the level of judgment
associated with the inputs used to measure their fair value. Level inputs, as defined by FASB guidance for fair value measurements
and disclosures, are as follows:
Level Input: Input Definition:
Level I  Inputs are unadjusted, quoted prices for identical assets or liabilities in active markets at the measurement date.
Level II
 Inputs other than quoted prices included in Level I that are observable for the asset or liability through
corroboration with market data at the measurement date.
Level III
 Unobservable inputs that reflect management’s best estimate of what market participants would use in pricing
the asset or liability at the measurement date.
The following methods, assumptions and inputs were used to determine the fair value of each class of the following assets and
liabilities recorded at fair value in the consolidated balance sheets:
Cash equivalents: Cash equivalents primarily consist of highly rated money market funds with maturities of three months or
less, and are purchased daily at par value with specified yield rates. Due to the high ratings and short-term nature of the funds, we
designate all cash equivalents as Level I.
Fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale: Fair values of available-for-sale fixed maturity securities are based on quoted
market prices, where available. These fair values are obtained primarily from third-party pricing services, which generally use
Level I or Level II inputs for the determination of fair value to facilitate fair value measurements and disclosures. Level II securities
primarily include corporate securities, securities from states, municipalities and political subdivisions, mortgage-backed securities,
United States Government securities, foreign government securities, and certain other asset-backed securities. For securities not
actively traded, the pricing services may use quoted market prices of
-102-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
comparable instruments or discounted cash flow analyses, incorporating inputs that are currently observable in the markets for
similar securities. We have controls in place to review the pricing services’ qualifications and procedures used to determine fair
values. In addition, we periodically review the pricing services’ pricing methodologies, data sources and pricing inputs to ensure
the fair values obtained are reasonable. Inputs that are often used in the valuation methodologies include, but are not limited to,
broker quotes, benchmark yields, credit spreads, default rates and prepayment speeds. We also have certain fixed maturity
securities, primarily corporate debt securities, that are designated Level III securities. For these securities, the valuation
methodologies may incorporate broker quotes or discounted cash flow analyses using assumptions for inputs such as expected cash
flows, benchmark yields, credit spreads, default rates and prepayment speeds that are not observable in the markets.
Equity securities: Fair values of equity securities are generally designated as Level I and are based on quoted market prices.
For certain equity securities, quoted market prices for the identical security are not always available, and the fair value is estimated
by reference to similar securities for which quoted prices are available. These securities are designated Level II. We also have
certain equity securities, including private equity securities, for which the fair value is estimated based on each security’s current
condition and future cash flow projections. Such securities are designated Level III. The fair values of these private equity
securities are generally based on either broker quotes or discounted cash flow projections using assumptions for inputs such as the
weighted-average cost of capital, long-term revenue growth rates and earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization,
and/or revenue multiples that are not observable in the markets.
Securities lending collateral: Fair values of securities lending collateral are based on quoted market prices, where available.
These fair values are obtained primarily from third-party pricing services, which generally use Level I or Level II inputs for the
determination of fair value, to facilitate fair value measurements and disclosures.
Derivatives: Fair values are based on the quoted market prices by the financial institution that is the counterparty to the
derivative transaction. We independently verify prices provided by the counterparties using valuation models that incorporate
market observable inputs for similar derivative transactions. Derivatives are designated as Level II securities. Derivatives presented
within the fair value hierarchy table below are presented on a gross basis and not on a master netting basis by counterparty.
In addition, the following methods and assumptions were used to determine the fair value of each class of pension benefit plan
assets and other benefit plan assets not defined above (see Note 11, “Retirement Benefits,” for fair values of benefit plan assets):
Mutual funds: Fair values are based on quoted market prices, which represent the net asset value (“NAV”) of the shares held.
Partnership investments: Fair values are estimated based on the plan’s proportionate share of the undistributed partners’ capital
as reported in audited financial statements of the partnership. In accordance with FASB guidance, certain investments that are
measured at fair value using the NAV per share as a practical expedient have been classified in the fair value hierarchy. The fair
value amounts presented are intended to permit reconciliation of the fair value hierarchy to the total investments of the master trust.
Commingled fund: Fair value is based on NAV per fund share, primarily derived from the quoted prices in active markets on
the underlying equity securities.
Contract with insurance company: Fair value of the contract in the insurance company general investment account is
determined by the insurance company based on the fair value of the underlying investments of the account.
Investment in DOL 103-12 trust: Fair value is based on the plan’s proportionate share of the fair value of investments held by
the trust, qualified as a Department of Labor Regulation 2520.103-12 entity (“DOL 103-12 trust”) as reported in the audited
financial statements of the trust, where the trustee applies fair value measurements to the underlying investments of the trust.
Life insurance contracts: Fair value is based on the cash surrender value of the policies as reported by the insurer.
-103-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A summary of fair value measurements by level for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis at
December 31, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
Level I Level II Level III Total
December 31, 2020
Assets:
Cash equivalents $ 3,163 $ — $ — $ 3,163 
Fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale:
United States Government securities — 774 — 774 
Government sponsored securities — 69 — 69 
Foreign government securities — 305 — 305 
States, municipalities and political subdivisions, tax-exempt — 5,579 — 5,579 
Corporate securities — 10,567 325 10,892 
Residential mortgage-backed securities — 4,343 2 4,345 
Commercial mortgage-backed securities — 72 — 72 
Other securities — 1,954 5 1,959 
Total fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale — 23,663 332 23,995 
Equity securities:
Exchange traded funds 1,154 — — 1,154 
Fixed maturity mutual funds — 144 — 144 
Common equity securities 171 30 — 201 
Private equity securities — — 60 60 
Total equity securities 1,325 174 60 1,559 
Securities lending collateral — 1,199 — 1,199 
Derivatives — 43 — 43 
Total assets $ 4,488 $25,079 $ 392 $29,959 
Liabilities:
Derivatives $ — $ (5)$ — $ (5)
Total liabilities $ — $ (5)$ — $ (5)
December 31, 2019
Assets:
Cash equivalents $ 2,015 $ — $ — $ 2,015 
Fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale:
United States Government securities — 525 — 525 
Government sponsored securities — 141 — 141 
States, municipalities and political subdivisions, tax-exempt — 4,851 — 4,851 
Corporate securities — 8,882 303 9,185 
Residential mortgage-backed securities — 3,730 2 3,732 
Commercial mortgage-backed securities — 86 — 86 
Other securities — 1,654 7 1,661 
Total fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale — 19,869 312 20,181 
Equity securities:
Exchange traded funds 44 — — 44 
Fixed maturity mutual funds — 643 — 643 
Common equity securities 206 31 — 237 
Private equity securities — — 85 85 
Total equity securities 250 674 85 1,009 
Securities lending collateral — 353 — 353 
Derivatives — 23 — 23 
Total assets $ 2,265 $20,919 $ 397 $23,581 
Liabilities:
Derivatives $ — $ (1)$ — $ (1)
Total liabilities $ — $ (1)$ — $ (1)
-104-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances of assets measured at fair value on a recurring basis using Level III
inputs for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
Corporate
 SecuritiesResidential
 Mortgage-
 backed
 SecuritiesOther 
 SecuritiesEquity
 Securities Total
Year ended December 31, 2020
Beginning balance at January 1, 2020 $ 303 $ 2 $ 7 $ 85 $ 397 
Total gains (losses):
Recognized in net income (3) — — (19) (22)
Recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income (5) — — — (5)
Purchases 85 — — 16 101 
Sales (19) — — (22) (41)
Settlements (44) — (2) — (46)
Transfers into Level III 10 — — — 10 
Transfers out of Level III (2) — — — (2)
Ending balance at December 31, 2020 $ 325 $ 2 $ 5 $ 60 $ 392 
Change in unrealized gains or losses included in net income related to
assets still held at December 31, 2020 $ — $ — $ — $ (19)$ (19)
Year ended December 31, 2019
Beginning balance at January 1, 2019 $ 287 $ 6 $ 17 $ 313 $ 623 
Total gains (losses):
Recognized in net income (7) — — (6) (13)
Recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss 3 — — — 3 
Purchases 122 — 2 65 189 
Sales (22) — — (79) (101)
Settlements (71) (2) (6) — (79)
Transfers into Level III — — 3 2 5 
Transfers out of Level III (9) (2) (9) (210) (230)
Ending balance at December 31, 2019 $ 303 $ 2 $ 7 $ 85 $ 397 
Change in unrealized gains or losses included in net income related to
assets still held at December 31, 2019 $ — $ — $ — $ 6 $ 6 
Year ended December 31, 2018
Beginning balance at January 1, 2018 $ 229 $ 5 $ 16 $ 287 $ 537 
Total gains (losses):
Recognized in net income 1 — — (229) (228)
Recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss (5) — — — (5)
Purchases 120 2 18 290 430 
Sales (33) — (1) (35) (69)
Settlements (88) (1) (10) — (99)
Transfers into Level III 65 — 9 — 74 
Transfers out of Level III (2) — (15) — (17)
Ending balance at December 31, 2018 $ 287 $ 6 $ 17 $ 313 $ 623 
Change in unrealized gains or losses included in net income related to
assets still held at December 31, 2018 $ — $ — $ — $ 30 $ 30 
There were no individually material transfers into or out of Level III during the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 or 2018.
Certain assets and liabilities are measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis; that is, the instruments are not measured at fair
value on an ongoing basis but are subject to fair value adjustments only in certain circumstances. As disclosed in Note 3, “Business
Acquisitions,” we completed our acquisition of Beacon on February 28, 2020. The preliminary values of net assets acquired in our
acquisition of Beacon and resulting goodwill and other intangible assets were recorded at fair
-105-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
value primarily using Level III inputs. The majority of Beacon’s assets acquired and liabilities assumed were recorded at their
carrying values as of the respective date of acquisition, as their carrying values approximated their fair values due to their short-
term nature. The preliminary fair values of goodwill and other intangible assets acquired in our acquisition of Beacon were
internally estimated based on the income approach. The income approach estimates fair value based on the present value of the
cash flows that the assets could be expected to generate in the future. We developed internal estimates for the expected cash flows
and discount rate in the present value calculation. Other than the assets acquired and liabilities assumed in our acquisition of
Beacon described above, there were no material assets or liabilities measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis during the years
ended December 31, 2020 or 2019.
Our valuation policy is determined by members of our treasury and accounting departments. Whenever possible, our policy is
to obtain quoted market prices in active markets to estimate fair values for recognition and disclosure purposes. Where quoted
market prices in active markets are not available, fair values are estimated using discounted cash flow analyses, broker quotes,
unobservable inputs or other valuation techniques. These techniques are significantly affected by our assumptions, including
discount rates and estimates of future cash flows. The use of assumptions for unobservable inputs for the determination of fair
value involves a level of judgment and uncertainty. Changes in assumptions that reasonably could have been different at the
reporting date may result in a higher or lower determination of fair value. Changes in fair value measurements, if significant, may
affect performance of cash flows.
Potential taxes and other transaction costs are not considered in estimating fair values. Our valuation policy is generally to
obtain quoted prices for each security from third-party pricing services, which are derived through recently reported trades for
identical or similar securities making adjustments through the reporting date based upon available market observable information.
As we are responsible for the determination of fair value, we perform analysis on the prices received from the pricing services to
determine whether the prices are reasonable estimates of fair value. This analysis is performed by our internal treasury personnel
who are familiar with our investment portfolios, the pricing services engaged and the valuation techniques and inputs used. Our
analysis includes procedures such as a review of month-to-month price fluctuations and price comparisons to secondary pricing
services. There were no adjustments to quoted market prices obtained from the pricing services during the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 or 2018.
In addition to the preceding disclosures on assets recorded at fair value in the consolidated balance sheets, FASB guidance also
requires the disclosure of fair values for certain other financial instruments for which it is practicable to estimate fair value, whether
or not such values are recognized in the consolidated balance sheets.
Non-financial instruments such as real estate, property and equipment, other current assets, deferred income taxes, intangible
assets and certain financial instruments, such as policy liabilities, are excluded from the fair value disclosures. Therefore, the fair
value amounts cannot be aggregated to determine our underlying economic value.
The carrying amounts reported in the consolidated balance sheets for cash, accrued investment income, premium receivables,
self-funded receivables, other receivables, income taxes receivable, unearned income, accounts payable and accrued expenses,
security trades pending payable, securities lending payable and certain other current liabilities approximate fair value because of the
short-term nature of these items. These assets and liabilities are not listed in the table below.
The following methods and assumptions were used to estimate the fair value of each class of financial instrument that is
recorded at its carrying value on the consolidated balance sheets:
Other invested assets: Other invested asset primarily include our investments in limited partnerships, joint ventures and other
non-controlled corporations, as well as the cash surrender value of corporate-owned life insurance policies. Investments in limited
partnerships, joint ventures and other non-controlled corporations are carried at our share in the entities’ undistributed earnings,
which approximates fair value. The carrying value of corporate-owned life insurance policies represents the cash surrender value as
reported by the respective insurer, which approximates fair value.
Short-term borrowings: The fair value of our short-term borrowings is based on quoted market prices for the same or similar
debt, or if no quoted market prices were available, on the current market interest rates estimated to be available to us for debt of
similar terms and remaining maturities.
Long-term debt—commercial paper: The carrying amount for commercial paper approximates fair value, as the underlying
instruments have variable interest rates at market value.
-106-
106
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Long-term debt—senior unsecured notes and surplus notes: The fair values of our notes are based on quoted market prices in
active markets for the same or similar debt, or, if no quoted market prices are available, on the current market observable rates
estimated to be available to us for debt of similar terms and remaining maturities.
Long-term debt—convertible debentures: The fair value of our convertible debentures is based on the quoted market price in
the active private market in which the convertible debentures trade.
A summary of the estimated fair values by level of each class of financial instrument that is recorded at its carrying value on
our consolidated balance sheets at December 31, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
 Carrying
ValueEstimated Fair Value
 Level I Level II Level III Total
December 31, 2020
Assets:
Other invested assets $ 4,285 $ — $ — $ 4,285 $ 4,285 
Liabilities:
Debt:
Commercial paper 250 — 250 — 250 
Notes 19,677 — 23,307 — 23,307 
Convertible debentures 108 — 712 — 712 
December 31, 2019
Assets:
Other invested assets $ 4,258 $ — $ — $ 4,258 $ 4,258 
Liabilities:
Debt:
Short-term borrowings 700 — 700 — 700 
Commercial paper 400 — 400 — 400 
Notes 18,840 — 20,470 — 20,470 
Convertible debentures 145 — 904 — 904 
-107-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
8. Income Taxes
The components of deferred income taxes at December 31, 2020 and 2019 are as follows:
2020 2019
Deferred income tax assets:
Accrued expenses $ 588 $ 331 
Bad debt reserves 143 89 
Insurance reserves 187 139 
Lease liabilities 204 180 
Retirement liabilities 205 216 
Deferred compensation 31 28 
Federal and state operating loss carryforwards 274 124 
Other 113 71 
Subtotal 1,745 1,178 
Less: valuation allowance (84) (45)
Total deferred income tax assets 1,661 1,133 
Deferred income tax liabilities:
Federal and state intangible assets 2,073 1,999 
Capitalized software 670 554 
Depreciation and amortization 37 62 
Investment basis 407 230 
Retirement assets 260 249 
Lease right-of-use asset 131 164 
Prepaid expenses 102 102 
Total deferred income tax liabilities 3,680 3,360 
Net deferred income tax liabilities $ 2,019 $ 2,227 
In the table above, certain amounts for the year ended December 31, 2019 have been reclassified from a net to gross
presentation to more fully reflect the federal and state tax effects by type of temporary difference. This reclassification does not
impact amounts presented in the financial statements.
As of December 31, 2020, the Company’s undistributed earnings from non-U.S. subsidiaries are intended to be indefinitely
reinvested in non-U.S. operations, and therefore no U.S. deferred taxes have been recorded.
Significant components of the provision for income taxes for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 consist of the
following:
2020 2019 2018
Current tax expense:
Federal $ 1,731 $ 1,019 $ 1,128 
State and local 461 84 78 
Total current tax expense 2,192 1,103 1,206 
Deferred tax (benefit) expense (526) 75 112 
Total income tax expense $ 1,666 $ 1,178 $ 1,318 
-108-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
State and local current tax expense is reported gross of federal benefit, and includes amounts related to audit settlements,
uncertain tax positions, state tax credits and true up of prior years’ tax. Such items are included in multiple lines in the following
rate reconciliation table on a net of federal tax basis.
A reconciliation of income tax expense recorded in the consolidated statements of income and amounts computed at the
statutory federal income tax rate for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
 2020 2019 2018
 Amount Percent Amount Percent Amount Percent
Amount at statutory rate $ 1,310 21.0 %$ 1,257 21.0 %$ 1,064 21.0 %
State and local income taxes net of federal tax
expense/benefit 235 3.8 138 2.3 63 1.2 
Tax exempt interest and dividends received
deduction (22) (0.4) (24) (0.4) (27) (0.5)
HIP fee 330 5.3 — — 324 6.4 
Basis adjustments from recent acquisitions (110) (1.8) — — (28) (0.6)
Tax Cuts and Jobs Act — — — — (28) (0.6)
Other, net (77) (1.2) (193) (3.2) (50) (0.9)
Total income tax expense $ 1,666 26.7 %$ 1,178 19.7 %$ 1,318 26.0 %
During the year ended December 31, 2020, we recognized income tax expense of $1,666, or $6.55 per diluted share, which
included income tax expense of $330, or $1.30 per diluted share as a result of the non-tax deductibility of the HIP Fee payment,
which was reinstated for 2020.
During the year ended December 31, 2019, we recognized income tax expense of $1,178, or $4.53 per diluted share. The HIP
Fee payment was suspended for 2019.
During the year ended December 31, 2018, we recognized income tax expense of $324, or $1.23 per diluted share, as a result
of the non-tax deductibility of the HIP Fee payment.
On December 22, 2017, the federal government enacted the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, which contains significant changes to
corporate taxation, including, but not limited to, reducing the U.S. federal corporate income tax rate from 35% to 21% and
modifying or limiting many business deductions. At December 31, 2018, we completed our accounting for the tax effects of
enactment of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act and there was no material change to our 2017 provisional amount. In addition we
reclassified, for our interim and annual reporting periods beginning on January 1, 2018, $91 of stranded tax effects from
accumulated other comprehensive loss to retained earnings on our consolidated balance sheets.
The change in the carrying amount of gross unrecognized tax benefits from uncertain tax positions for the years ended
December 31, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
2020 2019
Balance at January 1 $ 146 $ 241 
Additions based on:
Tax positions related to current year 76 1 
Tax positions related to prior years 40 — 
Reductions based on:
Tax positions related to prior years (13) (63)
Settlements with taxing authorities — (33)
Balance at December 31 $ 249 $ 146 
The table above excludes interest, net of related tax benefits, which is treated as income tax expense (benefit) under our
accounting policy. The interest is included in the amounts described in the following paragraph.
-109-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The amount of unrecognized tax benefits that would impact our effective tax rate in future periods, if recognized, was $227 and
$140 at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Also included in the table above, at December 31, 2020, is $2 that would be
recognized as an adjustment to additional paid-in capital, which would not affect our effective tax rate. In addition to the contingent
liabilities included in the table above, during 2017 we filed protective state income tax refund claims of approximately $310. There
were no equivalent protective state income tax refund claims filed in 2020, 2019, or 2018.
For the year ended December 31, 2020, we recognized a net interest expense of $7. For the years ended December 31, 2019
and 2018, we recognized a net interest (benefit) expense of $(11) and $15, respectively. We had accrued approximately $33 and $26
for the payment of interest at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
As of December 31, 2020, as further described below, certain tax years remain open to examination by the Internal Revenue
Service (“IRS”) and various state and local authorities. As a result of these examinations and discussions with taxing agencies, we
have recorded amounts for uncertain tax positions. It is anticipated that the amount of unrecognized tax benefits will change in the
next twelve months due to possible settlements of audits and changes in temporary items. However, the ultimate resolution of these
items is dependent on the completion of negotiations with various taxing authorities. While it is difficult to determine when other
tax settlements will actually occur, it is reasonably possible that one could occur in the next twelve months and our unrecognized
tax benefits could change within a range of approximately ($15) to ($147).
We are a member of the IRS Compliance Assurance Process (“CAP”). The objective of CAP is to reduce taxpayer burden and
uncertainty while assuring the IRS of the accuracy of tax returns prior to filing, thereby reducing or eliminating the need for post-
filing examinations.
As of December 31, 2020, the IRS examination of our 2020 and 2019 tax years continues to be in process.
In certain states, we pay premium taxes in lieu of state income taxes. Premium taxes are reported in selling, general and
administrative expense.
At December 31, 2020, we had federal net operating loss carryforwards of $40 that will expire beginning 2033 through 2037
and $7 that have an indefinite carryforward period; state net operating loss carryforwards expire beginning 2022 through 2040, with
some having an indefinite carryforward period.
During 2020, 2019 and 2018, federal income taxes paid totaled $1,790, $1,403 and $738, respectively.
9. Property and Equipment
A summary of property and equipment at December 31, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
2020 2019
Computer software, purchased and internally developed $ 5,247 $ 4,314 
Computer equipment, furniture and other equipment 1,218 1,264 
Leasehold improvements 671 715 
Building and improvements 174 169 
Land and improvements 17 17 
Property and equipment, gross 7,327 6,479 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (3,844) (3,346)
Property and equipment, net $ 3,483 $ 3,133 
Depreciation expense for 2020, 2019 and 2018 was $176, $147 and $124, respectively. Amortization expense on computer
software and leasehold improvements for 2020, 2019 and 2018 was $462, $528 and $528, respectively, which includes
amortization expense on computer software, both purchased and internally developed, for 2020, 2019 and 2018 of $412, $450 and
$465, respectively. Capitalized costs related to the internal development of software of $4,783 and $3,939 at December 31, 2020
and 2019, respectively, are reported with computer software.
-110-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Our activities as disclosed in Note 4, “Business Optimization Initiatives”, include impairment of property and equipment. We
recorded an impairment charge of $198 for property and equipment in 2020 which is in selling, general and administrative
expenses.
10. Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
A summary of the change in the carrying amount of goodwill for our segments (see Note 20, “Segment Information”) for 2020
and 2019 is as follows:
Commercial
 and Specialty
 BusinessGovernment
 Business IngenioRx Other Total
Balance as of January 1, 2019 $ 11,551 $ 8,953 $ — $ — $ 20,504 
Adjustments — (674) — 670 (4)
Balance as of December 31, 2019 11,551 8,279 — 670 20,500 
Acquisitions and adjustments 42 52 48 1,049 1,191 
Balance as of December 31, 2020 $ 11,593 $ 8,331 $ 48 $ 1,719 $ 21,691 
Accumulated impairment as of December 31, 2020 $ (41)$ — $ — $ — $ (41)
Goodwill adjustments in 2019 include certain reclassifications made for changes in segment reporting. For additional
information, see Note 20, “Segment Information”.
As required by FASB guidance, we completed annual impairment tests of existing goodwill and other intangible assets with
indefinite lives during 2020, 2019 and 2018. We perform these annual impairment tests during the fourth quarter. FASB guidance
also requires interim impairment testing to be performed when potential impairment indicators exist. These tests involve the use of
estimates related to the fair value of goodwill and intangible assets with indefinite lives and require a significant degree of
management judgment and the use of subjective assumptions. Qualitative testing procedures include assessing our financial
performance, macroeconomic conditions, industry and market considerations, various asset specific factors and entity specific
events. For quantitative testing, the fair values are estimated using the projected income and market valuation approaches,
incorporating Level III internal estimates for inputs, including, but not limited to, revenue projections, income projections, cash
flows and discount rates. We did not incur any impairment losses in 2020, 2019 or 2018, as the estimated fair values of our
reporting units were substantially in excess of their carrying values.
The components of other intangible assets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 are as follows:
 2020 2019
Gross
 Carrying
AmountAccumulated
 AmortizationNet
 Carrying
AmountGross
 Carrying
 AmountAccumulated
 AmortizationNet
 Carrying
Amount
Intangible assets with finite lives:
Customer relationships $ 5,180 $ (3,766)$ 1,414 $ 4,500 $ (3,469)$ 1,031 
Provider and hospital relationships 323 (114) 209 228 (98) 130 
Other 444 (177) 267 352 (129) 223 
Total 5,947 (4,057) 1,890 5,080 (3,696) 1,384 
Intangible assets with indefinite lives:
Blue Cross and Blue Shield and other
trademarks 6,299 — 6,299 6,299 — 6,299 
State Medicaid licenses 1,216 — 1,216 991 — 991 
Total 7,515 — 7,515 7,290 — 7,290 
Other intangible assets $ 13,462 $ (4,057)$ 9,405 $ 12,370 $ (3,696)$ 8,674 
-111-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
As of December 31, 2020, the estimated amortization expense for each of the five succeeding years is as follows: 2021, $324;
2022, $271; 2023, $233; 2024, $196; and 2025, $159.
11. Retirement Benefits
 We sponsor various non-contributory employee defined benefit plans through certain subsidiaries. 
The Anthem Cash Balance Plan A and the Anthem Cash Balance Plan B are cash balance pension plans covering certain
eligible employees of the affiliated companies that participate in these plans. Effective January 1, 2006, benefits were curtailed,
with the result that most participants stopped accruing benefits but continue to earn interest on benefits accrued prior to the
curtailment. Certain participants subject to collective bargaining and certain other participants who met grandfathering rules
continued to accrue benefits. Participants who did not receive credits and/or benefit accruals were included in the Anthem Cash
Balance Plan A, while employees who were still receiving credits and/or benefits participated in the Anthem Cash Balance Plan B.
Effective January 1, 2019, benefits under the Anthem Cash Balance Plan B were curtailed. All grandfathered participants no longer
have pay credits added to their accounts but continue to earn interest on existing account balances. Participants continue to earn
years of pension service for vesting purposes. Several pension plans acquired through various corporate mergers and acquisitions
were merged into these plans in prior years.
The Employees’ Retirement Plan of Blue Cross of California (the “BCC Plan”) is a defined benefit pension plan that covers
eligible employees of Blue Cross of California who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement. Effective January 1, 2007,
benefits were curtailed under the BCC Plan with the result that no Blue Cross of California employees hired or rehired after
December 31, 2006 are eligible to participate in the BCC Plan.
All of the plans’ assets consist primarily of equity securities, fixed maturity securities, investment funds and cash. The funding
policies for all plans are to contribute amounts at least sufficient to meet the minimum funding requirements set forth in the
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (“ERISA”), as further amended by the Pension Protection Act of
2006, and in accordance with income tax regulations, plus such additional amounts as are necessary to provide assets sufficient to
meet the benefits to be paid to plan participants.
The following tables disclose consolidated “pension benefits,” which include the defined benefit pension plans described
above, and consolidated “other benefits,” which include postretirement health and welfare benefits including medical, vision and
dental benefits offered to certain employees. Calculations were computed using assumptions at the December 31 measurement
dates.
The reconciliation of the benefit obligation is as follows:
 Pension Benefits Other Benefits
 2020 2019 2020 2019
Benefit obligation at beginning of year $ 1,880 $ 1,743 $ 423 $ 431 
Service cost — — 1 1 
Interest cost 47 62 10 15 
Plan participant contributions — — 18 17 
Actuarial loss (gain) 219 200 (15) 5 
Settlements (80) (35) — — 
Benefits paid (57) (90) (38) (46)
Benefit obligation at end of year $ 2,009 $ 1,880 $ 399 $ 423 
-112-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The changes in the fair value of plan assets are as follows:
 Pension Benefits Other Benefits
 2020 2019 2020 2019
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year $ 2,026 $ 1,818 $ 367 $ 336 
Actual return on plan assets 290 329 33 55 
Employer contributions 7 4 11 5 
Plan participant contributions — — 18 17 
Settlements (80) (35) — — 
Benefits paid (57) (90) (38) (46)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year $ 2,186 $ 2,026 $ 391 $ 367 
 The net amount included in the consolidated balance sheets is as follows:
 Pension Benefits Other Benefits
 2020 2019 2020 2019
Noncurrent assets $ 248 $ 212 $ — $ — 
Current liabilities (6) (6) — — 
Noncurrent liabilities (65) (60) (8) (56)
Net amount at December 31 $ 177 $ 146 $ (8)$ (56)
 The net amounts included in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) that have not been recognized as components of
net periodic benefit costs are as follows:
 Pension Benefits Other Benefits
 2020 2019 2020 2019
Net actuarial loss $ 749 $ 734 $ 3 $ 25 
Prior service cost (credit) — 1 (12) (19)
Net amount before tax at December 31 $ 749 $ 735 $ (9)$ 6 
The accumulated benefit obligation for the defined benefit pension plans was $2,007 and $1,878 at December 31, 2020 and
2019, respectively. 
As of December 31, 2020, certain pension plans had accumulated benefit obligations in excess of plan assets. Such plans had
accumulated benefit obligation and fair value of plan assets of $111 and $42, respectively. For those same plans, the projected
benefit obligation was also in excess of plan assets. Such plans had projected benefit obligation and fair value of plan assets of $113
and $42, respectively.
The weighted-average assumptions used in calculating the benefit obligations for all plans are as follows: 
 Pension Benefits Other Benefits
 2020 2019 2020 2019
Discount rate 2.24 % 3.11 % 1.99 % 2.93 %
Rate of compensation increase 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 %
Expected rate of return on plan assets 6.72 % 7.33 % 6.60 % 7.00 %
Interest crediting rate 3.82 % 3.82 % 0.87 % 1.81 %
-113-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The components of net periodic benefit credit included in the consolidated statements of income are as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Pension Benefits
Service cost $ — $ — $ 8 
Interest cost 47 62 55 
Expected return on assets (138) (138) (147)
Recognized actuarial loss 24 17 22 
Settlement loss 29 9 5 
Net periodic benefit credit $ (38)$ (50)$ (57)
Other Benefits
Service cost $ 1 $ 1 $ 1 
Interest cost 10 15 15 
Expected return on assets (25) (22) (24)
Recognized actuarial loss — 2 3 
Amortization of prior service credit (7) (12) (12)
Net periodic benefit credit $ (21)$ (16)$ (17)
During the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, we incurred total settlement losses of $29, $9 and $5, respectively,
as lump-sum payments exceeded the service cost and interest cost components of net periodic benefit cost for certain of our plans. 
The weighted-average assumptions used in calculating the net periodic benefit cost for all plans are as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Pension Benefits
Discount rate 3.11 % 4.15 % 3.44 %
Rate of compensation increase 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 %
Expected rate of return on plan assets 7.33 % 7.44 % 7.83 %
Interest crediting rate 3.82 % 3.83 % 3.82 %
Other Benefits
Discount rate 2.93 % 4.04 % 3.42 %
Rate of compensation increase 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 %
Expected rate of return on plan assets 7.00 % 7.00 % 7.00 %
Interest crediting rate 1.81 % 3.12 % 2.35 %
The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of pre-Medicare (those who are not currently
eligible for Medicare benefits) other benefits at our December 31, 2020 measurement date was 7.00% for 2021 with a gradual
decline to 4.50% by the year 2033. The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of post-Medicare
(those who are currently eligible for Medicare benefits) other benefits at our December 31, 2020 measurement date was 5.50% for
2021 with a gradual decline to 4.50% by the year 2033. These estimated trend rates are subject to change in the future.
Plan assets include a diversified mix of equity securities, investment grade fixed maturity securities and other types of
investments across a range of sectors and levels of capitalization to maximize long-term return for a prudent level of risk. The
weighted-average target allocation for pension benefit plan assets is 44% equity securities, 48% fixed maturity securities, and 8% to
all other types of investments. Equity securities primarily include a mix of domestic securities, foreign securities and
-114-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
mutual funds invested in equities. Fixed maturity securities primarily include treasury securities, corporate bonds and asset-backed
investments issued by corporations and the U.S. government. Other types of investments primarily include insurance contracts
designed specifically for employee benefit plans and a commingled fund comprised primarily of equity securities. As of
December 31, 2020, there were no significant concentrations of investments in the pension benefit assets or other benefit assets. No
plan assets were invested in Anthem common stock.
The partnerships hold various types of underlying assets such as real estate and investments in oil and gas companies.
Generally, the partnership interests are not redeemable and are transferable only with the consent of the general partner. Unfunded
commitments related to all partnership interests totaled approximately $3 and $29 at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Pension benefit assets and other benefit assets recorded at fair value are categorized based upon the level of judgment
associated with the inputs used to measure their fair value.
-115-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
 The fair values of our pension benefit assets and other benefit assets by asset category and level inputs at December 31, 2020,
excluding cash, investment income receivable and amounts due to/from brokers, resulting in a net asset of $64, are as follows (see
Note 7, “Fair Value,” for additional information regarding the definition of level inputs):
Level I Level II Level III Total
December 31, 2020
Pension Benefit Assets:
Equity securities:
U.S. securities $ 710 $ — $ — $ 710 
Foreign securities 238 — — 238 
Mutual funds 42 — — 42 
Fixed maturity securities:
Government securities — 237 — 237 
Corporate securities — 394 — 394 
Asset-backed securities — 137 — 137 
Other types of investments:
Commingled fund — 112 — 112 
Insurance company contracts — — 189 189 
Total pension benefit assets at fair value $ 990 $ 880 $ 189 2,059 
Partnership investments 74 
Total pension benefit assets $ 2,133 
Other Benefit Assets:
Equity securities:
U.S. securities $ 9 $ — $ — $ 9 
Foreign securities 3 — — 3 
Mutual funds 23 — — 23 
Fixed maturity securities:
Government securities — 2 — 2 
Corporate securities — 4 — 4 
Asset-backed securities — 3 — 3 
Other types of investments:
Commingled fund — 2 — 2 
Life insurance contracts — — 323 323 
Investment in DOL 103-12 trust — 11 — 11 
Total other benefit assets $ 35 $ 22 $ 323 $ 380 
-116-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The fair values of our pension benefit assets and other benefit assets by asset category and level inputs at December 31, 2019,
excluding cash, investment income receivable and amounts due to/from brokers, resulting in a net asset of $64, are as follows:
Level I Level II Level III Total
December 31, 2019
Pension Benefit Assets:
Equity securities:
U.S. securities $ 626 $ — $ — $ 626 
Foreign securities 197 — — 197 
Mutual funds 38 — — 38 
Fixed maturity securities:
Government securities — 252 — 252 
Corporate securities — 339 — 339 
Asset-backed securities — 163 — 163 
Other types of investments:
Insurance company contracts — — 175 175 
Commingled fund — 136 — 136 
Total pension benefit assets at fair value $ 861 $ 890 $ 175 1,926 
Partnership investments 52 
Total pension benefit assets $ 1,978 
Other Benefit Assets:
Equity securities:
U.S. securities $ 8 $ — $ — $ 8 
Foreign securities 2 — — 2 
Mutual funds 25 — — 25 
Fixed maturity securities:
Government securities — 2 — 2 
Corporate securities — 4 — 4 
Asset-backed securities — 3 — 3 
Other types of investments:
Life insurance contracts — — 294 294 
Investment in DOL 103-12 trust — 12 — 12 
Commingled fund — 1 — 1 
Total other benefit assets at fair value $ 35 $ 22 $ 294 $ 351 
-117-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances of plan assets measured at fair value using Level III inputs for the years
ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
Insurance
 Company
 ContractsLife
 Insurance
 Contracts Total
Year ended December 31, 2020
Beginning balance at January 1, 2020 $ 175 $ 294 $ 469 
Actual return on plan assets relating to assets still held at the reporting date 7 29 36 
Purchases 15 — 15 
Sales (8) — (8)
Ending balance at December 31, 2020 $ 189 $ 323 $ 512 
Year ended December 31, 2019
Beginning balance at January 1, 2019 $ 166 $ 249 $ 415 
Actual return on plan assets relating to assets still held at the reporting date 12 45 57 
Purchases 6 — 6 
Sales (9) — (9)
Ending balance at December 31, 2019 $ 175 $ 294 $ 469 
Year ended December 31, 2018
Beginning balance at January 1, 2018 $ 173 $ 269 $ 442 
Actual return on plan assets relating to assets still held at the reporting date (7) (15) (22)
Purchases 8 — 8 
Sales (8) (5) (13)
Ending balance at December 31, 2018 $ 166 $ 249 $ 415 
There were no other transfers into or out of Level III during the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 or 2018.
Our current funding strategy is to fund an amount at least equal to the minimum required funding as determined under ERISA
with consideration of maximum tax deductible amounts. We may elect to make discretionary contributions up to the maximum
amount deductible for income tax purposes. For the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, no material contributions
were necessary to meet ERISA required funding levels. However, during each of the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018, we made tax deductible discretionary contributions to the pension benefit plans of $7, $4, and $4. Employer contributions to
other benefit plans represent discretionary contributions and do not include payments to retirees for current benefits.
Our estimated future payments for pension benefits and postretirement benefits, which reflect expected future service, as
appropriate, are as follows:
Pension
 BenefitsOther
 Benefits
2021 $ 131 $ 35 
2022 128 34 
2023 126 32 
2024 121 31 
2025 119 30 
2026 - 2030 552 125 
-118-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
In addition to the defined benefit plans, we maintain the Anthem 401(k) Plan, which is a qualified defined contribution plan
covering substantially all employees. Voluntary employee contributions are matched by us subject to certain limitations.
Contributions made by us totaled $221, $201 and $211 during 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. Contributions in 2018 include
approximately $58 for a one time contribution made to employees following the enactment of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act.
12. Medical Claims Payable
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances for medical claims payable, by segment (see Note 20, “Segment
Information”), for the year ended December 31, 2020 is as follows:
Commercial
& Specialty
 BusinessGovernment
Business Other Total
Gross medical claims payable, beginning of year $ 3,039 $ 5,608 $ — $ 8,647 
Ceded medical claims payable, beginning of year (14) (19) — (33)
Net medical claims payable, beginning of year 3,025 5,589 — 8,614 
Business combinations and purchase adjustments — 141 198 339 
Net incurred medical claims:
Current year 24,894 58,912 1,288 85,094 
Prior years redundancies (375) (262) — (637)
Total net incurred medical claims 24,519 58,650 1,288 84,457 
Net payments attributable to:
Current year medical claims 21,736 51,602 1,291 74,629 
Prior years medical claims 2,527 5,165 — 7,692 
Total net payments 24,263 56,767 1,291 82,321 
Net medical claims payable, end of year 3,281 7,613 195 11,089 
Ceded medical claims payable, end of year 13 33 — 46 
Gross medical claims payable, end of year $ 3,294 $ 7,646 $ 195 $ 11,135 
Activity in our Other segment resulted from our acquisition of Beacon.
-119-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances for medical claims payable, by segment, for the year ended
December 31, 2019 is as follows:
Commercial
& Specialty
 BusinessGovernment
 Business Total
Gross medical claims payable, beginning of year $ 2,586 $ 4,680 $ 7,266 
Ceded medical claims payable, beginning of year (10) (24) (34)
Net medical claims payable, beginning of year 2,576 4,656 7,232 
Net incurred medical claims:
Current year 25,942 52,753 78,695 
Prior years redundancies (190) (310) (500)
Total net incurred medical claims 25,752 52,443 78,195 
Net payments attributable to:
Current year medical claims 23,026 47,268 70,294 
Prior years medical claims 2,277 4,242 6,519 
Total net payments 25,303 51,510 76,813 
Net medical claims payable, end of year 3,025 5,589 8,614 
Ceded medical claims payable, end of year 14 19 33 
Gross medical claims payable, end of year $ 3,039 $ 5,608 $ 8,647 
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances for medical claims payable, by segment, for the year ended
December 31, 2018 is as follows:
Commercial
& Specialty
 BusinessGovernment
 Business Total
Gross medical claims payable, beginning of year $ 3,383 $ 4,431 $ 7,814 
Ceded medical claims payable, beginning of year (78) (27) (105)
Net medical claims payable, beginning of year 3,305 4,404 7,709 
Business combinations and purchase adjustments — 199 199 
Net incurred medical claims:
Current year 24,094 45,487 69,581 
Prior years redundancies (456) (474) (930)
Total net incurred medical claims 23,638 45,013 68,651 
Net payments attributable to:
Current year medical claims 21,633 41,115 62,748 
Prior years medical claims 2,734 3,845 6,579 
Total net payments 24,367 44,960 69,327 
Net medical claims payable, end of year 2,576 4,656 7,232 
Ceded medical claims payable, end of year 10 24 34 
Gross medical claims payable, end of year $ 2,586 $ 4,680 $ 7,266 
Amounts incurred related to prior years vary from previously estimated liabilities as the claims are ultimately settled.
Liabilities at any period-end are continually reviewed and re-estimated as information regarding actual claims payments, or runout,
becomes known. This information is compared to the originally established year end liability. Negative amounts reported for
incurred medical claims related to prior years result from claims being settled for amounts less than originally estimated. The prior
year redundancy of $637 shown above for the year ended December 31, 2020 represents an estimate
-120-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
based on paid claim activity from January 1, 2020 to December 31, 2020. Medical claim liabilities are usually described as having a
“short tail,” which means that they are generally paid within twelve months of the member receiving service from the provider.
Accordingly, the majority of the $637 redundancy relates to claims incurred in calendar year 2019.
The following table provides a summary of the two key assumptions having the most significant impact on our incurred but not
paid liability estimates for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, which are the completion and trend factors. These
two key assumptions can be influenced by utilization levels, unit costs, mix of business, benefit plan designs, provider
reimbursement levels, processing system conversions and changes, claim inventory levels, claim processing patterns, claim
submission patterns and operational changes resulting from business combinations. The impact from COVID-19 on healthcare
utilization and medical claims submission patterns has increased estimation uncertainty on our incurred but not reported liability at
December 31, 2020. Slowdowns in claims submission patterns and increases in utilization levels for COVID-19 testing and
treatment during the fourth quarter of 2020 are the primary factors that lead to the increased estimation uncertainty.
 Favorable Developments
 by Changes in Key Assumptions
 2020 2019 2018
Assumed trend factors $ (599)$ (325)$ (515)
Assumed completion factors (38) (175) (415)
Total $ (637)$ (500)$ (930)
The favorable development recognized in 2020 resulted primarily from trend factors in late 2019 developing more favorably
than originally expected as well as a smaller contribution from completion factor development.
The favorable development recognized in 2019 resulted primarily from trend in late 2018 developing more favorably than
originally expected as well as a smaller but significant contribution from completion factor development.
The favorable development recognized in 2018 resulted from trend and completion factors developing more favorably than
originally expected.  
The reconciliation of net incurred medical claims to benefit expense included in the consolidated statements of income is as
follows:
Years Ended December 31
2020 2019 2018
Net incurred medical claims:
Commercial & Specialty Business $ 24,519 $ 25,752 $ 23,638 
Government Business 58,650 52,443 45,013 
Other 1,288 — — 
Total net incurred medical claims 84,457 78,195 68,651 
Quality improvement and other claims expense 3,588 3,591 3,244 
Benefit expense $ 88,045 $ 81,786 $ 71,895 
-121-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Incurred claims development, net of reinsurance, for the Commercial & Specialty Business for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
Commercial & Specialty BusinessCumulative Incurred Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
2018 2019
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2020
2018 & Prior $ 26,943 $ 26,753 $ 26,747 
2019 25,942 25,572 
2020 24,894 
Total $ 77,213 
Paid claims development, net of reinsurance, for the Commercial & Specialty Business for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
Commercial & Specialty BusinessCumulative Paid Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
2018 2019
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2020
2018 & Prior $ 24,367 $ 26,643 $ 26,721 
2019 23,026 25,475 
2020 21,736 
Total $ 73,932 
At December 31, 2020, the total of incurred but not reported liabilities plus expected development on reported claims for the
Commercial & Specialty Business was $26, $97 and $3,158 for the claim years 2018 and prior, 2019 and 2020, respectively.
At December 31, 2020, the cumulative number of reported claims for the Commercial & Specialty Business was 93, 87 and 74
for the claim years 2018 and prior, 2019 and 2020, respectively.
Incurred claims development, net of reinsurance, for the Government Business as of and for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
Government BusinessCumulative Incurred Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
2018 2019
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2020
2018 & Prior $ 49,616 $ 49,306 $ 49,278 
2019 52,753 52,518 
2020 59,053 
Total $ 160,849 
-122-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Paid claims development, net of reinsurance, for the Government Business as of and for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018 is as follows:
Government BusinessCumulative Paid Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
2018 2019
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2020
2018 & Prior $ 44,959 $ 49,201 $ 49,231 
2019 47,269 52,403 
2020 51,602 
Total $ 153,236 
At December 31, 2020, the total of incurred but not reported liabilities plus expected development on reported claims for the
Government Business was $47, $115 and $7,451 for the claim years 2018 and prior, 2019 and 2020, respectively.
At December 31, 2020, the cumulative number of reported claims for the Government Business was 225, 241 and 236 for the
claim years 2018 and prior, 2019 and 2020, respectively.
Incurred claims development, net of reinsurance, for Other as of and for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is
as follows:
OtherCumulative Incurred Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
2018 2019
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2020
2018 & Prior $ — $ — $ — 
2019 — — 
2020 1,486 
Total $ 1,486 
Paid claims development, net of reinsurance, for Other as of and for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as
follows:
OtherCumulative Paid Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
2018 2019
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2020
2018 & Prior $ — $ — $ — 
2019 — — 
2020 1,291 
Total $ 1,291 
At December 31, 2020, the total of incurred but not reported liabilities plus expected development on reported claims for Other
was $0, $0 and $195 for the claim years 2018 and prior, 2019 and 2020, respectively.
At December 31, 2020, the cumulative number of reported claims for Other was $0, $0, and $27 for the claim years 2018 and
prior, 2019 and 2020, respectively.
The information about incurred claims development, paid claims development and cumulative number of reported claims for
the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2019 for our Commercial & Specialty Business, Government Business and Other, is
unaudited and presented as supplementary information.
The cumulative number of reported claims for each claim year for our Commercial & Specialty Business, Government
Business and Other have been developed using historical data captured by our claim payment systems. The provided claim
-123-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
amounts are not a precise tool for understanding utilization of medical services. They could be impacted by a variety of factors
including changes in provider billing practices, provider reimbursement arrangements, mix of services, benefit design or processing
systems. The cumulative number of reported claims has been provided to comply with FASB accounting standards and is not used
by management in its claims analysis. Our cumulative number of reported claims may not be comparable to similar measures
reported by other health benefits companies.
The reconciliation of the Commercial & Specialty Business, Government Business and Other incurred and paid claims
development information for the three years ended December 31, 2020, reflected in the tables above, to the consolidated ending
balance for medical claims payable included in the consolidated balance sheet, as of December 31, 2020, is as follows:
Commercial
& Specialty
 BusinessGovernment
Business Other Total
Cumulative incurred claims and allocated claim adjustment
expenses, net of reinsurance $ 77,213 $ 160,849 $ 1,486 $ 239,548 
Less: Cumulative paid claims and allocated claim adjustment
expenses, net of reinsurance 73,932 153,236 1,291 228,459 
Net medical claims payable, end of year 3,281 7,613 195 11,089 
Ceded medical claims payable, end of year 13 33 — 46 
Insurance lines other than short duration — 224 — 224 
Gross medical claims payable, end of year $ 3,294 $ 7,870 $ 195 $ 11,359 
13. Debt
Short-term Borrowings
We are a member, through certain subsidiaries, of the Federal Home Loan Bank of Indianapolis, the Federal Home Loan Bank
of Cincinnati, the Federal Home Loan Bank of Atlanta and the Federal Home Loan Bank of New York, (collectively, the
“FHLBs”). As a member we have the ability to obtain short-term cash advances, subject to certain minimum collateral
requirements. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, $0 and $650, respectively, were outstanding under our short-term FHLB
borrowings. Outstanding short-term FHLB borrowings at December 31, 2019 had fixed interest rates of 1.664%.
Through certain subsidiaries, we have entered into multiple 364-day lines of credit (the “Subsidiary Credit Facilities”) with
separate lenders for general corporate purposes. The Subsidiary Credit Facilities provide combined credit of up to $300. The
interest rate on each line of credit is based on the LIBOR rate plus a predetermined rate. Our ability to borrow under the lines of
credit is subject to compliance with certain covenants. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, $0 and $50, respectively, were outstanding
under our Subsidiary Credit Facilities.
-124-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Long-term Debt
The carrying value of long-term debt at December 31, 2020 and 2019 consists of the following:
2020 2019
Senior unsecured notes:
2.500%, due 2020 $ — $ 899 
4.350%, due 2020 — 699 
3.700%, due 2021 700 699 
2.950%, due 2022 749 747 
3.125%, due 2022 848 847 
3.300%, due 2023 1,027 1,013 
3.350%, due 2024 847 846 
3.500%, due 2024 796 795 
2.375%, due 2025 1,253 845 
3.650%, due 2027 1,591 1,590 
4.101%, due 2028 1,257 1,253 
2.875%, due 2029 819 819 
2.250%, due 2030 1,089 — 
5.950%, due 2034 334 334 
5.850%, due 2036 396 396 
6.375%, due 2037 366 366 
5.800%, due 2040 114 124 
4.625%, due 2042 873 888 
4.650%, due 2043 978 987 
4.650%, due 2044 779 792 
5.100%, due 2044 565 594 
4.375%, due 2047 1,387 1,386 
4.550%, due 2048 839 838 
3.700%, due 2049 811 811 
3.125%, due 2050 987 — 
4.850%, due 2054 247 247 
Surplus note:
9.000%, due 2027 25 25 
Senior convertible debentures:
2.750%, due 2042 108 145 
Variable rate debt:
Commercial paper program 250 400 
Total long-term debt 20,035 19,385 
Current portion of long-term debt (700) (1,598)
Long-term debt, less current portion $ 19,335 $ 17,787 
All debt is a direct obligation of Anthem, Inc., except for the surplus note, the FHLB borrowings and the Subsidiary Credit
Facilities.
-125-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
We generally issue senior unsecured notes (“Notes”) for long-term borrowing purposes. Certain of these Notes may have a call
feature that allows us to redeem the Notes at any time at our option and/or a put feature that allows a Note holder to redeem the
Notes upon the occurrence of both a change in control event and a downgrade of the Notes below an investment grade rating.
On November 23, 2020, we repaid, at maturity, the $900 outstanding balance of our 2.500% senior unsecured notes. On
August 17, 2020, we repaid, at maturity, the $700 outstanding balance of our 4.350% senior unsecured notes.
Additionally, during the year ended December 31, 2020, we repurchased $79 of outstanding principal amount of certain other
senior unsecured notes, plus applicable premium for early redemption plus accrued and unpaid interest, for cash totaling $109. We
recognized a loss on extinguishment of debt of $30 for the repurchase of these notes.
On May 5, 2020, we issued $400 aggregate principal amount of additional senior notes pursuant to a reopening of our existing
2.375% Notes due 2025 (the “2025 Notes”), $1,100 aggregate principal amount of 2.250% Notes due 2030 (the “2030 Notes”), and
$1,000 aggregate principal amount of 3.125% Notes due 2050 (the “2050 Notes”) under our shelf registration statement. The 2025
Notes constitute an additional issuance of our 2.375% notes due 2025, of which $850 aggregate principal amount was issued on
September 9, 2019. Interest on the 2025 Notes is deemed to have accrued from January 15, 2020 and is payable semi-annually in
arrears on January 15 and July 15 of each year, commencing July 15, 2020. Interest on the 2030 Notes and 2050 Notes is payable
semi-annually in arrears on May 15 and November 15 of each year, commencing November 15, 2020. The proceeds were used for
working capital and general corporate purposes, including, but not limited to, repayment of short-term and long-term debt,
repurchase of our common stock pursuant to our share repurchase program and to fund acquisitions.
On September 9, 2019, we issued $850 aggregate principal amount of the 2025 Notes, $825 aggregate principal amount of
2.875% Notes due 2029 (the “2029 Notes”), and $825 aggregate principal amount of 3.700% Notes due 2049 (the “2049 Notes”)
under our shelf registration statement. Interest on the 2025 Notes is payable semi-annually in arrears on January 15 and July 15 of
each year, commencing January 15, 2020. Interest on the 2029 Notes and the 2049 Notes is payable semi-annually in arrears on
March 15 and September 15 each year, commencing March 15, 2020. The proceeds were used for working capital and general
corporate purposes, including, but not limited to, the repurchase of our common stock pursuant to our share repurchase program,
repayment of short-term and long-term debt and to fund acquisitions.
On August 15, 2019, we repaid, at maturity, the $850 outstanding balance of our 2.250% senior unsecured notes.
On July 16, 2018, we repaid, at maturity, the $650 outstanding balance of our 2.300% senior unsecured notes. On January 15,
2018, we repaid, at maturity, the $625 outstanding balance of our 1.875% senior unsecured notes.
On May 1, 2018, we settled our Equity Units stock purchase contracts at a settlement rate of 0.2412 shares of our common
stock, using a market value formula set forth in the Equity Units purchase contracts. This resulted in the issuance of approximately
6 shares. We had issued 25 Equity Units on May 12, 2015, pursuant to an underwriting agreement dated May 6, 2015, in an
aggregate principal amount of $1,250. Each Equity Unit had a stated amount of $50 (whole dollars) and consisted of a purchase
contract obligating the holder to purchase a certain number of shares of our common stock on May 1, 2018, subject to earlier
termination or settlement, for a price in cash of $50 (whole dollars); and a 5% undivided beneficial ownership interest in $1,000
(whole dollars) principal amount of our 1.900% remarketable subordinated notes (“RSNs”), due 2028. On March 2, 2018, we
remarketed the RSNs and used the proceeds to purchase U.S. Treasury securities that were pledged to secure the stock purchase
obligations of the holders of the Equity Units. The purchasers of the RSNs transferred the RSNs to us in exchange for $1,250
principal amount of our 4.101% senior notes due 2028 (the “2028 Notes”), and a cash payment of $4. We canceled the RSNs upon
receipt and recognized a loss on extinguishment of debt of $18. At the remarketing, we also issued $850 aggregate principal
amount of 4.550% notes due 2048 (the “2048 Notes”) under our shelf registration statement. We used the proceeds from the 2048
Notes for working capital and general corporate purposes. Interest on the 2028 Notes and the 2048 Notes is payable semi-annually
in arrears on March 1 and September 1 of each year, commencing on September 1, 2018.
The surplus note is an unsecured obligation of Anthem Insurance Companies, Inc. (“Anthem Insurance”), a wholly owned
subsidiary, and is subordinate in right of payment to all of Anthem Insurance’s existing and future indebtedness. Any payment of
interest or principal on the surplus note may be made only with the prior approval of the Indiana Department of
-126-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Insurance (“IDOI”) and only out of capital and surplus funds of Anthem Insurance that the IDOI determines to be available for the
payment under Indiana insurance laws.
We have a senior revolving credit facility (the “5-Year Facility”) with a group of lenders for general corporate purposes. The 5-
Year Facility provides credit up to $2,500 and matures in June 2024. We also have a 364-day senior revolving credit facility (the
“364-Day Facility”) with a group of lenders for general corporate purposes, which provides for credit in the amount of $1,000. In
May 2020, we amended and extended the 364-Day Facility, which now matures in June 2021. Our ability to borrow under these
credit facilities is subject to compliance with certain covenants, including covenants requiring us to maintain a defined debt-to-
capital ratio of not more than 60%, subject to increase in certain circumstances set forth in the applicable credit agreement. As of
December 31, 2020, our debt-to-capital ratio, as defined and calculated under the credit facilities, was 37.6%. We do not believe the
restrictions contained in any of our credit facility covenants materially affect our financial or operating flexibility. As of December
31, 2020, we were in compliance with all of the debt covenants under these credit facilities. There were no amounts outstanding
under the 364-Day Facility at any time during the years ended December 31, 2020 or the year ended December 31, 2019. At
December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019, there were no amounts outstanding under our 5-Year Facility.
We have an authorized commercial paper program of up to $3,500, the proceeds of which may be used for general corporate
purposes. At December 31, 2020, we had $250 outstanding under our commercial paper program with a weighted-average interest
rate of 0.1600%. At December 31, 2019, we had $400 outstanding under our commercial paper program with a weighted-average
interest rate of 1.8528%. Commercial paper borrowings have been classified as long-term debt at December 31, 2020 and 2019, as
our general practice and intent is to replace short-term commercial paper outstanding at expiration with additional short-term
commercial paper for an uninterrupted period extending for more than one year, and we have the ability to redeem our commercial
paper with borrowings under the senior revolving credit facilities described above.
Convertible Debentures
On October 9, 2012, we issued $1,500 of senior convertible debentures (the “Debentures”) in a private offering to qualified
institutional buyers pursuant to Rule 144A under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the “Securities Act”). The Debentures are
governed by an indenture dated as of October 9, 2012 between us and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as
trustee (the “Indenture”). The Debentures bear interest at a rate of 2.750% per year, payable semi-annually in arrears in cash on
April 15 and October 15 of each year, and mature on October 15, 2042, unless earlier redeemed, repurchased or converted into
shares of common stock at the applicable conversion rate. The Debentures also have a contingent interest feature that will require
us to pay additional interest based on certain thresholds and for certain events, as defined in the Indenture, beginning on
October 15, 2022.
Holders may convert their Debentures at their option prior to the close of business on the business day immediately preceding
April 15, 2042, only under the following circumstances: (1) during any fiscal quarter if the last reported sale price of our common
stock for at least 20 trading days during a period of 30 consecutive trading days ending on the last trading day of the preceding
fiscal quarter is greater than or equal to 130% of the applicable conversion price on each applicable trading day; (2) during the five
business day period after any 10 consecutive trading day period (the “measurement period”) in which the trading price per $1,000
(whole dollars) principal amount of Debentures for each trading day of that measurement period was less than 98% of the product
of the last reported sale price of our common stock and the applicable conversion rate on each such day; (3) if we call any or all of
the Debentures for redemption, at any time prior to the close of business on the third scheduled trading day prior to the redemption
date; or (4) upon the occurrence of specified corporate events, as defined in the Indenture. On and after April 15, 2042 and until the
close of business on the third scheduled trading day immediately preceding the Debentures’ maturity date of October 15, 2042,
holders may convert their Debentures into common stock at any time irrespective of the preceding circumstances. The Debentures
are redeemable at our option at any time on or after October 20, 2022, upon the occurrence of certain events, as defined in the
Indenture.
Upon conversion of the Debentures, we will deliver cash up to the aggregate principal amount of the Debentures converted.
With respect to any conversion obligation in excess of the aggregate principal amount of the Debentures converted, we have the
option to settle the excess with cash, shares of our common stock or a combination thereof based on a daily conversion value,
determined in accordance with the Indenture. The initial conversion rate for the Debentures was 13.2319 shares of our common
stock per Debenture, which represented a 25% conversion premium based on the closing price of $60.46 per share of our common
stock on October 2, 2012 (the date the Debentures’ terms were finalized) and is equivalent to an initial conversion price of
$75.575 per share of our common stock.
-127-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
During the year ended December 31, 2020, $56 aggregate principal amount of the Debentures was surrendered for conversion
by certain holders in accordance with the terms and provisions of the Indenture. We elected to settle the excess of the principal
amount of the conversions with cash for total payments of $222. We recognized a loss on the extinguishment of debt related to the
Debentures of $6, based on the fair values of the debt on the conversion settlement dates. During the year ended December 31,
2019, we repurchased $15 of the aggregate principal balance of the Debentures. In addition, $57 aggregate principal amount of the
Debentures was surrendered for conversion by certain holders in accordance with the terms and provisions of the Indenture. We
elected to settle the excess of the principal amount of the repurchases and conversions with cash for total payments of $273. We
recognized a loss on the extinguishment of debt related to the Debentures of $2. During the year ended December 31, 2018, $109
aggregate principal amount of the Debentures was surrendered for conversion. We elected to settle the excess of the principal
amount of the conversions with cash for total payments of $402. We recognized a gain on the extinguishment of debt related to the
Debentures of $7.
As of December 31, 2020, our common stock was last traded at a price of $321.09 per share. If the remaining Debentures had
been converted or matured at December 31, 2020, we would have been obligated to pay the principal of the Debentures plus an
amount in cash or shares equal to $560. The Debentures and underlying shares of our common stock have not been and will not be
registered under the Securities Act, or any state securities laws, and may not be offered or sold in the United States absent
registration or an applicable exemption from registration requirements.
We have accounted for the Debentures in accordance with the cash conversion guidance in FASB guidance for debt with
conversion and other options. As a result, the value of the embedded conversion option, net of deferred taxes and equity issuance
costs, has been bifurcated from its debt host and recorded as a component of additional paid-in capital in our consolidated balance
sheets.
The following table summarizes, at December 31, 2020, the related balances, conversion rate and conversion price of the
Debentures:
Outstanding principal amount $ 159 
Unamortized debt discount $ 49 
Net debt carrying amount $ 108 
Equity component carrying amount $ 58 
Conversion rate (shares of common stock per $1,000 of principal amount) 14.0808 
Effective conversion price (per $1,000 of principal amount) $ 71.0187 
The remaining amortization period of the unamortized debt discount as of December 31, 2020 is approximately 22 years. The
unamortized discount will be amortized into interest expense using the effective interest method based on an effective interest rate
of 5.130%, which represents the market interest rate for a comparable debt instrument that does not have a conversion feature.
During the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, we recognized $6, $9 and $12, respectively, of interest expense related
to the Debentures, of which $5, $7 and $10, respectively, represented interest expense recognized at the stated interest rate of
2.750% and $1, $2 and $2, respectively, represented interest expense resulting from amortization of the debt discount.
Total interest paid during 2020, 2019 and 2018 was $794, $755, and $728, respectively. 
We were in compliance with all applicable covenants under all of our outstanding debt agreements at December 31, 2020 and
2019.
Future maturities of all long-term debt outstanding at December 31, 2020 are as follows: 2021, $950; 2022, $1,597; 2023,
$1,027; 2024, $1,643; 2025, $1,253 and thereafter, $13,565.
14. Commitments and Contingencies
Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings
In the ordinary course of business, we are defendants in, or parties to, a number of pending or threatened legal actions or
proceedings. To the extent a plaintiff or plaintiffs in the following cases have specified in their complaint or in other court
-128-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
filings the amount of damages being sought, we have noted those alleged damages in the descriptions below. With respect to the
cases described below, we contest liability and/or the amount of damages in each matter and believe we have meritorious defenses.
Where available information indicates that it is probable that a loss has been incurred as of the date of the consolidated
financial statements and we can reasonably estimate the amount of that loss, we accrue the estimated loss by a charge to income. In
many proceedings, however, it is difficult to determine whether any loss is probable or reasonably possible. In addition, even where
loss is possible or an exposure to loss exists in excess of the liability already accrued with respect to a previously identified loss
contingency, it is not always possible to reasonably estimate the amount of the possible loss or range of loss.
With respect to many of the proceedings to which we are a party, we cannot provide an estimate of the possible losses, or the
range of possible losses in excess of the amount, if any, accrued, for various reasons, including but not limited to some or all of
the following: (i) there are novel or unsettled legal issues presented, (ii) the proceedings are in early stages, (iii) there is
uncertainty as to the likelihood of a class being certified or decertified or the ultimate size and scope of the class, (iv) there is
uncertainty as to the outcome of pending appeals or motions, (v) there are significant factual issues to be resolved, and/or (vi) in
many cases, the plaintiffs have not specified damages in their complaint or in court filings. For those legal proceedings where a
loss is probable, or reasonably possible, and for which it is possible to reasonably estimate the amount of the possible loss or
range of losses, we currently believe that the range of possible losses, in excess of established reserves is, in the aggregate, from
$0 to approximately $250 at December 31, 2020. This estimated aggregate range of reasonably possible losses is based upon
currently available information taking into account our best estimate of such losses for which such an estimate can be made.
Blue Cross Blue Shield Antitrust Litigation
We are a defendant in multiple lawsuits that were initially filed in 2012 against the BCBSA and Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield
licensees (the “Blue plans”) across the country. Cases filed in twenty-eight states were consolidated into a single, multi-district
proceeding captioned In re Blue Cross Blue Shield Antitrust Litigation that is pending in the United States District Court for the
Northern District of Alabama (the “Court”). Generally, the suits allege that the BCBSA and the Blue plans have conspired to
horizontally allocate geographic markets through license agreements, best efforts rules that limit the percentage of non-Blue
revenue of each plan, restrictions on acquisitions, rules governing the BlueCardand National Accounts programs and other
arrangements in violation of the Sherman Antitrust Act (“Sherman Act”) and related state laws. The cases were brought by two
putative nationwide classes of plaintiffs, health plan subscribers and providers.
In response to cross motions for partial summary judgment by plaintiffs and defendants, the Court issued an order in April
2018 determining that the defendants’ aggregation of geographic market allocations and output restrictions are to be analyzed under
a per se standard of review, and the BlueCardprogram and other alleged Section 1 Sherman Act violations are to be analyzed
under the rule of reason standard of review. The Court also found that there remain genuine issues of material fact as to whether the
defendants operate as a single entity with regard to the enforcement of the Blue Cross Blue Shield trademarks. In April 2019,
plaintiffs filed their motions for class certification in conjunction with their supporting expert reports, and the defendants filed their
motions to exclude plaintiffs’ experts, as well as their opposition to plaintiffs’ motions for class certification, in July 2019.
The BCBSA and Blue plans have approved a settlement agreement and release (the “Subscriber Settlement Agreement”) with
the subscriber plaintiffs. If approved by the Court, the Subscriber Settlement Agreement will require the defendants to make a
monetary settlement payment, our portion of which is estimated to be $594, and will contain certain non-monetary terms including
(i) eliminating the “national best efforts” rule in the BCBSA license agreements (which rule limits the percentage of non-Blue
revenue permitted for each Blue plan) and (ii) allowing for some large national employers with self-funded benefit plans to request
a bid for insurance coverage from a second Blue plan in addition to the local Blue plan. We recognized our estimated payment
obligation of $548, net of third party insurance coverage received as of December 31, 2020.
On November 30, 2020, the Court issued an order preliminarily approving the Subscriber Settlement Agreement, following
which members of the Subscriber class were provided notice of the Settlement Agreement and an opportunity to opt out of the
class. All terms of the Subscriber Settlement Agreement are subject to final approval by the Court before they® 
® 
-129-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
become effective. Objections to the settlement as well as the deadline for those that wish to opt-out from the settlement must be
submitted by July 28, 2021. Claims must be filed by November 5, 2021. A final approval hearing has been scheduled for October
20, 2021. If the Court grants approval of the Subscriber Settlement Agreement, and after all appellate rights have expired or have
been exhausted in a manner that affirms the Court’s final order and judgment, the defendants’ payment and non-monetary
obligations under the Subscriber Settlement Agreement will become effective.
In October 2020, after the Court lifted the stay as to the provider litigation, provider plaintiffs filed a renewed motion for class
certification, and defendants filed an opposition to that motion. We intend to continue to vigorously defend the provider suit;
however, its ultimate outcome cannot be presently determined.
Blue Cross of California Taxation Litigation
In July 2013, our California affiliate Blue Cross of California (doing business as Anthem Blue Cross) (“BCC”) was named as
a defendant in a California taxpayer action filed in Los Angeles County Superior Court (the “Superior Court”) captioned Michael
D. Myers v. State Board of Equalization, et al. This action was brought under a California statute that permits an individual
taxpayer to sue a governmental agency when the taxpayer believes the agency has failed to enforce governing law. Plaintiff
contends that BCC, a licensed Health Care Service Plan, is an “insurer” for purposes of taxation despite acknowledging it is not
an “insurer” under regulatory law. At the time, under California law, “insurers” were required to pay a gross premiums tax
(“GPT”) calculated as 2.35% on gross premiums. As a licensed Health Care Service Plan, BCC has paid the California Corporate
Franchise Tax (“CFT”), the tax paid by California businesses generally. Plaintiff contends that BCC must pay the GPT rather than
the CFT, and seeks a writ of mandate directing the taxing agencies to collect the GPT and an order requiring BCC to pay GPT
back taxes, interest, and penalties for the eight-year period prior to the filing of the complaint.
Because the GPT is constitutionally imposed in lieu of certain other taxes, BCC has filed protective tax refund claims with
the City of Los Angeles, the California Department of Health Care Services and the Franchise Tax Board to protect its rights to
recover certain taxes previously paid should BCC eventually be determined to be subject to the GPT for the tax periods at issue in
the litigation.
In March 2018, the Superior Court denied BCC's motion for judgment on the pleadings and similar motions brought by other
entities. BCC filed a motion for summary judgment with the Superior Court, which was heard in October 2020. In December
2020, the Superior Court granted BCC's motion for summary judgment, dismissing the plaintiff's lawsuit. We intend to vigorously
defend any appeal of this lawsuit.
Express Scripts, Inc. Pharmacy Benefit Management Litigation
In March 2016, we filed a lawsuit against Express Scripts, Inc. (“Express Scripts”), our vendor at the time for PBM services,
captioned Anthem, Inc. v. Express Scripts, Inc., in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New York. The lawsuit seeks
to recover over $14,800 in damages for pharmacy pricing that is higher than competitive benchmark pricing under the agreement
between the parties (the “ESI PBM Agreement”), over $158 in damages related to operational breaches, as well as various
declarations under the ESI PBM Agreement, including that Express Scripts: (i) breached its obligation to negotiate in good faith
and to agree in writing to new pricing terms; (ii) was required to provide competitive benchmark pricing to us through the term of
the ESI PBM Agreement; (iii) has breached the ESI PBM Agreement; and (iv) is required under the ESI PBM Agreement to
provide post-termination services, at competitive benchmark pricing, for one year following any termination.
Express Scripts has disputed our contractual claims and is seeking declaratory judgments: (i) regarding the timing of the
periodic pricing review under the ESI PBM Agreement, and (ii) that it has no obligation to ensure that we receive any specific level
of pricing, that we have no contractual right to any change in pricing under the ESI PBM Agreement and that its sole obligation is
to negotiate proposed pricing terms in good faith. In the alternative, Express Scripts claims that we have been unjustly enriched by
its payment of $4,675 at the time we entered into the ESI PBM Agreement. In March 2017, the court granted our motion to dismiss
Express Scripts’ counterclaims for (i) breach of the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing, and (ii) unjust enrichment with
prejudice. The only remaining claims are for breach of contract and declaratory relief. Rebuttal expert reports were submitted in
October 2020, discovery must be completed in April 2021, and motions for summary judgment must be filed in May 2021. We
intend to vigorously pursue our claims and defend against any counterclaims, which we believe are without merit; however, the
ultimate outcome cannot be presently determined.
-130-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
In re Express Scripts/Anthem ERISA Litigation
We are a defendant in a class action lawsuit that was initially filed in June 2016 against Anthem, Inc. and Express Scripts,
which has been consolidated into a single multi-district lawsuit captioned In Re Express Scripts/Anthem ERISA Litigation, in the
U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New York. The consolidated complaint was filed by plaintiffs against Express
Scripts and us on behalf of all persons who are participants in or beneficiaries of any ERISA or non-ERISA healthcare plan from
December 1, 2009 to December 31, 2019 in which we provided prescription drug benefits through the ESI PBM Agreement and
paid a percentage based co-insurance payment in the course of using that prescription drug benefit. The plaintiffs allege that we
breached our duties, either under ERISA or with respect to the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing implied in the health
plans, (i) by failing to adequately monitor Express Scripts’ pricing under the ESI PBM Agreement, (ii) by placing our own
pecuniary interest above the best interests of our insureds by allegedly agreeing to higher pricing in the ESI PBM Agreement in
exchange for the purchase price for our NextRx PBM business, and (iii) with respect to the non-ERISA members, by negotiating
and entering into the ESI PBM Agreement that was allegedly detrimental to the interests of such non-ERISA members. Plaintiffs
seek to hold us and Express Scripts jointly and severally liable and to recover all losses suffered by the proposed class, equitable
relief, disgorgement of alleged ill-gotten gains, injunctive relief, attorney’s fees and costs and interest.
In April 2017, we filed a motion to dismiss the claims brought against us, and it was granted, without prejudice, in January
2018. Plaintiffs filed a notice of appeal with the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit (the “Second Circuit”),
which was heard in October 2018. In December 2020, the Second Circuit affirmed the trial court's decision dismissing the ERISA
complaint. Plaintiffs have filed a Petition for Rehearing and Rehearing En Banc. We intend to vigorously defend this suit; however,
its ultimate outcome cannot be presently determined.
Cigna Corporation Merger Litigation
In July 2015, we and Cigna Corporation (“Cigna”) announced that we entered into the Cigna Agreement and Plan of Merger
(“Cigna Merger Agreement”) pursuant to which we would acquire all outstanding shares of Cigna. In July 2016, the U.S.
Department of Justice (“DOJ”) along with certain state attorneys general, filed a civil antitrust lawsuit in the U.S. District Court for
the District of Columbia (“District Court”) seeking to block the merger. In February 2017, Cigna purported to terminate the Cigna
Merger Agreement and commenced litigation against us in the Delaware Court of Chancery (“Delaware Court”) seeking damages,
including the $1,850 termination fee pursuant to the terms of the Cigna Merger Agreement, and a declaratory judgment that its
purported termination of the Cigna Merger Agreement was lawful, among other claims, which is captioned Cigna Corp. v. Anthem
Inc.
Also in February 2017, we initiated our own litigation against Cigna in the Delaware Court seeking a temporary restraining
order to enjoin Cigna from terminating the Cigna Merger Agreement, specific performance compelling Cigna to comply with the
Cigna Merger Agreement and damages, which is captioned Anthem Inc. v. Cigna Corp. In April 2017, the U.S. Circuit Court of
Appeals for the District of Columbia affirmed the ruling of the District Court, which blocked the merger. In May 2017, after the
Delaware Court denied our motion to enjoin Cigna from terminating the Cigna Merger Agreement, we delivered to Cigna a notice
terminating the Cigna Merger Agreement.
In the Delaware Court litigation, trial commenced in late February 2019 and concluded in March 2019. The Delaware Court
held closing arguments in November 2019 and took the matter under consideration. In August 2020, the Delaware Court issued an
opinion finding that neither party was owed damages and that we did not owe Cigna the $1,850 termination fee. The Delaware
Court issued an order implementing its opinion in October 2020. Cigna filed its notice of appeal in November 2020 challenging the
Court's decision that Anthem did not owe Cigna a termination fee. Cigna filed its appellate brief in December 2020, and we filed
our response in January 2021. We believe Cigna’s allegations are without merit and we intend to vigorously defend against Cigna’s
allegations; however, the ultimate outcome of the appeal of this litigation with Cigna cannot be presently determined.
In October 2018, a shareholder filed a derivative lawsuit in the State of Indiana Marion County Superior Court, captioned
Henry Bittmann, Derivatively, et al. v. Joseph R Swedish, et al., purportedly on behalf of us and our shareholders against certain
current and former directors and officers alleging breaches of fiduciary duties, unjust enrichment and corporate waste associated
with the Cigna Merger Agreement. This case has been stayed at the request of the parties pending
-131-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
the outcome of our litigation with Cigna in the Delaware Court. This lawsuit’s ultimate outcome cannot be presently determined.
Medicare Risk Adjustment Litigation
In March 2020, the DOJ filed a civil lawsuit against Anthem, Inc. in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New
York in a case captioned United States v. Anthem, Inc. The DOJ’s suit alleges, among other things, that we falsely certified the
accuracy of the diagnosis data we submitted to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (“CMS”) for risk-adjustment
purposes under Medicare Part C and knowingly failed to delete inaccurate diagnosis codes. The DOJ further alleges that, as a result
of these purported acts, we caused CMS to calculate the risk-adjustment payments based on inaccurate diagnosis information,
which enabled us to obtain unspecified amounts of payments in Medicare funds in violation of the False Claims Act. The DOJ filed
an amended complaint in July 2020, alleging the same causes of action but revising some of its allegations. In September 2020, we
filed a motion to transfer the lawsuit to the Southern District of Ohio, a motion to dismiss part of the lawsuit, and a motion to strike
certain allegations in the amended complaint. The motions are fully briefed and no decision has been rendered. We intend to
continue to vigorously defend this suit; however, the ultimate outcome cannot be presently determined.
Investigations of CareMore and HealthSun
With the assistance of outside counsel, we are conducting investigations of risk-adjustment practices involving data submitted
to CMS (unrelated to our retrospective chart review program) at CareMore Health Plans, Inc. (“CareMore”), one of our California
subsidiaries, and HealthSun Health Plans, Inc. (“HealthSun”), one of our Florida subsidiaries. Our CareMore investigation has
resulted in the termination of CareMore’s relationship with one contracted provider in California. Our HealthSun investigation
focuses on risk adjustment practices initiated prior to our acquisition of HealthSun in December 2017 that continued after the
acquisition. We have voluntarily self-disclosed the existence of both of our investigations to CMS and the Criminal Division of the
DOJ, which then initiated an investigation. We are cooperating with the government's investigation. We are in the process of
analyzing the scope of potential data corrections to be submitted to CMS. We have also asserted indemnity claims for escrowed
funds under the HealthSun purchase agreement for, among other things, breach of healthcare and financial representation
provisions, based on the conduct discovered during our investigation. We are in active litigation with two groups of sellers
regarding part of the escrowed funds in cases captioned Shareholder Representative Services, LLC v. ATH Holding Company, LLC
and Highland Acquisition Holdings, LLC and LPPAS Representative, LLC v. ATH Holding Company, LLC, both pending in the
Delaware Court.
Cyber Attack Regulatory Proceedings and Litigation
In February 2015, we reported that we were the target of a sophisticated external cyber attack during which the attackers
gained unauthorized access to certain of our information technology systems and obtained personal information related to many
individuals and employees. To date, there is no evidence that credit card or medical information was accessed or obtained. Upon
discovery of the cyber attack, we took immediate action to remediate the security vulnerability and have continued to implement
security enhancements since this incident.
Federal and state agencies have investigated events related to the cyber attack, including how it occurred, its consequences and
our responses. In September 2020, we entered into a settlement to resolve the investigation by a multi-state group of attorneys
general, which was the final outstanding matter related to the 2015 cyber attack. We have undertaken commitments that align with
our ongoing and consistent focus to protect information in addition to a monetary payment of $39, which was fully accrued in a
prior period.
We have contingency plans and insurance coverage for certain expenses and potential liabilities of this nature and will pursue
coverage for all applicable losses; however, the ultimate outcome of our pursuit of insurance coverage cannot be presently
determined.
Other Contingencies
From time to time, we and certain of our subsidiaries are parties to various legal proceedings, many of which involve claims
for coverage encountered in the ordinary course of business. We, like HMOs and health insurers generally, exclude certain
healthcare and other services from coverage under our HMO, PPO and other plans. We are, in the ordinary course of
-132-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
business, subject to the claims of our enrollees arising out of decisions to restrict or deny reimbursement for uncovered services.
The loss of even one such claim, if it results in a significant punitive damage award, could have a material adverse effect on us. In
addition, the risk of potential liability under punitive damage theories may increase significantly the difficulty of obtaining
reasonable reimbursement of coverage claims.
In addition to the lawsuits described above, we are also involved in other pending and threatened litigation of the character
incidental to our business, and are from time to time involved as a party in various governmental investigations, audits, reviews and
administrative proceedings. These investigations, audits, reviews and administrative proceedings include routine and special
inquiries by state insurance departments, state attorneys general, the U.S. Attorney General and subcommittees of the U.S.
Congress. Such investigations, audits, reviews and administrative proceedings could result in the imposition of civil or criminal
fines, penalties, other sanctions and additional rules, regulations or other restrictions on our business operations. Any liability that
may result from any one of these actions, or in the aggregate, could have a material adverse effect on our consolidated financial
position or results of operations.
Contractual Obligations and Commitments
In March 2020, we entered into an agreement with a vendor for information technology infrastructure and related management
and support services through June 2025. The new agreement supersedes certain prior agreements for such services and includes
provisions for additional services not provided under those agreements. Our remaining commitment under this agreement at
December 31, 2020 is approximately $1,426. We will have the ability to terminate the agreement upon the occurrence of certain
events, subject to early termination fees.
Beginning in the second quarter of 2019, we began using our pharmacy benefits manager IngenioRx, Inc. (“IngenioRx”) to
market and offer PBM services to our fully-insured and self-funded affiliated health plan customers, as well as to external
customers outside of the health plans we own. The comprehensive prescription benefits management services portfolio includes,
but is not limited to, formulary management, pharmacy networks, prescription drug database, member services and mail order
capabilities. Also in the second quarter of 2019, IngenioRx began delegating certain PBM administrative functions, such as claims
processing and prescription fulfillment, to CaremarkPCS Health, L.L.C., which is a subsidiary of CVS Health Corporation,
pursuant to a five-year agreement. With IngenioRx, we retain the responsibilities for clinical and formulary strategy and
development, member and employer experiences, operations, sales, marketing, account management and retail network strategy.
Vulnerability from Concentrations
Financial instruments that potentially subject us to concentrations of credit risk consist primarily of cash equivalents,
investment securities, premium receivables and instruments held through hedging activities. All investment securities are managed
by professional investment managers within policies authorized by our Board of Directors. Such policies limit the amounts that
may be invested in any one issuer and prescribe certain investee company criteria. Concentrations of credit risk with respect to
premium receivables are limited due to the large number of employer groups that constitute our customer base in the states in
which we conduct business. As of December 31, 2020, there were no significant concentrations of financial instruments in a single
investee, industry or geographic location.
15. Capital Stock
Stock Incentive Plans
Our Board of Directors has adopted the 2017 Anthem Incentive Compensation Plan (“2017 Incentive Plan”) which has been
approved by our shareholders. The term of the 2017 Incentive Plan is such that no awards may be granted on or after May 18, 2027.
The 2017 Incentive Plan gives authority to the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors to make incentive awards to our
non-employee directors, employees and consultants, consisting of stock options, stock, restricted stock, restricted stock units, cash-
based awards, stock appreciation rights, performance shares and performance units. The 2017 Incentive Plan limits the number of
available shares for issuance to 37.5 shares, subject to adjustment as set forth in the 2017 Incentive Plan.
-133-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Stock options are granted for a fixed number of shares with an exercise price at least equal to the fair value of the shares at the
grant date. Stock options vest over three years in equal annual installments and generally have a term of ten years from the grant
date.
Certain option grants contain provisions whereby the employee continues to vest in the award subsequent to termination due to
retirement. Our attribution method for newly granted awards considers all vesting and other provisions, including retirement
eligibility, in determining the requisite service period over which the fair value of the awards will be recognized.
Awards of restricted stock or restricted stock units are issued at the fair value of the stock on the grant date and may also
include one or more performance measures that must be met for the award to vest. For restricted stock or restricted stock units
without performance measures, the restrictions lapse in three equal annual installments. Restricted stock or restricted stock units
with performance measures vest in three year installments. Performance units issued in 2020 will vest in 2023, based on certain
revenue and earnings targets over the three year period of 2020 to 2022. Performance units issued in 2019 will vest in 2022, based
on certain revenue and earnings targets over the three year period of 2019 to 2021. Performance units issued in 2018 will vest in
2021, based on certain revenue and earnings targets over the three year period of 2018 to 2020.
For the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, we recognized share-based compensation expense of $283, $294 and
$226, respectively, as well as related tax benefits of $74, $78 and $61, respectively.
A summary of stock option activity for the year ended December 31, 2020 is as follows:
Number of
 SharesWeighted-Average
 Option Price per
 ShareWeighted-Average
 Remaining
 Contractual Life
 (Years)Aggregate
 Intrinsic
 Value
Outstanding at January 1, 2020 3.1 $ 190.28 
Granted 1.0 271.61 
Exercised (0.9) 136.89 
Forfeited or expired (0.1) 273.91 
Outstanding at December 31, 2020 3.1 230.00 6.75$ 280 
Exercisable at December 31, 2020 1.6 185.08 5.37$ 217 
The intrinsic value of options exercised during the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 amounted to $147, $188
and $172, respectively. We recognized tax benefits of $40, $52 and $47 during the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively, from option exercises and disqualifying dispositions. During the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, we
received cash of $129, $143 and $141, respectively, from exercises of stock options.
The total fair value of restricted stock awards that vested during the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 was $335,
$245 and $237, respectively.
A summary of the status of nonvested restricted stock activity, including restricted stock units, for the year ended
December 31, 2020 is as follows:
Restricted
 Stock Shares
 and UnitsWeighted-Average
 Grant Date
 Fair Value
 per Share
Nonvested at January 1, 2020 1.4 $ 242.54 
Granted 1.3 272.37 
Vested (1.3) 196.25 
Forfeited (0.1) 272.50 
Nonvested at December 31, 2020 1.3 272.51 
-134-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
During the year ended December 31, 2020, we granted approximately 0.3 restricted stock units that are contingent upon us
achieving certain revenue and earning targets over the three year period of 2020 to 2022. These grants have been included in the
activity shown above, but will be subject to adjustment at the end of 2022, based on results in the three year period.
As of December 31, 2020, the total remaining unrecognized compensation expense related to nonvested stock options and
restricted stock, including restricted stock units, amounted to $30 and $154, respectively, which will be amortized over the
weighted-average remaining requisite service periods of 11 months and 13 months, respectively.
As of December 31, 2020, there were approximately 19.5 shares of common stock available for future grants under the 2017
Incentive Plan.
 Fair Value
We use a binomial lattice valuation model to estimate the fair value of all stock options granted. Expected volatility
assumptions used in the binomial lattice model are based on an analysis of implied volatilities of publicly traded options on our
stock and historical volatility of our stock price. The risk-free interest rate is derived from the U.S. Treasury strip rates at the time
of the grant. The expected term of the options was derived from the outputs of the binomial lattice model, which incorporates post-
vesting forfeiture assumptions based on an analysis of historical data. The dividend yield was based on our estimate of future
dividend yields. Similar groups of employees that have dissimilar exercise behavior are considered separately for valuation
purposes. We utilize the multiple-grant approach for recognizing compensation expense associated with each separately vesting
portion of the share-based award.
The following weighted-average assumptions were used to estimate the fair values of options granted during the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018:
2020 2019 2018
Risk-free interest rate 1.30 % 2.69 % 2.90 %
Volatility factor 26.00 % 25.00 % 30.00 %
Dividend yield (annual) 1.40 % 1.00 % 1.30 %
Weighted-average expected life (years) 4.30 4.40 3.70
The following weighted-average fair values were determined for the years ending December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018:
2020 2019 2018
Options granted during the year $ 54.05 $ 68.66 $ 55.48 
Restricted stock awards granted during the year 272.37 305.88 233.73 
The binomial lattice option-pricing model requires the input of highly subjective assumptions including the expected stock
price volatility. Because our stock option grants have characteristics significantly different from those of traded options, and
because changes in the subjective input assumptions can materially affect the fair value estimate, in our opinion, existing models do
not necessarily provide a reliable single measure of the fair value of our stock option grants.
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
We have registered 14.0 shares of common stock for the Employee Stock Purchase Plan (the “Stock Purchase Plan”) which is
intended to provide a means to encourage and assist employees in acquiring a stock ownership interest in Anthem. Pursuant to the
terms of the Stock Purchase Plan, an eligible employee is permitted to purchase no more than $25,000 (actual dollars) worth of
stock in any calendar year, based on the fair value of the stock at the end of each plan quarter. Employees become participants by
electing payroll deductions from 1% to 15% of gross compensation. Once purchased, the stock is accumulated in the employee’s
investment account. The Stock Purchase Plan allows participants to purchase shares of our common stock at a discounted price per
share of 90% of the fair value of a share of common stock on the lower of the first or last trading day of the plan quarter purchase
period. The Stock Purchase Plan discount was recognized as compensation expense for the year ended December 31, 2020, based
on GAAP guidance. There were 0.2 shares issued during the year ended December 31, 2020. As of December 31, 2020, 4.6 shares
were available for issuance under the Stock Purchase Plan.
-135-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Use of Capital and Stock Repurchase Program
We regularly review the appropriate use of capital, including acquisitions, common stock and debt security repurchases and
dividends to shareholders. The declaration and payment of any dividends or repurchases of our common stock or debt is at the
discretion of our Board of Directors and depends upon our financial condition, results of operations, future liquidity needs,
regulatory and capital requirements and other factors deemed relevant by our Board of Directors.
A summary of the cash dividend activity for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019 is as follows: 
Declaration Date Record Date Payment DateCash Dividend per
 Share Total
Year ended December 31, 2020
January 28, 2020 March 16, 2020 March 27, 2020 $ 0.95 $ 240 
April 28, 2020 June 10, 2020 June 25, 2020 0.95 242 
July 28, 2020 September 10, 2020 September 25, 2020 0.95 238 
October 27, 2020 December 7, 2020 December 22, 2020 0.95 234 
Year ended December 31, 2019
January 29, 2019 March 18, 2019 March 29, 2019 $ 0.80 $ 206 
April 23, 2019 June 10, 2019 June 25, 2019 0.80 206 
July 23, 2019 September 10, 2019 September 25, 2019 0.80 204 
October 22, 2019 December 5, 2019 December 20, 2019 0.80 202 
On January 26, 2021, our Audit Committee declared a quarterly cash dividend to shareholders of $1.13 per share on the
outstanding shares of our common stock. This quarterly dividend is payable on March 25, 2021 to the shareholders of record as of
March 10, 2021.
Under our Board of Directors’ authorization, we maintain a common stock repurchase program. On January 26, 2021, our
Audit Committee, pursuant to authorization granted by the Board of Directors, authorized a $5,000 increase to our common stock
repurchase program. Repurchases may be made from time to time at prevailing market prices, subject to certain restrictions on
volume, pricing and timing. The repurchases are effected from time to time in the open market, through negotiated transactions,
including accelerated share repurchase agreements, and through plans designed to comply with Rule 10b5-1 under the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Our stock repurchase program is discretionary, as we are under no obligation to repurchase
shares. We repurchase shares under the program when we believe it is a prudent use of capital. The excess cost of the repurchased
shares over par value is charged on a pro rata basis to additional paid-in capital and retained earnings. We temporarily suspended
our share repurchase program in March 2020 as a precautionary measure in light of the COVID-19 pandemic, but resumed the
program in late June 2020 after market conditions improved.
A summary of common stock repurchases for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
Years Ended December 31
 2020 2019
Shares repurchased 9.4 6.3 
Average price per share $ 286.35 $ 268.65 
Aggregate cost $ 2,700 $ 1,701 
Authorization remaining at end of year $ 1,092 $ 3,792 
We expect to utilize the remaining authorized amount over a multi-year period, subject to market and industry conditions.
For additional information regarding the use of capital for debt security repurchases, see Note 13, “Debt.”
-136-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
16. Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income
A reconciliation of the components of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) at December 31, 2020 and 2019 is as
follows:
2020 2019
Investments:
Gross unrealized gains $ 1,316 $ 720 
Gross unrealized losses (65) (44)
Net pretax unrealized gains 1,251 676 
Deferred tax liability (302) (155)
Net unrealized gains on investments 949 521 
Non-credit components of impairments on investments:
Gross unrealized losses (3) (3)
Deferred tax asset 1 1 
Net unrealized non-credit component of impairments on investments (2) (2)
Cash flow hedges:
Gross unrealized losses (316) (331)
Deferred tax asset 66 69 
Net unrealized losses on cash flow hedges (250) (262)
Defined benefit pension plans:
Deferred net actuarial loss (749) (734)
Deferred prior service cost — (1)
Deferred tax asset 190 188 
Net unrecognized periodic benefit costs for defined benefit pension plans (559) (547)
Postretirement benefit plans:
Deferred net actuarial loss (3) (25)
Deferred prior service credits 12 19 
Deferred tax (liability) asset (2) 2 
Net unrecognized periodic benefit credit (costs) for postretirement benefit plans 7 (4)
Foreign currency translation adjustments:
Gross unrealized gains (losses) 6 (3)
Deferred tax (liability) asset (1) 1 
Net unrealized gains (losses) on foreign currency translation adjustments 5 (2)
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) $ 150 $ (296)
-137-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Other comprehensive income (loss) reclassification adjustments for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 are as
follows:
2020 2019 2018
Investments:
Net holding gain (loss) on investment securities arising during the period, net of
tax (expense) benefit of $(160), $(198), and $133, respectively $ 478 $ 695 $ (465)
Reclassification adjustment for net realized (gain) loss on investment securities,
net of tax expense (benefit) of $13, $4, and $(13), respectively (50) (15) 47 
Total reclassification adjustment on investments 428 680 (418)
Non-credit component of impairments on investments:
Non-credit component of impairments on investments, net of tax benefit of $0,
$0, and $1, respectively — — (2)
Cash flow hedges:
Holding gain (loss), net of tax (expense) benefit of $(3), $4, and $(10),
respectively 12 (16) 37 
Other:
Net change in unrecognized periodic benefit costs for defined benefit pension and
postretirement benefit plans, net of tax (expense) benefit of $(2), $(9), and $29,
respectively (1) 26 (90)
Foreign currency translation adjustment, net of tax expense of $2, $0, and $0,
respectively 7 — (1)
Net gain (loss) recognized in other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax
(expense) benefit of $(154), $(199), and $140, respectively $ 446 $ 690 $ (474)
17. Reinsurance
We reinsure certain risks with other companies and assume risk from other companies. We remain primarily liable to
policyholders under ceded insurance contracts and are contingently liable for amounts recoverable from reinsurers in the event that
such reinsurers do not meet their contractual obligations.
A summary of direct, assumed and ceded premiums written and earned for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
is as follows:
 2020 2019 2018
Written Earned Written Earned Written Earned
Direct $102,479 $100,832 $ 91,579 $ 91,131 $ 83,652 $ 84,030 
Assumed 3,326 3,356 3,196 3,087 1,447 1,442 
Ceded (79) (79) (45) (45) (51) (51)
Net premiums $105,726 $104,109 $ 94,730 $ 94,173 $ 85,048 $ 85,421 
Percentage—assumed to net
premiums 3.1 % 3.2 % 3.4 % 3.3 % 1.7 % 1.7 %
The table above includes certain reclassifications between direct and assumed premiums for 2019 and 2018. These
reclassifications did not impact any amounts presented in the consolidated financial statements.
-138-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A summary of net premiums written and earned by segment (see Note 20, “Segment Information”) for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
 2020 2019 2018
Written Earned Written Earned Written Earned
Reportable segments:
Commercial & Specialty Business$ 31,745 $ 31,471 $ 32,113 $ 31,944 $ 30,661 $ 30,532 
Government Business 72,308 71,188 62,617 62,229 54,387 54,889 
Other 1,673 1,450 — — — — 
Net premiums $ 105,726 $ 104,109 $ 94,730 $ 94,173 $ 85,048 $ 85,421 
The effect of reinsurance on benefit expense for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Direct $ 85,168 $ 79,110 $ 70,789 
Assumed 2,967 2,733 1,179 
Ceded (90) (57) (73)
Net benefit expense $ 88,045 $ 81,786 $ 71,895 
 The effect of reinsurance on certain assets and liabilities at December 31, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
2020 2019
Policy liabilities, assumed $ 490 $ 471 
Unearned income, assumed 85 114 
Premiums payable, ceded 12 11 
Premiums receivable, assumed 347 324 
18. Leases
We lease office space and certain computer and related equipment using noncancelable operating leases. Our leases have
remaining lease terms of 1 year to 14 years.
The information related to our leases is as follows:
Balance Sheet Location December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Operating Leases
Right-of-use assets Other noncurrent assets $ 646 $ 575 
Lease liabilities, current Other current liabilities 110 158 
Lease liabilities, noncurrent Other noncurrent liabilities 847 482 
Years Ended December 31
2020 2019
Lease Expense
Operating lease expense $ 438$ 198 
Short-term lease expense 50 46 
Sublease income (9) (16)
Total lease expense $ 479$ 228 
Lease expense for 2018 was $207.
-139-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Our activities as disclosed in Note 4, “Business Optimization Initiatives”, include reducing our office space footprint. As a
result, we performed an interim impairment test and recorded an impairment charge of $258 for affected right-of-use assets in 2020
which is included in the operating lease expense shown above.
Years Ended December 31
2020 2019
Other information
Operating cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities,
operating leases $ 207$ 176
Right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for new lease liabilities, operating leases $ 384$ 112
Weighted average remaining lease term in years, operating leases 7 6
Weighted average discount rate, operating leases 3.21 % 4.09 %
At December 31, 2020, future lease payments for noncancelable operating leases with initial or remaining terms of one year or
more are as follows:
2021 $ 197 
2022 180 
2023 156 
2024 125 
2025 88 
Thereafter 236 
Total future minimum payments $ 982 
Less imputed interest (25)
Total lease liabilities $ 957 
As of December 31, 2020, we have additional operating leases for building spaces that have not yet commenced, and some
building spaces are being constructed by the lessors and their agents. These leases have terms of up to 12 years and are expected to
commence on various dates during 2021 when the construction is complete and we take possession of the buildings. The
undiscounted lease payments for these leases, which are not included in the tables above, aggregate $139.
19. Earnings per Share
The denominator for basic and diluted earnings per share at December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Denominator for basic earnings per share—weighted-average shares 250.8 255.5 258.1 
Effect of dilutive securities—employee stock options, non-vested restricted stock awards,
convertible debentures and equity units 3.5 4.8 6.1 
Denominator for diluted earnings per share 254.3 260.3 264.2 
During the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, weighted-average shares related to certain stock options of 1.2,
0.6 and 0.3, respectively, were excluded from the denominator for diluted earnings per share because the stock options were anti-
dilutive. The Equity Unit purchase contracts were settled in May 2018, and approximately 6.0 shares of our common stock were
issued and included in the basic earnings per share calculation.
During the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, we issued approximately 0.3, 0.2 and 0.3 restricted stock units,
respectively, of which vesting was contingent upon us meeting certain earnings targets. Contingent restricted stock units are
excluded from the denominator for diluted earnings per share and are included only if and when the contingency is met. The 2020
contingent restricted stock units are being measured over the three year period of 2020 through 2022, the 2019 contingent restricted
stock units are being measured over the three year period of 2019 through 2021 and the 2018 contingent restricted stock units are
being measured over the three year period of 2018 through 2020. Contingent restricted stock units generally vest in March of the
year following each measurement period.
-140-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
20. Segment Information
Beginning in 2020, IngenioRx meets the quantitative threshold for a reportable segment based on the FASB guidance. The
results of our operations are now described through four reportable segments: Commercial & Specialty Business, Government
Business, IngenioRx and Other.
Our Commercial & Specialty Business segment includes our Local Group, National Accounts, Individual and Specialty
businesses. Business units in the Commercial & Specialty Business segment offer fully-insured health products; provide a broad
array of managed care services to self-funded customers including claims processing, stop loss insurance, provider network access,
medical cost management, disease management, wellness programs, underwriting, actuarial services and other administrative
services; and provide an array of specialty and other insurance products and services such as dental, vision, life and disability
insurance benefits.
Our Government Business segment includes our Medicare and Medicaid businesses, National Government Services (“NGS”)
and services provided to the federal government in connection with the FEHB program. Our Medicare business includes services
such as Medicare Supplement plans; Medicare Advantage, including Special Needs Plans; Medicare Part D; and dual-eligible
programs through Medicare-Medicaid Plans. Medicare Advantage membership also includes Medicare Advantage members in our
Group Retiree Solutions business who are related to National Accounts, retired members of Local Group accounts, or retired
members of groups who are not affiliated with our Commercial accounts who have selected a Medicare Advantage product through
us. Our Medicaid business includes our managed care alternatives through publicly funded healthcare programs, including
Medicaid, ACA-related Medicaid expansion programs, Temporary Assistance for Needy Families programs, programs for seniors
and people with disabilities, Children’s Health Insurance Programs, and specialty programs such as those focused on long-term
services and support, HIV/AIDS, foster care, behavioral health and/or substance abuse disorders, and intellectual disabilities or
developmental disabilities. NGS acts as a Medicare contractor for the federal government in several regions across the nation.
Our IngenioRx segment includes our PBM business, which began its operations during the second quarter of 2019. IngenioRx
markets and offers PBM services to our affiliated health plan customers, as well as to external customers outside of the health plans
we own. IngenioRx has a comprehensive PBM services portfolio, which includes services such as formulary management,
pharmacy networks, prescription drug database, member services and mail order capabilities. In 2019, IngenioRx was included in
our Other reportable segment. Amounts for 2019 have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation for
comparability.
Our Other segment includes our Diversified Business Group (“DBG”), which is our integrated health services business, and
certain eliminations and corporate expenses not allocated to our other reportable segments. Also, beginning on February 28, 2020,
our Other segment includes Beacon.
We define operating revenues to include premium income, product revenue and administrative fees and other revenues.
Operating revenues are derived from premiums and fees received, primarily from the sale and administration of health benefit
products. Operating gain is calculated as total operating revenue less benefit expense, cost of products sold and selling, general and
administrative expense.
Through our participation in various federal government programs, we generated approximately 20.3%, 20.7% and 19.8% of
our total consolidated revenues from agencies of the U.S. government for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018,
respectively. These revenues are contained in the Government Business segment.
The accounting policies of the segments are consistent with those described in the summary of significant accounting policies
in Note 2, “Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies,” except that certain shared administrative expenses for each
segment are recognized on a pro rata allocated basis, which in the aggregate approximates the consolidated expense. Any difference
between the allocated expenses and actual consolidated expense is included in other expenses not allocated to reportable segments.
Affiliated revenues represent revenues or cost for services provided by IngenioRx and DBG to our subsidiaries, are recorded at cost
or management’s estimate of fair market value, and are eliminated in consolidation. We evaluate performance of the reportable
segments based on operating gain or loss as defined above. We evaluate net investment income, net realized gains (losses) on
financial instruments, interest expense, amortization expense, gain or loss on extinguishment of debt, income taxes and assets and
liabilities on a consolidated basis, as these items are managed in a corporate shared service environment and are not the
responsibility of segment operating management.
-141-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
For our 2019 segment reporting, operating gain generated from IngenioRx activities were allocated and included in our
Commercial & Specialty Business and Government Business based upon their utilization of those services, which aligns with the
method by which we assessed the 2019 operating performance of our reportable segments. Beginning January 1, 2020, we are
managing the operating performance of each of our segments on a standalone basis. Prior year 2019 allocations were not restated to
conform to the 2020 presentation; however, operating margins for IngenioRx were approximately 8% in 2019.
Financial data by reportable segment for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
Commercial &
Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business IngenioRx Other Eliminations Total
Year ended December 31, 2020
Operating revenue - unaffiliated $ 36,699 $ 71,572 10,384 $ 2,153 $ — $120,808 
Operating revenue - affiliated — — 11,527 3,904 (15,431) — 
Operating gain (loss) 2,681 2,444 1,361 (126) — 6,360 
Depreciation and amortization of property
and equipment — — — 638 — 638 
Year ended December 31, 2019
Operating revenue - unaffiliated $ 37,421 $ 62,632 2,007 $ 1,081 $ — $103,141 
Operating revenue - affiliated — — 3,395 1,212 (4,607) — 
Operating gain (loss) 4,032 2,056 — (89) — 5,999 
Depreciation and amortization of property
and equipment — — — 675 — 675 
Year ended December 31, 2018
Operating revenue - unaffiliated $ 35,782 $ 55,348 — $ 211 $ — $ 91,341 
Operating revenue - affiliated — — — 1,308 (1,308) — 
Operating gain (loss) 3,600 1,928 — (102) — 5,426 
Depreciation and amortization of property
and equipment — — — 652 — 652 
-142-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
 The major product revenues for each of the reportable segments for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 are as
follows:
2020 2019 2018
Commercial & Specialty Business
Managed care products $ 29,815 $ 30,311 $ 29,012 
Managed care services 5,296 5,451 5,218 
Dental/Vision products and services 1,231 1,302 1,220 
Other 357 357 332 
Total Commercial & Specialty Business 36,699 37,421 35,782 
Government Business
Managed care products 71,188 62,229 54,889 
Managed care services 384 403 459 
Total Government Business 71,572 62,632 55,348 
IngenioRx
Pharmacy products and services 21,911 5,402 — 
Other
Integrated health services 5,787 2,149 1,489 
Other 270 144 30 
Total Other Business 6,057 2,293 1,519 
Eliminations
Eliminations (15,431) (4,607) (1,308)
Total product revenues $ 120,808 $ 103,141 $ 91,341 
The classification between managed care products and managed care services in the above table primarily distinguishes
between the levels of risk assumed. Managed care products represent insurance products where we bear the insurance risk, whereas
managed care services represent product offerings where we provide claims adjudication and other administrative services to the
customer, but the customer principally bears the insurance risk. 
Asset, liability and equity details by reportable segment have not been disclosed, as we do not internally report such
information. 
A reconciliation of reportable segments’ operating revenue to the amounts of total revenues included in our consolidated
statements of income for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Reportable segments operating revenues $ 120,808 $ 103,141 $ 91,341 
Net investment income 877 1,005 970 
Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments 182 67 (206)
Total revenues $ 121,867 $ 104,213 $ 92,105 
-143-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A reconciliation of reportable segments’ operating gain to income before income tax expense included in our consolidated
statements of income for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Reportable segments operating gain $ 6,360 $ 5,999 $ 5,426 
Net investment income 877 1,005 970 
Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments 182 67 (206)
Interest expense (784) (746) (753)
Amortization of other intangible assets (361) (338) (358)
Loss on extinguishment of debt (36) (2) (11)
Income before income tax expense $ 6,238 $ 5,985 $ 5,068 
21. Related Party Transactions
We have a 19.50% equity investment in National Accounts Service Company, LLC (“NASCO”) which processes National
Accounts claims and provides other administrative services for us and certain other BCBS plans. Administrative expenses incurred
related to NASCO services totaled $58, $78 and $79, for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Amounts due to NASCO were $5 and $4 at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
We have an equity investment in APC Passe, LLC, which offers Medicaid products in Arkansas. During the years ended
December 31, 2020 and 2019, in the normal course of business, we assumed premiums of $446 and $408, respectively, from APC
Passe, LLC, which is included in our total assumed premiums (see Note 17, “Reinsurance”). Amounts due to APC Passe, LLC
were $115 and $162 at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
22. Statutory Information
The majority of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries report their accounts in conformity with accounting practices prescribed
or permitted by state insurance regulatory authorities, commonly referred to as statutory accounting, which vary in certain respects
from GAAP. However, certain of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries, including BCC, Blue Cross of California Partnership Plan,
Inc., Golden West Health Plan, Inc., Beacon Health Options of California, Inc. and CareMore Health Plan are regulated by the
California Department of Managed Health Care (“DMHC”) and report their accounts in conformity with GAAP (these entities are
collectively referred to as the “DMHC regulated entities”). Typical differences of GAAP reporting as compared to statutory
reporting are the recognition of all assets including those that are non-admitted for statutory purposes and recognition of all
deferred tax assets without regard to statutory limits. The National Association of Insurance Commissioners (“NAIC”) developed a
codified version of the statutory accounting principles, designed to foster more consistency among the states for accounting
guidelines and reporting. Prescribed statutory accounting practices are set forth in a variety of publications of the NAIC as well as
state laws, regulations and general administrative rules.
Our ability to pay dividends and credit obligations is significantly dependent on receipt of dividends from our subsidiaries. The
payment of dividends to us by our insurance and HMO subsidiaries without prior approval of the insurance departments of each
subsidiary’s domiciliary jurisdiction is limited by formula. Dividends in excess of these amounts are subject to prior approval by
the respective state insurance departments or the DMHC.
Our statutory basis insurance and HMO subsidiaries are subject to risk-based capital (“RBC”) requirements. RBC is a method
developed by the NAIC to determine the minimum amount of statutory capital appropriate for an insurance company or HMO to
support its overall business operations in consideration of its size and risk profile. The formula for determining the amount of RBC
specifies various factors, weighted based on the perceived degree of risk, which are applied to certain financial balances and
financial activity. Below minimum RBC requirements are classified within certain levels, each of which requires specified
corrective action. Additionally, the DMHC regulated entities are subject to capital and solvency requirements as prescribed by the
DMHC. As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, all of our regulated subsidiaries exceeded the minimum applicable mandatory RBC
requirements and/or capital and solvency requirements of their applicable governmental regulator. The statutory RBC necessary to
satisfy regulatory requirements of our statutory basis insurance and HMO subsidiaries was approximately $5,800 and $5,500 as of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. The tangible net
-144-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
equity required for the DMHC regulated entities was approximately $600 and $610 as of December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively.
Statutory-basis capital and surplus of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries and capital and surplus of our other regulated
subsidiaries, excluding the DMHC regulated entities, was $13,717 and $13,044 at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Statutory-basis net income of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries and net income of our other regulated subsidiaries, excluding
the DMHC regulated entities, was $3,170, $3,840 and $3,412 for 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. GAAP equity of the DMHC
regulated entities was $3,851 and $3,359 at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. GAAP net income of the DMHC regulated
entities was $753, $878 and $789 for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
23. Selected Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited)
Selected quarterly financial data is as follows:
 For the Quarter Ended
 March 31 June 30 September 30 December 31
2020
Total revenues $ 29,621 $ 29,264 $ 31,158 $ 31,824 
Income before income tax expense 2,089 3,149 389 611 
Net income 1,523 2,276 222 551 
Basic net income per share $ 6.03 $ 9.02 $ 0.88 $ 2.23 
Diluted net income per share 5.94 8.91 0.87 2.19 
2019
Total revenues $ 24,666 $ 25,466 $ 26,674 $ 27,407 
Income before income tax expense 1,945 1,453 1,489 1,098 
Net income 1,551 1,139 1,183 934 
Basic net income per share $ 6.03 $ 4.44 $ 4.64 $ 3.69 
Diluted net income per share 5.91 4.36 4.55 3.62 
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE.
There have been no changes in or disagreements with our independent registered public accounting firm on accounting or
financial disclosures.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES.
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
We carried out an evaluation as of December 31, 2020, under the supervision and with the participation of our management,
including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of the design and operation of our disclosure
controls and procedures as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) of the Exchange Act. Based upon that evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer
and Chief Financial Officer concluded that our disclosure controls and procedures are effective in timely alerting them to material
information relating to us (including our consolidated subsidiaries) required to be disclosed in our reports under the Exchange Act.
In addition, based on that evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that our disclosure
controls and procedures were effective in ensuring that information required to be disclosed by us in the reports that we file or
submit under the Exchange Act is accumulated and communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and
Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosures.
-145-
Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting 
Management, under the supervision and with the participation of the principal executive officer and principal financial officer,
of Anthem, Inc. (the “Company”) is responsible for establishing and maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting
(“Internal Control”), as such term is defined in the Exchange Act. The Company’s Internal Control is designed to provide
reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of the Company’s financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for
external reporting purposes in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”). The Company’s Internal
Control includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and
fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with GAAP, and that receipts and expenditures of
the Company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the Company; and
(iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition of the
Company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of inherent limitations in any Internal Control, no matter how well designed, misstatements due to error or fraud may
occur and not be detected. Accordingly, even effective Internal Control can provide only reasonable assurance regarding the
reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with GAAP.
Management, under the supervision and with the participation of the principal executive officer and principal financial officer,
assessed the effectiveness of the Company’s Internal Control as of December 31, 2020. Management’s assessment was based on
criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission.
The Company completed its acquisition of Beacon Health Options, Inc. on February 28, 2020. As permitted by the U.S.
Securities and Exchange Commission, management's assessment as of December 31, 2020 did not include the Internal Control of
Beacon Health Options, Inc., which is included in the Company's consolidated financial statements as of December 31, 2020. Such
operations of Beacon Health Options, Inc. constituted 3% and 6% of the Company's total assets and net assets, respectively, as of
December 31, 2020, and 2% and 0% of the Company's total revenues and net income for the year then ended.
Based on management’s assessment, which excluded an assessment of Internal Control of Beacon Health Options, Inc.,
management has concluded that the Company’s Internal Control was effective as of December 31, 2020 to provide reasonable
assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external reporting purposes
in accordance with GAAP.
Ernst & Young LLP, the Company’s independent registered public accounting firm, has audited the consolidated financial
statements of the Company for the year ended December 31, 2020, and has also issued an audit report dated February 18, 2021, on
the effectiveness of the Company’s Internal Control as of December 31, 2020, which is included in this Annual Report on Form 10-
K.
/S/    GAIL K. BOUDREAUX  /S/    JOHN E. GALLINA
President and Chief Executive Officer Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There have been no changes in our internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the three months ended
December 31, 2020 that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial
reporting.
-146-
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Shareholders and the Board of Directors of Anthem, Inc.
Opinion on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
We have audited Anthem, Inc.’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in
Internal Control–Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013
framework) (the COSO criteria). In our opinion, Anthem, Inc. (the Company) maintained, in all material respects, effective internal
control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on the COSO criteria.
As indicated in the accompanying Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting, management’s assessment
of and conclusion on the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting did not include the internal controls of Beacon
Health Options, Inc., which is included in the 2020 consolidated financial statements of the Company and constituted 3% and 6%
of total and net assets, respectively, as of December 31, 2020 and 2% and 0% of revenues and net income, respectively, for the year
then ended. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting of the Company also did not include an evaluation of the internal
control over financial reporting of Beacon Health Options, Inc.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the consolidated balance sheets of Anthem, Inc. as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the related consolidated statements
of income, comprehensive income, shareholders’ equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended
December 31, 2020, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(c) and our report dated
February 18, 2021 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment
of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying Management’s Report on Internal
Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial
reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with
respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities
and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material
respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material
weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and
performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable
basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/    ERNST & YOUNG LLP
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 18, 2021
-147-
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION.
None.
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE.
The information required by this Item concerning our Executive Officers, Directors and nominees for Director, Audit
Committee members and financial expert(s) and concerning disclosure of any delinquent filers under Section 16(a) of the Exchange
Act and our Code of Conduct is incorporated herein by reference from our definitive Proxy Statement for our 2021 Annual Meeting
of Shareholders, which will be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end of our last fiscal year.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION.
The information required by this Item concerning remuneration of our Executive Officers and Directors, material transactions
involving such Executive Officers and Directors and Compensation Committee interlocks, as well as the Compensation and Talent
Committee Report and CEO Pay Ratio disclosure are incorporated herein by reference from our definitive Proxy Statement for our
2021 Annual Meeting of Shareholders, which will be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end
of our last fiscal year.
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS.
Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans
Securities authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans as of December 31, 2020 are as follows:
Plan
CategoryNumber of securities to be
issued upon exercise of
outstanding options, warrants
and rights
(a)Weighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding options, warrants
and rights
(b)Number of securities
remaining available for
future issuance under equity
compensation plans (excluding
securities reflected in column
(a))
(c)
Equity compensation plans approved by shareholders as of
December 31, 2020 5,367,044 $230.00 24,139,655
1 We have no equity compensation plans pursuant to which awards may be granted in the future that have not been approved by shareholders.
2 Includes shares that may be issued under the Anthem Incentive Compensation Plan and the Anthem 2017 Incentive Compensation Plan
pursuant to the following outstanding awards: 3,071,776  stock options, 625,254  unvested restricted stock units, and 1,670,014  performance
stock units (assuming that the outstanding performance stock units are earned at the maximum award level).
3 Represents the weighted average exercise price of outstanding stock options. Does not take into consideration outstanding restricted stock
units or performance stock units, which, once vested, may be converted into shares of our common stock on a one-for -one basis upon
distribution at no additional cost.
4 Excludes securities reflected in the first column, “Number of securities to be issued upon exercise of outstanding options, warrants and
rights”. Includes 19,498,782  shares of common stock available for issuance as stock options, restricted stock awards, performance stock
awards, performance awards and stock appreciation rights under the Anthem 2017 Incentive Compensation Plan at December 31, 2020.
Includes 4,640,873  shares of common stock available for issuance under the Stock Purchase Plan at December 31, 2020.
 The information required by this Item concerning the stock ownership of management and five percent beneficial owners is
incorporated herein by reference from our definitive Proxy Statement for our 2021 Annual Meeting of Shareholders, which will be
filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end of our last fiscal year.12 3 4
-148-
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE.
The information required by this Item concerning certain relationships and related person transactions and director
independence is incorporated herein by reference from our definitive Proxy Statement for our 2021 Annual Meeting of
Shareholders, which will be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end of our last fiscal year.
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES.
The information required by this Item concerning principal accountant fees and services is incorporated herein by reference
from our definitive Proxy Statement for our 2021 Annual Meeting of Shareholders, which will be filed with the SEC pursuant to
Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end of our last fiscal year.
-149-
PART IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES.
(a) 1. Financial Statements:
The following consolidated financial statements of the Company are set forth in Part II, Item 8:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Statements of Income for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018
Consolidated Statements of Shareholders’ Equity for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
2. Financial Statement Schedule:
The following financial statement schedule of the Company is included in Item 15(c):
Schedule II—Condensed Financial Information of Registrant (Parent Company Only).
All other schedules for which provision is made in the applicable accounting regulations of the SEC are not required
under the related instructions, are inapplicable, or the required information is included in the consolidated financial
statements, and therefore, have been omitted.
3. Exhibits required to be filed as part of this report:
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
3.1 Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation of the Company, as amended and restated effective May 15, 2019,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 15, 2019.
3.2 Bylaws of the Company, as amended effective September 30, 2020, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 6, 2020
4.1 Form of Specimen Certificate of the Company’s common stock, $0.01 par value per share, incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Post-Effective Amendment No.1 to Form S-8 Registration Statement filed on May
23, 2017.
4.2 Indenture, dated as of December 9, 2004, between the Company and The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A., as
trustee, including the Form of the Company’s 5.950% Notes due 2034, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 15, 2004.
4.3 Indenture, dated as of January 10, 2006, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company,
N.A. (formerly known as The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A.), as trustee, incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on January 11, 2006.
(a)Form of 5.85% Notes due 2036, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on January 11, 2006.
(b)Form of 6.375% Notes due 2037, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on June 8, 2007.
(c)Form of 5.800% Notes due 2040, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 12, 2010.
(d)Form of 3.700% Notes due 2021, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 15, 2011.
-150-
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
(e)Form of 3.125% Notes due 2022, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on May 7, 2012.
(f)Form of 4.625% Notes due 2042, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on May 7, 2012.
(g)Form of 3.300% Notes due 2023, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 10, 2012.
(h)Form of 4.650% Notes due 2043, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 10, 2012.
(i)Form of 5.100% Notes due 2044, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on July 31, 2013.
(j)Form of 3.500% Notes due 2024, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 12, 2014.
(k)Form of 4.650% Notes due 2044, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 12, 2014.
(l)Form of 4.850% Notes due 2054, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 12, 2014.
4.4 Indenture dated as of October 9, 2012 between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company,
N.A. as trustee, including the Form of the 2.750% Senior Convertible Debentures due 2042, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 9, 2012.
4.5 Subordinated Indenture, dated as of May 12, 2015, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust
Company, N.A., as trustee, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on May 12, 2015.
4.6 Indenture dated as of November 21, 2017 between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company,
N.A. as trustee, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
November 21, 2017.
(a)Form of 2.950% Notes due 2022, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2017.
(b)Form of 3.350% Notes due 2024, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2017.
(c)Form of 3.650% Notes due 2027, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2017.
(d)Form of 4.375% Notes due 2047, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2017.
(e)Form of 4.101% Notes due 2028, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on March 2, 2018.
(f)Form of 4.550% Notes due 2048, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on March 2, 2018.
(g)Form of 2.375% Notes due 2025, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 9, 2019.
(h)Form of 2.875% Notes due 2029, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 9, 2019.
(i)Form of 3.700% Notes due 2049, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 9, 2019.
-151-
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
(j)Form of the 2.250% Notes due 2030, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on May 5, 2020.
(k)Form of the 3.125% Notes due 2050, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on May 5, 2020.
4.7  Upon the request of the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company will furnish copies of any other
instruments defining the rights of holders of long-term debt of the Company or its subsidiaries.
4.8 Description of the Company’s Securities Registered Pursuant to Section 12 of the Exchange Act.
10.1* Anthem Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective December 2, 2014, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 2, 2014.
(a)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2014, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(p) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2014.
(b)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2015, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(n) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2015.
(c)
 Form of Amendment, dated March 9, 2016, to Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award
Agreement for 2014, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(m) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016.
(d)Form of Amendment, dated March 9, 2016, to Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award
Agreement for 2015, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(p) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016.
(e)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2016 and 2017,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(s) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2016.
(f)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2017, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(t) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2016.
10.2 *2017 Anthem Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective October 1, 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30,
2019.
(a)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2018, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(d) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2018.
(b)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2018, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(e) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2018.
(c)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2018, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(f) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2018.
(d)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement commencing July 2018,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(h) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2018.
(e)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement commencing July 2018,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(i) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2018.
-152-
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
(f)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement commencing July 2018,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(j) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2018.
(g)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(l) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2019.
(h)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(m) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2019.
(i)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(n) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2019.
(j)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2020, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(l) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2020.
(k)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2020, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(m) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2020.
(l)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2020, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(n) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2020.
10.3 *Anthem, Inc. Comprehensive Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective October
1, 2019, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended September 30, 2019.
10.4*Anthem, Inc. Executive Agreement Plan, as amended and restated effective December 2, 2014, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.4 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014.
(a)First Amendment, dated March 9, 2016, to Executive Agreement Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.4(a) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016.
(b)Second Amendment, dated January 6, 2017, to Executive Agreement Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.3(b) to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016.
(c)Third Amendment, dated August 27, 2018, to Executive Agreement Plan, incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.4(c) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30,
2018.
10.5*Anthem, Inc. Executive Salary Continuation Plan, as amended and restated effective December 2, 2014, incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015.
10.6*Anthem, Inc. Directed Executive Compensation Plan amended effective January 1, 2020.
10.7*Anthem, Inc. Board of Directors Compensation Program, as amended effective May 15, 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.7 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2019.
10.8*Anthem Board of Directors’ Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective December 2, 2014,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.8 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2014.
10.9* (a)Form of Employment Agreement between the Company and each of the following: John E. Gallina, Peter D.
Haytaian, and Gloria McCarthy, incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 10.41 to the Company’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2007.
-153-
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
(b)Form of Employment Agreement between the Company and Gail Boudreaux, incorporated by reference to
Exhibit A to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 6, 2017.
(c)Form of Employment Agreement between the Company and each of the following: Felicia F. Norwood,
Prakash Patel, Leah Stark, Jeffrey D. Alter, and Blair W. Todt incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.9(d) to
the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2018.
10.10*Offer Letter, by and between the Company and Gail Boudreaux, dated as of November 5, 2017, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 6, 2017.
10.11 Blue Cross License Agreement by and between Blue Cross Blue Shield Association and the Company, including
revisions, if any, adopted by the Member Plans through September 17, 2020.
10.12 Blue Shield License Agreement by and between Blue Cross Blue Shield Association and the Company, including
revisions, if any, adopted by the Member Plans through September 17, 2020.
21 Subsidiaries of the Company.
23 Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.
31.1 Certification of Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) and Rule 15d-14(a) of the Exchange Act Rules,
as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.2 Certification of Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) and Rule 15d-14(a) of the Exchange Act Rules, as
adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.1 Certification of Chief Executive Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of
the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.2 Certification of Chief Financial Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
101 The following materials from Anthem, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2020,
formatted in Inline XBRL (Inline Extensible Business Reporting Language): (i) the Consolidated Balance Sheets; (ii)
the Consolidated Statements of Income; (iii) the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income; (iv) the
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows; (v) the Consolidated Statements of Shareholders’ Equity; (vi) the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements and (vii) Financial Statement Schedule II. The instance document does not appear
in the Interactive Data File because its XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File formatted in Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101.
* Indicates management contracts or compensatory plans or arrangements.
(b) Exhibits
The response to this portion of Item 15 is set forth in paragraph (a) 3 above.
(c) Financial Statement Schedule
Schedule II—Condensed Financial Information of Registrant (Parent Company Only).
ITEM 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY.
None.
-154-
Schedule II—Condensed Financial Information of Registrant
Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company Only)
Balance Sheets
(In millions, except shar e data)December 31,
 2020December 31,
 2019
Assets
Current assets:
Cash and cash equivalents $ 700 $ 1,818  
Fixed maturity securities, current (amortized cost of $594 and $592;
allowance for credit losses of $0 and $0) 608 602 
Equity securities 439 253 
Other receivables 41 92 
Net due from subsidiaries — 602 
Other current assets 800 653 
Total current assets 2,588  4,020  
Other invested assets 664 657 
Property and equipment, net 209 170 
Deferred tax assets, net 391 216 
Investments in subsidiaries 51,739  47,423  
Other noncurrent assets 211 263 
Total assets $ 55,802  $ 52,749  
Liabilities and shar eholders’ equity
Liabilities
Current liabilities:
Accounts payable and accrued expenses $ 429 $ 887 
Net due to subsidiaries 1,239  — 
Current portion of long-term debt 700 1,598  
Other current liabilities 494 263 
Total current liabilities 2,862  2,748  
Long-term debt, less current portion 19,310  17,762  
Other noncurrent liabilities 431 511 
Total liabilities 22,603  21,021  
Commitments and contingencies—Note 5
Shar eholders’ equity
Preferred stock, without par value, shares authorized - 100,000,000; shares issued and outstanding - none — — 
Common stock, par value $0.01, shares authorized - 900,000,000; shares issued and outstanding -
245,401,430 and 252,922,161 3 3 
Additional paid-in capital 9,244  9,448  
Retained earnings 23,802  22,573  
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) 150 (296)
Total shar eholders’ equity 33,199  31,728  
Total liabilities and shar eholders’ equity $ 55,802  $ 52,749  
 
See accompanying notes.
-155-
Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company Only)
Statements of Income
Years ended December 31
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Revenues
Net investment income $ 65 $ 81 $ 39 
Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments 28 (85) (61)
Administrative fees and other revenue 22 22 2 
Total revenues (losses) 115 18 (20)
Expenses
General and administrative expense 169 88 86 
Interest expense 779 723 723 
Loss on extinguishment of debt 36 2 11 
Total expenses 984 813 820 
Loss before income tax credits and equity in net income of subsidiaries (869) (795) (840)
Income tax credits (386) (251) (238)
Equity in net income of subsidiaries 5,055 5,351 4,352 
Net income $ 4,572 $ 4,807 $ 3,750 
 
See accompanying notes.
-156-
Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company Only)
Statements of Comprehensive Income
Years ended December 31
(in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net income $ 4,572 $ 4,807 $ 3,750 
Other comprehensive income, net of tax:
Change in net unrealized gains/losses on investments 428 680 (418)
Change in non-credit component of impairment losses on investments — — (2)
Change in net unrealized gains/losses on cash flow hedges 12 (16) 37 
Change in net periodic pension and postretirement costs (1) 26 (90)
Foreign currency translation adjustments 7 — (1)
Other comprehensive income (loss) 446 690 (474)
Total comprehensive income $ 5,018 $ 5,497 $ 3,276 
 
See accompanying notes.
-157-
Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company Only)
Statements of Cash Flows
Years ended December  31
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Operating activities
Net income $ 4,572  $ 4,807  $ 3,750  
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:
Undistributed earnings of subsidiaries (1,418 ) (1,561 ) (744)
Net realized (gains) losses on financial instruments (28) 85 61 
Deferred income taxes (178) 2 (43)
Impairment of property and equipment 10 — — 
Depreciation and amortization 96 106 113 
Share-based compensation 283 294 226 
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:
Receivables, net 53 41 (73)
Other invested assets (27) 6 (5)
Other assets 33 (235) (225)
Amounts due to/(from) subsidiaries 1,841  (432) 2,259  
Accounts payable and other liabilities (554) (422) 457 
Income taxes 87 (282) 187 
Other , net 40 2 12 
Net cash pr ovided by operating activities 4,810  2,411 5,975  
Investing activities
Purchases of investments (2,729 ) (9,682 ) (800)
Proceeds from sales, maturities, calls and redemptions of investments 2,593  9,457  1,865  
Capitalization of subsidiaries (2,460 ) (232) (4,379 )
Changes in securities lending collateral (234) 18 (21)
Purchases of property and equipment, net of sales (107) (54) (137)
Other , net 11 — 4 
Net cash used in investing activities (2,926 ) (493) (3,468 )
Financing activities
Net repayments of commercial paper borrowings (150) (297) (107)
Proceeds from long-term borrowings 2,484  2,473  835 
Repayments of long-term borrowings (1,932 ) (1,123 ) (1,684 )
Changes in securities lending payable 234 (18) 21 
Proceeds from issuance of common stock under Equity Units stock purchase contracts — — 1,250  
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (2,700 ) (1,701 ) (1,685 )
Cash dividends (1,000 ) (856) (812)
Proceeds from issuance of common stock under employee stock plans 176 187 173 
Taxes paid through withholding of common stock under employee stock plans (128) (84) (81)
Other , net 14 29 (83)
Net cash used in financing activities (3,002 ) (1,390 ) (2,173 )
Change in cash and cash equivalents (1,118) 528 334 
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of year 1,818  1,290  956 
Cash and cash equivalents at end of year $ 700 $ 1,818  $ 1,290  
See accompanying notes.
-158-
Anthem, Inc.
(Parent Company Only)
Notes to Condensed Financial Statements
December 31, 2020
(In Millions, Except Per Share Data)
1. Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies
In the parent company only financial statements of Anthem, Inc. (“Anthem”) Anthem’s investment in subsidiaries is stated at
cost plus equity in undistributed earnings of the subsidiaries. Anthem’s share of net income of its unconsolidated subsidiaries is
included in income using the equity method of accounting.
Certain amounts presented in the parent company only financial statements are eliminated in the consolidated financial
statements of Anthem.
Anthem’s parent company only financial statements should be read in conjunction with Anthem’s audited consolidated
financial statements and the accompanying notes included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
2. Subsidiary Transactions
Dividends from Subsidiaries
Anthem received cash dividends from subsidiaries of $3,618, $3,790 and $3,606 during 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Dividends to Subsidiaries
Certain subsidiaries of Anthem own shares of Anthem common stock. Anthem paid cash dividends to subsidiaries related to
these shares of common stock in the amount of $46, $38 and $36 during 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Investments in Subsidiaries
Capital contributions to subsidiaries were $2,460, $232 and $4,379 during 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Amounts Due to and From Subsidiaries
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, Anthem reported amounts due to and from subsidiaries of $1,239 and $602, respectively. The
amounts due from subsidiaries primarily include amounts for allocated administrative expenses or daily cash management
activities. These items are routinely settled, and as such, are classified as current assets or liabilities.
Guarantees on Behalf of Subsidiaries
Anthem guarantees contractual or financial obligations or solvency requirements for certain of its subsidiaries. These
guarantees approximated $538 at December 31, 2020. There were no payments made on these guarantees in 2020.
3. Derivative Financial Instruments
The information regarding derivative financial instruments contained in Note 6, “Derivative Financial Instruments,” of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements of Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K, is incorporated herein by reference.
4. Long-Term Debt
The information regarding long-term debt contained in Note 13, “Debt,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements of
Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, is incorporated herein by reference.
-159-
5. Commitments and Contingencies
The information regarding commitments and contingencies contained in Note 14, “Commitments and Contingencies,” of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements of Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K, is incorporated herein by reference.
6. Capital Stock
The information regarding capital stock contained in Note 15, “Capital Stock,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements of Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, is incorporated herein
by reference.
7. Leases
Beginning in 2019, certain of our leases, including the lease for our principal executive offices located at 220 Virginia Avenue,
Indianapolis, Indiana, are obligations of Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company). At December 31, 2020, these leases had an aggregate
right-of-use asset of $95, a lease liability balance of $98, operating lease expense of $15 and future lease payments as follows:
2021, $21; 2022, $19; 2023, $16; 2024, $13; 2025, $11; and thereafter $59. At December 31, 2019, the aggregate right-of-use asset
balance was $39, the lease liability balance was $40, and the operating lease expense recognized in 2019 was $7. All other
information regarding leases is contained in Note 18, “Leases,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements of Anthem and
its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Our activities as disclosed in Note 4, “Business
Optimization Initiatives” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements of Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item
8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, include reducing our office space footprint. As a result, we performed an interim
impairment test and recorded an impairment charge of $1 for affected right-of-use assets in 2020 which is included in the operating
lease expense shown above.
8. Property and Equipment
The information regarding property and equipment contained in Note 9, “Property and Equipment,” of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements of Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K,
is incorporated herein by reference. Our activities as disclosed in Note 4, “Business Optimization Initiatives” of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements of Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K,
include impairment and abandonment of property and equipment. We recorded an impairment charge of $10 for property and
equipment which is included in general and administrative expenses.
-160-
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
ANTHEM, INC.
By: /s/    GAIL K. BOUDREAUX       
Gail K. Boudreaux
 President and Chief Executive Officer
Dated: February 18, 2021
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. 
Signature   Title Date
/s/    GAIL K. BOUDREAUX   President and Chief Executive Officer, Director
 (Principal Executive Officer)February 18, 2021
Gail K. Boudreaux
/s/    JOHN E. GALLINA          Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)February 18, 2021
John E. Gallina
/s/    RONALD W. PENCZEK          Senior Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer
(Principal Accounting Officer)February 18, 2021
Ronald W. Penczek
/s/    ELIZABETH E. TALLETT Chair of the Board February 18, 2021
Elizabeth E. Tallett
/s/ R. KERRY CLARK         Director February 18, 2021
R. Kerry Clark
/s/ ROBERT L. DIXON, JR.          Director February 18, 2021
Robert L. Dixon, Jr.
/s/    LEWIS HAY III       Director February 18, 2021
Lewis Hay III
/s/    JULIE A. HILL          Director February 18, 2021
Julie A. Hill
/s/    BAHIJA JALLAL   Director February 18, 2021
Bahija Jallal
/s/    ANTONIO F. NERI Director February 18, 2021
Antonio F. Neri
/s/    RAMIRO G. PERU          Director February 18, 2021
Ramiro G. Peru
/s/ RYAN M. SCHNEIDER Director February 18, 2021
Ryan M. Schneider
-161-
